Wyoming, session 2025, HB0298.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 2-7-207, 9-1-309 and 9-1-310 are
created to read:
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

2-7-207. Alternative method to provide notice.

Any person who is required to provide notice by publication
in a newspaper may publish the notice on the centralized
electronic notice system established under W.S. 9-1-309.
Publication on the centralized electronic notice system
shall satisfy the applicable publication requirement,
pursuant to W.S. 9-1-310.

9-1-309. Centralized electronic notice system
established; preservation of notice; rulemaking; fees;
definitions.

(a) The secretary of state shall create and maintain
a centralized electronic notice system on the secretary of
state's official website.

(b) The centralized electronic notice system shall
allow:

(i) Legal or public notice by electronic means
by any governmental entity or other person when the notice
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
is authorized or permitted by law, rule or regulation to be
made on the centralized electronic notice system or by
publication;

(ii) Any notice posted to the system to remain
posted for not less than the total period of time required
for the notice to comply with the applicable law, rule or
regulation;

(iii) Members of the public to subscribe to the
system and be notified when notices are posted to the
system.

(c) The secretary of state shall preserve all notices
posted to the centralized electronic notice system for a
period of not less than seven (7) years.

(d) The secretary of state shall promulgate rules
regulating the centralized electronic notice system in
accordance with this section and may receive technical
support from the department of enterprise technology
services as necessary.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(e) The secretary of state shall collect a reasonable
fee of not more than ten dollars ($10.00) to publish legal
or public notice on the centralized electronic notice
system.

9-1-310. Publication of notice by electronic means;
length of publication; designation of the centralized
electronic notice system for purposes of providing notice.

(a) If any law, rule or regulation requires or
permits a governmental entity or any other person to
provide public or legal notice to be made on the
centralized electronic notice system or by publication in a
newspaper, the governmental entity or person may publish
the notice on the centralized electronic notice system
established under W.S. 9-1-309. Publication on the
centralized electronic notice system shall satisfy all
requirements that the publication be made in a newspaper.
If a governmental entity or any other person provides
notice on the centralized electronic notice system the
secretary of state shall provide the governmental entity or
person proof of the notice which shall satisfy any legal
requirement regarding proof of publication in a newspaper.
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
When a notice is published on the centralized electronic
notice system there shall be no additional requirement to
publish the notice in a newspaper but this section shall
not prohibit a governmental entity or other person from
publishing the notice in a newspaper.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2030, all public and legal
notices required by a law, rule or regulation to be
published in a newspaper shall be published on the
centralized electronic notice system.

(c) When a governmental entity or person is required
by law, rule or regulation to designate a newspaper for the
publication of notices, the governmental entity or person
may designate the centralized electronic notice system in
lieu of designating a newspaper. On and after January 1,
2030, no governmental entity or person shall be required to
designate a newspaper in accordance with W.S. 15-1-110 or
W.S. 18-3-517.

Section 2. W.S. 1-6-201, 1-16-402, 1-17-311,
1-17-312, 1-18-101(a)(ii), 1-21-601, 1-21-1210(a)(i)(C),
1-26-812(c)(ii), 1-33-108, 1-37-106(a)(ii), 1-38-105(a),
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
2-1-205(d), 2-6-122(d), 2-7-505, 2-7-703(a), 2-9-101,
2-9-202, 2-9-204(b), 2-12-102, 4-10-507(a)(ii),
6-2-711(e)(i), 8–1-102(a) by creating a new paragraph
(xxiii), 9-1-303 by creating a new subsection (g),
9-1-305(a) by creating a new paragraph (viii) and (c)(i),
9-1-507(j)(iv), 9-4-814, 9-4-818(b), 9-23-104(b),
10-5-101(a)(iv), 11-5-104(a), 11-5-303(c)(v),
11-6-203(a)(ii), 11-16-102(a)(vi), 11-16-134(c)(intro),
11-24-114(a), 11-31-212(b), 11-31-301(b)(intro), 11-33-103,
11-35-109, 12-4-104(a), 13-2-207, 13-2-402(b),
13-2-702(b)(iii), 13-2-704, 13-4-101(c), 13-4-106(b),
13-4-107, 13-4-109(c), 13-4-604(b), 13-4-701(a),
13-5-425(b)(iii), 13-5-502(b), 13-5-519(b), 13-12-112(b),
15-1-110(a), 15-1-112(a) and (b)(intro), 15-1-113(b),
15-1-116(a), 15-1-205(b)(ii)(A), 15-1-206(a), 15-1-405(b),
15-1-416(c), 15-1-421(b), 15-1-602(b), 15-2-204(a)(intro),
15-3-101, 15-6-202(d), 15-6-301(b), 15-6-405(a),
15-6-410(b), 15-6-417(b), 15-6-418(a), 15-6-435, 15-6-439,
15-6-501, 15-6-603(b), 15-6-604(b), 15-7-106(a), 15-7-107,
15-7-113, 15-7-207, 15-7-303, 15-9-109(b)(intro),
15-9-116(a)(ii)(intro), 15-9-124, 15-9-136, 15-9-208(c),
15-11-301(a)(iv), 16-4-109(a), 16-4-114, 16-4-404(b),
16-6-116(a)(ii), 16-10-105(e), 17-10-112, 17-16-141(a) and
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(b), 17-16-1407(b)(i), 17-19-1408(b)(i), 17-20-729(b)(iii),
17-29-704(b)(i), 17-30-903(b)(i), 18-3-501(d), 18-3-515,
18-3-516(a) and (f), 18-3-518(a), 18-3-519(a),
18-3-524(a)(ii), 18-3-525(a)(ii)(intro), 18-3-704(a)(i),
18-4-105, 18-4-306, 18-4-405, 18-4-502, 18-4-504(a),
18-5-202(b) and (c), 18-5-503(a)(ii), 18-6-101(b),
18-6-201(a), 18-10-216, 18-12-105(b), 18-12-117(a)(intro),
18-15-106(c), 18-15-111(d)(i)(C), 18-16-112(a)(intro),
21-3-110(a)(i), 21-3-118(a)(iii), 21-6-206,
21-6-207(b)(vii), 21-13-103, 21-13-704, 21-18-303(b),
21-18-312(g) and (j), 21-18-314(d), 21-20-110(b),
22-2-109(a) and (b)(intro), 22-3-104(j), 22-4-104,
22-4-105, 22-6-105, 22-7-102(a), 22-12-101, 22-16-122(g),
22-18-111(a)(i), (ii) and (iii)(C), 22-20-104, 22-21-104,
22-23-802, 22-24-318(b), 22-24-415(b),
22-29-109(a)(ii)(intro), 22-29-110(a) and (c), 22-29-112(c)
and (e), 22-29-117(b), 24-1-101(a), 24-1-132(e),
24-3-110(a), 24-3-204(a), 24-5-109(a), 24-8-103,
26-3-117(c), 26-31-109(a)(iii), 27-4-406(b)(i),
29-7-205(a)(intro), 30-2-306, 30-5-111(d), 31-5-1212(b),
31-11-104, 31-13-106(b), 31-13-108(a), 31-13-109(d)(intro),
31-18-707, 34-4-104(a), 34-4-109, 34-14-210(b)(ii),
34-23-102(c), 34-24-123(a), 34.1-7-210(b)(v), 35-2-340,
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
35-2-417, 35-2-709(b), 35-3-105, 35-3-121, 35-3-124(c),
35-8-212, 35-8-318, 35-9-206, 35-11-313(f)(ii)(N)(I),
35-11-406(g), (j) and (p)(ii), 35-11-415(b)(xi)(A),
35-11-502(g), (j) and (k), 35-11-514(a)(intro),
35-11-601(a), 35-11-1204(b), 35-11-1604(a) and (d),
35-11-1609(d), 35-12-108(c), 35-24-110(a), 36-3-104,
36-5-114(d)(ii), 36-7-322, 36-7-401, 36-7-504, 36-9-104,
37-2-205(e), 37-5-503(g), 37-5-505(h), 37-7-114, 37-7-128,
37-13-116, 37-13-125(b), 37-13-128, 37-17-101(a)(iii),
39-13-108(e)(ii)(A) and (v)(B)(II), 39-15-108(e)(i),
39-15-203(a)(i)(C), (ii)(D), (v)(C) and (vi)(E),
39-15-211(b)(iv), 39-16-108(e), 39-16-203(a)(i)(C), (iv)(C)
and (v)(E), 39-16-211(b)(iv), 41-3-106(d), 41-3-107(b),
41-3-114(f), 41-3-115(o), 41-3-212, 41-3-401(c),
41-3-402(b), 41-3-702(a), 41-3-755, 41-3-758, 41-3-772(b),
41-3-776(a), 41-3-913(b), 41-3-914(a), 41-3-915(a)(intro)
and (d), 41-3-932(a) and (b), 41-3-1006(d), 41-4-302,
41-4-309, 41-4-310, 41-4-506, 41-4-511, 41-4-514(b) and
(e), 41-7-204(a)(ii), 41-7-206, 41-7-308, 41-7-412,
41-7-502, 41-7-602, 41-7-832(a)(ii), 41-7-854, 41-7-916,
41-7-921, 41-7-933, 41-7-1005, 41-8-101(d),
41-9-104(a)(ii), 41-9-109, 41-9-128, 41-9-224, 41-9-245,
41-9-260, 41-9-303(a)(iii), 41-9-605, 41-10-101(a)(xiv),
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
41-10-110(g), 41-10-140 and 41-12-605(c) are amended to
read:

1-6-201. Manner of publishing generally.

(a) All notices by law directed, authorized or
permitted to be made by publication may be published in
accordance with the following:

(i) On the centralized electronic notice system
for the required publication period; or

(ii) Once each week during the period of time
for which the notice is required by law to be published.
All such weekly publications made in a newspaper issued
more than once each week shall be published in the same
issue in each succeeding week for the required publication
period.

1-16-402. Opening judgment or order rendered on
service by publication.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
A party against whom a judgment or order has been rendered
without service other than by publication in a newspaper or
by publication on the centralized electronic notice system
may have the same opened and be allowed to defend within
six (6) months after the date of the judgment or order.
Before the judgment or order can be opened, the applicant
shall give notice to the adverse party of his intended
application, file a full answer to the petition, pay all
costs if the court requires them to be paid and make it
appear to the satisfaction of the court that during the
pendency of the action he had no actual notice thereof in
time to appear in court and make his defense. Each party
may present affidavits.

1-17-311. Bond for future delivery of property;
failure to perform.

When an officer levies an execution upon any goods and
chattels which afterwards remain unsold for any reasonable
cause, the officer may for his own security, take a bond
from the defendant, with security he deems sufficient to
the effect that the property shall be delivered to the
officer holding the execution for the sale of same at the
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
time and place appointed by the officer, either by notice
given in writing to the defendant in execution or by
advertisement printed in a newspaper published in the
county, or by notice provided on the centralized electronic
notice system, naming the day and place of sale. If the
defendant fails to deliver the goods and chattels at the
time and place mentioned in the notice or to pay to the
officer holding the execution the full value of the goods
and chattels or the amount of the debt and costs, the bond
shall be considered broken and may be proceeded on as in
other cases.

1-17-312. Notice of execution sale.

Unless a private sale is ordered as provided in W.S.
1-17-314, the officer who levies execution upon goods and
chattels, shall cause public notice to be given of the time
and place of sale at least ten (10) days before the day of
sale. The notice shall be given by advertisement on the
centralized electronic notice system, in a newspaper
published in the county or, if no newspaper is published
therein, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county.
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

1-18-101. Sale to be at public vendue; hours of sale;
notice required; mortgagee, judgment creditor or lienor
must be present or waive; penalty.

(a) No lands or tenements shall be sold by virtue of
any execution or decree of foreclosure unless:

(ii) The time and place of holding the sale was
previously advertised for four (4) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a legal
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
lands and tenements are situate; and

1-21-601. Notice of sale.

The officer having levied upon goods and chattels by virtue
of an execution shall without delay give public notice by
advertisement on the centralized electronic notice system
or in a newspaper published or widely circulated in the
county where the property is to be sold. The notice shall
state the time and place of sale, describe the goods and
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
chattels, and shall be published at least ten (10) days
before the day of sale.

1-21-1210. Possession of premises and disposition of
personal property abandoned by renter after termination of
rental agreement.

(a) Upon regaining lawful possession of the rental
unit following termination of the rental agreement, the
owner may immediately dispose of any trash or property the
owner reasonably believes to be hazardous, perishable or
valueless and abandoned. Any property remaining within the
rental unit after termination of the rental agreement shall
be presumed to be both valueless and abandoned. Any
valuable property may be removed from the residential
rental unit and shall thereafter be disposed of as follows:

(i) The owner shall provide written notice to
the renter in accordance with this paragraph, describing
the property claimed to be abandoned and stating that the
property shall be disposed of after seven (7) days from the
date of service of the notice if the renter or his agent
does not, within the seven (7) day period, take possession
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of the property or notify the owner in writing of the
renter's intent to take possession of the property. The
notice provided by the owner under this paragraph shall be
deemed served:

(C) On the date the notice is published on
the centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper
published in the county or widely circulated in the county
where the residential rental unit is located.

1-26-812. Constructing, maintaining, abandoning or
closing crossings.

(c) No railroad shall abandon, close or fail to
maintain any other existing crossing which has been
maintained or recognized by the railroad for more than five
(5) years prior to the effective date of this act without:

(ii) Advertising its intended action on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county of the crossing; and

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
1-33-108. Publication of notice of appointment of
receiver; requiring claims to be presented.

Within thirty (30) days after a receiver is appointed and
qualified if the court so orders, the receiver shall
publish for three (3) weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system or in a newspaper of the county in which he
is appointed a notice that he is appointed receiver,
stating the date of the appointment and requiring all
persons having claims against the person, company,
corporation or partnership for which the receiver is
appointed to exhibit their claims to the receiver within
the four (4) months from the date of the first publication
of the notice, and if the claims are not exhibited within
the four (4) months they are forever barred from
participation in the assets of the receivership.

1-37-106. Adjudication of water rights.

(a) The state of Wyoming upon the relation of the
attorney general may institute an action to have determined
in a general adjudication the nature, extent, and relative
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
priority of the water rights of all persons in any river
system and all other sources, provided:

(ii) When the potential defendants number one
thousand (1,000) or more, personal service of a summons and
complaint shall not be required and (A) the court shall
order that the clerk obtain service on known potential
defendants by mailing a court-approved notice of the action
by certified mail, return receipt requested, and (B) the
court shall order that the clerk obtain service on all
unknown parties by publication of said notice for four (4)
consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or in a newspaper published in each of the counties
within which interests in and rights to the use of water
may be affected by the adjudication. If notice is not
published on the centralized electronic notice system and
there is no newspaper in one (1) or more of said counties,
then publication for such counties shall be in one (1) or
more newspapers published in the state, and of general
circulation within said counties. If publication is in a
daily newspaper, one (1) insertion a week shall be
sufficient;

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
1-38-105. Notice.

(a) Within thirty (30) days of the filing of an
action to appoint the wrongful death representative, the
plaintiff shall cause to be published for three (3)
consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a
daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the decedent resided at the time of death,
a notice that an action to appoint the wrongful death
representative has been instituted and that any person
claiming to qualify under W.S. 1-38-104(a) may intervene as
a matter of right.

2-1-205. Summary procedure for distribution of
personal or real property; application for decree; notice
by publication; presumptive evidence of title; effect of
false statements.

(d) Subject to subsection (j) of this section, a
notice of application for a decree of summary distribution
of property shall be published for two (2) consecutive
weeks on the centralized electronic notice system or once a
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the application
was filed. The notice of application shall be served by
first class mail to the last known address, with copy of
application attached, to the surviving spouse of the
decedent, if any, and to all other distributees, so far as
known, or to their guardians if any of them are minors, or
to their personal representatives if any of them are
deceased and to any reasonably ascertainable creditors not
later than ten (10) days after the date of first
publication.

2-6-122. Petition and procedure for filing and
probate of will without administration.

(d) After the entry of the order admitting the will
to probate, the petitioner shall, at his own expense, cause
to be published for three (3) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or once a week for
three (3) consecutive weeks in a daily or weekly newspaper
of general circulation in the county in which the probate
was granted a notice in substantially the following form:

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
State of Wyoming )

) In the District Court

) ....Judicial District

County of.... ) Probate No. ....

In the Matter of the) Notice of Proof of

Estate of ....... ) Will Without

) Administration

......., Deceased. )

TO ALL PERSONS INTERESTED IN SAID ESTATE:

You are hereby notified that on the .... day of ....,
(year), the Last Will and Testament of Decedent was
admitted to probate by the above named court and there will
be no present administration of the estate. Any action to
set aside the Will shall be filed in the Court within three
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(3) months from the date of the first publication of this
notice, or thereafter be forever barred.

Dated ...., (year).

Proponent .............

PUBLISH: (once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks)

2-7-505. Procedure for setting off exempt property.

Any time during the administration of an estate and after
the first publication of notice of opening the probate and
the filing of the appraisement, any person interested may
file a petition showing the necessary facts and praying to
have the exempt property of the estate including the
homestead set over to the person or persons entitled
thereto. Upon filing of the petition, the court shall
require all persons interested to appear on a day certain
to show cause why the exempt property should not be set
over to the person or persons entitled thereto. The order
shall be published for not less than one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system or once in a newspaper
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of general circulation in the county in which the probate
is pending and a copy of the order to show cause shall be
mailed by the personal representative to each heir and
beneficiary. The publication and mailing shall be not less
than ten (10) days prior to the date set for the hearing.
At the time set for the hearing or to which the hearing is
continued, the court shall hear the evidence and make such
order as the facts and law require. If the whole estate of
the decedent is found to be exempt and is set over to the
person or persons entitled thereto, no further proceeding
is required in the administration of the estate unless
further estate is discovered. The publication and notice
may be combined with and included in the notice of opening
the probate, but the hearing shall not be held less than
ten (10) days after the filing of the appraisement.

2-7-703. Filing required; failure to do so
constitutes bar; exceptions.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all
claims whether due, not due or contingent, shall be filed
in duplicate with the clerk within the time limited in the
notice to creditors and any claim not so filed is barred
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
forever. Any claimant to whom the personal representative
has mailed a notice pursuant to W.S. 2-7-205(a)(ii) shall
file his claim within three (3) months after the date of
first publication of the notice on the centralized
electronic notice system or in the newspaper, or before the
expiration of thirty (30) days after the mailing, whichever
date is later, and any claim not so filed is barred
forever. If only one (1) copy of a claim is filed, the
clerk shall make a duplicate and shall charge the claimant
a reasonable fee not to exceed two dollars ($2.00) per
page.

2-9-101. Petition to establish rights upon death of
owner of life estate or joint interest in realty; notice;
decree; recording and effect thereof.

If any person dies seized of a life estate which terminates
by reason of his death, or of an estate by the entireties,
or of an estate by joint tenancy or joint estate with
another, any person interested in the property or in the
title thereto may file in the district court of the county
in which the property is situated a verified petition
setting forth such facts. After two (2) weeks notice by
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
publication on the centralized electronic notice system or
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, or
otherwise as the court may order, the court shall hear the
petition and the evidence offered in support thereof. If
upon hearing it appears to the court that such life estate,
estate by entireties, estate by joint tenancy or joint
estate was created and vested, and that the life estate of
the deceased person terminated by reason of death, or that
the estate by entireties remains vested solely in the
surviving spouse by reason of death, or that the estate by
joint tenancy or joint estate remains vested solely in the
surviving joint tenant or joint tenants, the court shall so
decree. A certified copy of the decree shall be recorded in
the office of the county clerk and thereafter the decree
and the record thereof together with the record of the
instrument or instruments purporting to create the life
estate, estate by entireties, estate by joint tenancy or
joint estate, shall be presumptive evidence of the creation
of such estate, the termination thereof and the
survivorship of the estate by entireties, estates by joint
tenancy or joint estate.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
2-9-202. Application by petition two years after
death; fixing time for hearing; notice thereof; contents.

Upon filing the petition the court shall fix a time for
hearing the petition not less than thirty (30) days after
the filing thereof. Notice of the time and place of hearing
shall be given to all persons interested in the proceeding
including creditors, heirs and devisees, setting forth the
filing of the petition, the date of the supposed death of
the deceased, his place of residence, a description of the
real property or interest therein of which he died seized
or a description of the real property on which he had made
an entry but had not yet received patent and the interest
in the real estate of the petitioner. The notice shall be
published for four (4) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system prior to the hearing or once a
week in a newspaper of general circulation in the county
for four (4) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing, and
shall be mailed simultaneously with the first publication
to those persons designated in W.S. 2-7-205.

2-9-204. Procedure when applicant for public land
dies and patent issued to heirs.
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(b) Notice of the time and place for hearing the
petition shall be given by publishing notice thereof for
three (3) successive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system or at least once each week for three (3)
successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation
in the county and the mailing of true copies to all known
heirs of the deceased person at least ten (10) days prior
to the date fixed for the hearing. Proof of publication and
mailing shall be made to the court upon the hearing. Any
time before the date fixed for the hearing any person
interested in the lands as heir at law or devisee of the
decedent or as the grantee of any such heir at law or
devisee, may answer the petition and deny any of the
matters contained therein. At the time fixed for the
hearing or at such time thereafter as may be fixed by the
court, the court shall hear the proofs offered by
petitioner and any person answering the same, and shall
make a decree conformable to the proofs. The decree shall
have the same force and effect as decrees entered in
accordance with the provisions of the Code of Civil
Procedure.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
2-12-102. Publication of notice of hearing; service
on persons named in petition.

The clerk shall publish not less than twice During the ten
(10) days prior to the day appointed, a notice in some
newspaper published the clerk shall publish on the
centralized electronic notice system for ten (10)
consecutive days or not less than twice in some newspaper
published in the county, a notice stating that the petition
will be heard at the courtroom of the court at the time
appointed for the hearing. The clerk shall cause personal
service of the notice of hearing to be served upon all
persons named in the petition as heirs of the missing
person should he be deceased resident in the county, and
cause to be mailed by certified mail a copy of the notice
addressed to each of the supposed heirs at their address
shown in the petition. The court may direct further notice
of the filing of the petition be given in such manner and
to such persons as it may deem proper.

4-10-507. Limitation on action by creditors.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) Subject to the rights of persons dealing with a
fiduciary as provided in W.S. 4-10-1013, a creditor may
file a claim against the assets of the trust or commence a
judicial proceeding to contest the validity of a trust that
was revocable at the settlor's death within the earlier of:

(ii) One hundred twenty (120) days after the
first publication of a notice of the intent of the trustee
to have the property of the settlor distributed as
permitted under the terms of the trust. The notice shall be
published for two (2) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or once per week for two (2)
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county or counties where venue of the trust is properly
established as provided in W.S. 4-10-204; or

6-2-711. Asset forfeiture.

(e) If the court makes a preliminary order of
forfeiture of property, legal interests of persons other
than a party to the criminal action shall be determined,
subject to the following:

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(i) Following an entry of a preliminary order of
forfeiture, the state shall publish notice of the order for
two (2) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system or in a newspaper of general circulation in
the state once a week for two (2) weeks and shall provide
written notice by first class mail to the last known
address of any person who, after reasonable inquiry,
appears to be a potential owner or lien holder in the
property. The notice shall describe the forfeited property
and shall advise that parties with a potential interest in
the property may contest the forfeiture by filing a
petition with the court not later than sixty (60) days
after the notice is published on the centralized electronic
notice system, not later than sixty (60) days after the
date of the second published notice in a newspaper or, if
notice is mailed under this paragraph, not later than
thirty (30) days after mailing written notice;

8-1-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in the statutes unless the legislature
clearly specifies a different meaning or interpretation or
the context clearly requires a different meaning:
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(xxiii) "Centralized electronic notice system"
means the notice system established under W.S. 9-1-309.

9-1-303. Powers and duties; affixing seal to and
countersigning commissions and documents; certified copies
of acts; file of commissions and appointments; publication
of documents.

(g) The secretary of state shall create and maintain
a centralized electronic notice system as required by W.S.
9-1-309.

9-1-305. Fees; amounts; collection; exceptions.

(a) The secretary of state shall collect the
following fees in advance for:

(viii) Publishing a legal or public notice on
the centralized electronic notice system, a fee of not more
than ten dollars ($10.00).

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(c) When any document is delivered to the office of
the secretary of state for filing or submitted to the
secretary of state for publication on the centralized
electronic notice system, the secretary of state may refuse
the document for filing or publication if:

(i) The correct filing fee, publication fee, any
franchise tax, license fee, penalty or past due fees, taxes
or penalties required to be paid have not been paid; and

9-1-507. Examination of books of state institutions,
agencies and certain districts and entities; independent
audit authorized; guidelines.

(j) The director of the department of audit shall
certify:

(iv) To the board of county commissioners and to
the special district or entity described in W.S.
16-4-125(c) that receives funding from a municipality as
defined by W.S. 16-4-102(a)(xiv) or other entities
specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) by October 5 of each year
any special district or other entity in the county, no
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
matter how formed, that failed to comply with paragraph
(a)(vii) of this section. If, by November 30 of that same
year, the district or other entity has failed to comply
with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section, the director of
the department of audit shall file notice with the county
commissioners, the county treasurer and the county clerk.
The county commissioners shall place a public notice on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county indicating the special
district or other entity is in danger of being dissolved
due to failure to comply with the legal reporting
requirements. The county commissioners shall assess the
special district or other entity the cost of the public
notice. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
county treasurer shall withhold any further disbursements
of money to the district or other entity until the
department certifies to the county treasurer that the
district or other entity has complied with all reporting
requirements unless good cause for noncompliance is shown
to the director of the department of audit as described in
W.S. 9-1-510(b). If the special district or other entity
fails to file the required report on or before December 30
of that same year, the county commissioners shall seek to
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
dissolve the special district or other entity in accordance
with the process described by W.S. 22-29-401 et seq. This
paragraph shall apply in addition to any other provision
for dissolution in the principal act for a special district
or other entity. The county treasurer shall certify monthly
to the department of audit, the legislature and the
noncompliant district or entity the amount of disbursements
withheld until the noncompliant district or entity has come
into compliance.

9-4-814. Sale of collateral.

The state treasurer may sell any or all collateral that may
be pledged as security for the deposit of any state funds
in any depository under this act, at public or private
sale, whenever there shall be a failure or refusal upon the
part of any state depository, to pay over the funds, or any
part thereof or interest thereon, upon the demand or order
of the state treasurer, or his authorized deputy on the
state depository. Notice of the sale of collateral given as
security for deposits is required only if the state
treasurer finds that the collateral is illiquid. If notice
is required, it shall be given by publication for three (3)
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in
a newspaper of general circulation in the county or
counties in which real estate, in the case of mortgages, or
the local governments, in the case of local government
bonds, are located. When a sale of collateral is made by
the state treasurer, either at public or private sale, and
the collateral has been transferred by the chairman and
secretary of the board of deposits, the absolute ownership
of the collateral shall vest in the purchasers, upon the
payment of the purchase money to the state treasurer.
Should there be any surplus after paying the amount due the
state and expenses of sale, it shall be paid to the state
depository which made the pledge of the collateral.

9-4-818. Deposits by political subdivisions;
applications by, and approval of, banks; rate of interest;
defaults.

(b) If any depository defaults, the treasurer for the
local government may sell any or all collateral that is
pledged as security for the deposit of public funds in the
depository at public or private sale. Notice of the sale
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of the collateral is required only if the treasurer
determines that the collateral is illiquid. If notice is
required, it shall be given by publication on the
centralized electronic notice system for three (3)
consecutive weeks or in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county or counties in which real estate, in the case
of mortgages, or local governments, in the case of local
government bonds, are located, once each week for three (3)
consecutive weeks.

9-23-104. Qualification procedures; notice.

(b) For any professional services fee estimated by
the agency to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00),
the agency or the department shall give notice of the need
for professional services on the centralized electronic
notice system for two (2) consecutive weeks or in a
newspaper of general circulation in the state at least once
each week for two (2) consecutive weeks and prior to
initiation of selection procedures in accordance with W.S.
9-23-105. The agency or the department shall also give
notice of the need for professional services on the state
procurement website for not less than two (2) consecutive
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
weeks prior to initiation of selection procedures in
accordance with W.S. 9-23-105. All notifications under this
subsection shall contain a general description of the
proposed project, and shall indicate the procedures by
which interested firms may apply for consideration for a
contract to provide professional services for the proposed
project.

10-5-101. Powers of municipalities and counties
generally; rules and regulations.

(a) Municipal corporations and counties within the
state are authorized at the discretion of their governing
boards, acting either singly or jointly to:

(iv) Lease or let any portion of the area,
buildings or facilities to any private person or
corporation, upon terms deemed satisfactory. Notice shall
be given by publication for two (2) consecutive weeks on
the centralized electronic notice system or at least once a
week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published
in a town or county in which the airport is located when it
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
is proposed that all the area and total facilities are to
be leased;

11-5-104. District board of directors; appointment;
terms; vacancies; compensation and expenses.

(a) The county commissioners of each district shall
hold a public meeting for appointing a district board of
directors for the district. Prior to the meeting the county
commissioners shall establish the number of members of the
district board and shall establish district board member
areas. The county commissioners may seek the advice and
counsel of the members of the former district board for the
establishment of district board member areas. Each district
board member area shall be contiguous. Subject to W.S.
9-1-309 and 9-1-310, notice of the meeting shall be
advertised at least once in the designated official
newspaper of the county and posted on the county's official
website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) at least
twenty (20) days prior to the date of the meeting. The
notice shall solicit nominations for directors by petition
signed by at least ten (10) landowners to be submitted at
least five (5) days before the date of the meeting.
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

11-5-303. Program components; funding; rulemaking
authority; penalties.

(c) Any district which implements a special
management program under this article shall:

(v) At least ten (10) days before final approval
of the program by the district board, give notice to the
public on the centralized electronic notice system or in at
least one (1) newspaper of general circulation within the
county describing the special management program and
approximating the cost of the program. Notice shall also be
given through another medium if the board determines
additional publication is necessary to ensure sufficient
notice to the public.

11-6-203. Manner of calling annual meeting of
predator management districts; when held; election of
chairman and secretary.

(a) The annual meeting of each predator management
district shall be held within the first two (2) weeks of
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
December. Any person having paid predator fees in the
district within the preceding twelve (12) months shall be
entitled to one (1) vote at the annual meeting. Predator
fees paid in the name of a business entity may be
represented by one (1) representative of the entity paying
the fees, provided that the representative is authorized by
the entity to vote on behalf of the entity and has provided
proof of such written authorization. Proof of payment of
predator fees within the district shall only be through a
verified copy of a brand inspection certificate which
clearly shows that the fees have been paid and the date
upon which the fees were paid. No person paying fees within
the district shall be entitled to more than one (1) vote at
the annual meeting and no proxies shall be allowed. Each
board shall:

(ii) Publish a notice stating the time and place
of any meeting of the district and that directors of the
board representing livestock interests as provided in W.S.
11-6-202(a)(i) and (ii) shall be elected at the meeting.
Notice shall be published for not less than one (1) day on
the centralized electronic notice system ten (10) days
prior to the date of the meeting or once in a newspaper of
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
general circulation in the district ten (10) days prior to
the date of the meeting;

11-16-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(vi) "Due notice" for those provisions other
than election and referendum provisions, means notice
published at least twice, with an interval of six (6) days
between the two (2) publication dates, in a newspaper of
general circulation within the boundaries of the proposed
or organized district, for ten (10) consecutive days on the
centralized electronic notice system or by posting at five
(5) conspicuous places within the organized or proposed
district, such posting to include, where possible, posting
at public places where it may be customary to post notices
concerning county or municipal affairs generally. Except as
otherwise provided in this act, the notice of any hearing
required under this act shall fix the time, place and
purpose, which shall be not less than ten (10) or more than
fifteen (15) days after the first publication or first
posting of the notice. Any hearing held pursuant to such
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
notice may be adjourned from time to time without renewing
the notice for the adjourned dates. Notice for any election
or referendum required by this act shall be as specifically
provided in this act, or if not specifically provided in
this act, as required in the Special District Elections Act
of 1994;

11-16-134. Imposition of tax; vote of electors
required.

(c) Subject to the limitation of subsection (b) of
this section, the proposition to impose a tax under this
act shall be submitted on an election date authorized under
W.S. 22-21-103, or by mail ballot pursuant to W.S.
22-29-115 and 22-29-116. A notice of election shall be
given by the county clerk on the centralized electronic
notice system for thirty (30) consecutive days or in at
least one (1) newspaper of general circulation published in
the county wherein the election is to be held and shall
specify the object of the election. If the notice of
election is given in a newspaper, the notice shall be
published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day
period preceding the election. At the election the ballots
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
shall contain the words "for the conservation district tax"
and "against the conservation district tax". Upon the
initial submission of the conservation district tax, or any
renewal thereof, after July 1, 1995, the conservation
district board of supervisors shall choose one (1) of the
following options and the words of the chosen option shall
be clearly printed in the appropriate area on the election
ballot:

11-24-114. Publication of list of unclaimed estrays.

(a) The executive officer of the livestock board
shall annually, during the last week of December, send two
(2) lists of unclaimed estrays for which he has received
payments, to the county clerk of each county, who shall
post one (1) copy in a conspicuous place in the courthouse
and place one (1) copy on file in his office. The executive
officer shall also cause to be published on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county from which any estray included
in the list was shipped, a notice to the public that the
list of estrays is available for examination.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
11-31-212. Rabies control districts; establishment;
notice.

(b) The resolution creating the rabies control
district shall be published for two (2) successive weeks on
the centralized electronic notice system or at least once a
week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county wherein the district is located.

11-31-301. Public nuisance; notice; penalties; rules
and regulations; animal control districts and officers.

(b) Notice of such a declaration shall be published
on the centralized electronic notice system or in a
newspaper of general circulation within the county and
notices may be placed in appropriate locations. The notice
shall specify any regulations necessary and convenient for
animal control and shall state that:

11-33-103. Creation; landowners' petition; notice of
hearing.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
Within twenty (20) days after a petition has been filed,
the board of county commissioners shall set a date for
hearing the petition. Notice of the hearing shall be given
by posting notices in three (3) conspicuous places in the
proposed livestock district and by publication on the
centralized electronic notice system for two (2) weeks
previous to the hearing or for two (2) weeks previous to
the hearing in a newspaper published in the county nearest
the proposed livestock district.

11-35-109. Marketing orders; notice of issuance or
suspension; when effective.

Upon the issuance of any marketing order or any suspension,
amendment or termination thereof, a copy of the notice
shall be published on the centralized electronic notice
system or in the official newspaper of general circulation
published in each county of the state. No order of
suspension, amendment or termination is effective until
thirty (30) days after the date of posting and publication.
The director shall mail a copy of the notice to all persons
affected by the terms of the order, suspension, amendment
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
or termination who files in the office of the director a
written request for notice.

12-4-104. Publication of notice; grant or denial;
renewal preference; copy of application and notice to
division; judicial review.

(a) When an application for a license, permit,
renewal or any transfer of location or ownership thereof
has been filed with a licensing authority, the clerk shall
promptly prepare a notice of application and publish the
notice on the centralized electronic notice system for two
(2) consecutive weeks or in a newspaper of local
circulation once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks.
When a county is the licensing authority, the county clerk
shall also post the notice on the official website of the
county in the manner provided in W.S 18-3-516(f), subject
to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310. When a city or town is the
licensing authority, the city clerk shall also post the
notice on the city or town's official website if one
exists. The notice shall state that a named applicant has
applied for a license, permit, renewal or transfer thereof,
and that protests against the issuance, renewal or transfer
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of the license or permit will be heard at a designated
meeting of the licensing authority. Each applicant shall,
at the time of filing his application, pay the clerk an
amount sufficient to cover the costs of publishing notice.
Notices may be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF APPLICATION FOR A ....

Notice is hereby given that on the .... day of ....
(year) (name of applicant) filed an application for a ....
license (permit), in the office of the clerk of the city
(or town or county) of .... for the following building
(insert address) and protests, if any there be, against the
issuance (transfer or renewal) of the license (permit) will
be heard at the hour of ....M., on the .... day of ....
(year), in the (meeting place of the governing body).

Dated .... Signed ....

13-2-207. Procedure upon filing of articles of
incorporation, application and other information.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
Upon filing with the state banking commissioner the
articles of incorporation as required by W.S. 13-2-201 and
13-2-202, an application and any other information required
by the rules and regulations of the board, the state
banking commissioner shall notify the applicants in writing
within thirty (30) calendar days of any deficiency in the
required information or that the application has been
accepted for filing. When the state banking commissioner is
satisfied that all required information has been furnished,
he shall notify the chairman of the board who shall
establish a time and place within the county of the
proposed financial institution location for a public
hearing which shall be not less than sixty (60) days nor
more than one hundred twenty (120) days after notice from
the state banking commissioner that the application is in
order. Within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice of
the time and place of the public hearing, the applicant
shall cause notice of filing of the application and of the
hearing to be published at applicant's expense on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation within the county where the proposed
financial institution is to be located. Publication shall
be made for three (3) consecutive weeks before the hearing,
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
if published on the centralized electronic notice system,
or at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks
before the hearing, stating if published in a newspaper.
The publication shall include the proposed location of the
financial institution, the names of the proposed applicants
for a charter, the nature of the activities to be conducted
by the proposed institution and other information as the
board shall prescribe from time to time by rules and
regulations. The applicant shall furnish proof of
publication to the state banking commissioner not more than
ten (10) days prior to the hearing. The state banking
commissioner shall send notice of the hearing to state and
national banks, federal savings and loan associations and
other financial institutions in the state who have
requested notice from the state banking commissioner and to
the appropriate federal financial institution regulatory
authorities.

13-2-402. Election; term; vacancies; number.

(b) If the annual election of directors is not held
at the time designated an election may be held within sixty
(60) days thereafter following notice on the centralized
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
electronic notice system for three (3) consecutive weeks or
by publication in three (3) consecutive issues of a weekly
newspaper printed in the county in which the bank is
located, or if no newspaper is printed in the county then
in a newspaper of general circulation in the state.

13-2-702. Authorization; application; fee;
activities; examination; criteria.

(b) All applications for establishing and operating a
branch shall be filed with the commissioner and be
accompanied by a filing fee established by rule and
regulation of the commissioner. The application shall be
signed by the chief executive officer of the applicant bank
and contain and be accompanied by the following
information:

(iii) Certification of publication of notice of
the application for not less than one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system or at least once in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the
proposed branch will be located;

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
13-2-704. Closing of a branch.

No branch shall be closed unless the parent bank certifies
to the commissioner that all persons with an account at
that branch have been notified of the date of closure not
less than sixty (60) days before the date of closure and
that a notice indicating the branch will be closed will be
published on the centralized electronic notice system for
three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the calendar week in
which the date of closure will occur or in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the branch is
located at least weekly for three (3) consecutive weeks
prior to the calendar week in which the date of closure
will occur.

13-4-101. Change in place of business.

(c) The applicant shall publish notice of the hearing
for three (3) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or once a week for three (3)
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
all municipalities affected by the change. At the
conclusion of the hearing if the state banking commissioner
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
finds that a change of location is desirable and in the
best interests of the bank and the municipality to which
the bank is proposing to move, he shall grant a certificate
authorizing the change of location.

13-4-106. Approval of merger by stockholders.

(b) Notice of the meeting of the stockholders shall
be given by publication on the centralized electronic
notice system for three (3) successive weeks or in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
principal office of each merging bank is located, at least
once a week for three (3) successive weeks, and before the
date of the meeting. Notice of the meeting shall also be
given by mail, at least fifteen (15) days before the date
of the meeting, to each stockholder of record of each
merging bank at his address on the books of his bank, who
has not waived notice in writing. No notice by publication
need be given if written waivers are received from the
holders of two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding shares of
each class of voting stock. The notice shall state that
dissenting stockholders will be entitled to payment of the
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
value of only those shares which are voted against approval
of the plan.

13-4-107. Publication of merger notice.

Upon approval of a merger agreement by the stockholders of
each merging bank, the elements of the agreement shall be
incorporated in a notice of the proposed merger with the
effective date of the merger. The notice shall be published
for three (3) successive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or once each week for three (3)
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
each of the counties in which the merging banks are
located.

13-4-109. Conversion of national bank, federally
chartered savings bank, out-of-state state bank or state
savings and loan into state bank.

(c) Before issuance of a charter notice of a
conversion with its effective date shall be published for
three (3) successive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system or once each week for three (3) successive
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county
in which the financial institution is located.

13-4-604. Termination; effect on payments and notice.

(b) Before the conservator turns back the affairs of
the bank to its board of directors he shall give notice on
the centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper
of general circulation in the community in which the bank
is located. The notice shall state the date on which the
affairs of the bank will be returned to its board of
directors and that the provisions of W.S. 13-4-602 will not
be effective fifteen (15) days after that date. On the date
of the publication of the notice, the conservator shall
send to every depositor under W.S. 13-4-602 a copy of the
notice by registered mail addressed to his last known
address on the records of the bank and a notice to every
person making a deposit in the bank under W.S. 13-4-602
after the date of the newspaper publication and before the
affairs of the bank are returned to its directors.

13-4-701. Payment of stockholders.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) If the state banking commissioner has paid the
full amount of the claim to each depositor and creditor of
the bank whose claims have been allowed, has made provision
for unpaid deposits and has paid all the expenses of the
liquidation, he shall call a meeting of the stockholders of
the bank by giving notice for thirty (30) days on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper
published in the county in which the bank was located.

13-5-425. Establishment of trust company branches;
application; fee; activities; examination; criteria.

(b) All applications for establishing and operating a
branch shall be filed with the commissioner and be
accompanied by a filing fee established by rule of the
commissioner. The application shall be signed by the chief
executive officer of the applicant supervised trust company
and contain and be accompanied by the following
information:

(iii) Certification of publication of notice of
the application for not less than one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system or at least one (1)
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the proposed branch will be located;

13-5-502. Procedure upon filing of organizational
instrument, application and other information.

(b) Upon filing with the commissioner the
organizational instrument as required by W.S. 13-5-501, an
application and any other information required by the rules
and regulations of the board, the commissioner shall notify
the applicants in writing within thirty (30) calendar days
of any deficiency in the required information or that the
application has been accepted for filing. When the
commissioner is satisfied that all required information has
been furnished, he shall notify the chairman of the board
who shall establish a time and place for a public meeting
or hearing if the application is contested which shall be
not less than sixty (60) days nor more than one hundred
twenty (120) days after notice from the commissioner that
the application is in order. Within thirty (30) days after
receipt of notice of the time and place of the public
meeting or hearing, the applicant shall cause notice of
filing of the application and of the meeting or hearing to
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
be published at the applicant's expense on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county where the proposed public
trust company is to be located. Publication shall be made
for three (3) consecutive weeks before the hearing, if
published on the centralized electronic notice system, and
at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks before
the meeting, or hearing stating if published in a
newspaper. The publication shall state the proposed
location of the public trust company, the names of the
proposed applicants for a charter, the nature of the
activities to be conducted by the proposed institution and
other information as the commissioner shall prescribe by
rule. The applicant shall furnish proof of publication to
the commissioner not more than ten (10) days prior to the
public meeting or hearing.

13-5-519. Election; term; vacancies; number.

(b) If the annual election of directors or managers
is not held at the time designated, an election may be held
within sixty (60) days thereafter following notice by
publication for three (3) consecutive weeks on the
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
centralized electronic notice system or in three (3)
consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper printed in the
county in which the public trust company is located, or if
no newspaper is printed in the county then in a newspaper
of general circulation in the state.

13-12-112. Procedure upon filing application.

(b) Within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice
of the time and place of the public hearing, the applicants
shall cause notice of filing of the application and the
hearing to be published at the applicants' expense on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation within the county where the proposed
special purpose depository institution is to be located.
Publication shall be made for three (3) consecutive weeks
before the hearing, if published on the centralized
electronic notice system, and at least once a week for
three (3) consecutive weeks before the hearing, stating if
published in a newspaper. The publication shall state the
proposed location of the special purpose depository
institution, the names of the applicants for a charter, the
nature of the activities to be conducted by the proposed
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
institution and other information required by rule. The
applicants shall furnish proof of publication to the
commissioner not more than ten (10) days prior to the
hearing. The commissioner shall send notice of the hearing
to state and national banks, federal savings and loan
associations and other financial institutions in the state
and federal agencies who have requested notice from the
commissioner.

15-1-110. Minutes of meetings and titles of
ordinances passed to be published; exception; contents;
publication of salary information of specified officials
and employees.

(a) Except where publication is made on the
centralized electronic notice system pursuant to W.S.
9-1-309 and 9-1-310, the governing body of any city or town
shall designate a legal newspaper and publish once therein
the minutes of all regular and special meetings of the
governing body and the titles of all ordinances passed. If
a newspaper is not published in the city or town the
proceedings or ordinances shall be posted for at least ten
(10) days in the city or town clerk's office and in such
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
other places as the governing body determines. The clerk of
each city or town shall within twelve (12) days after
adjournment of every meeting, furnish the newspaper a copy
of the proceedings of the meeting. Except for salaries and
wages published under subsection (b) of this section, the
copy shall include any bill presented to the governing body
stating the amount of the bill, the amount allowed, the
purpose of the bill and the claimant. Claims for part-time
employees may be summarized by department without listing
each part-time employee. The newspaper shall publish the
copy of proceedings within nine (9) days after receipt.

15-1-112. Manner of disposing of municipal property;
when advertising and bids not necessary.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section and W.S. 15-1-113(a), before the sale of any
property of any city or town valued at five hundred dollars
($500.00) or more, an advertisement of the intended sale,
describing the property and the terms of the sale, shall be
published for three (3) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or at least once each
week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
general circulation in the community, announcing a public
auction or calling for sealed bids for purchase of the
property. The property shall be sold to the highest
responsible bidder, unless the governing body of the city
or town rejects all bids. The responsibility of the bidders
shall be determined by the governing body of the city or
town.

(b) Any city or town, upon terms the governing body
thereof determines, without advertising the sale or calling
for bids, and after a public hearing, notice of which shall
include the appraised value of all real properties involved
and notice of proposed terms of any contract with an
independent agency pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this
subsection and is published for three (3) consecutive weeks
on the centralized electronic notice system or at least
once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the
city or town is located, may:

15-1-113. Contracts for public improvements.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(b) The advertisement shall be published for two (2)
consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or on two (2) different occasions, at least seven
(7) days apart, in a newspaper having general circulation
in the city or town, or if a joint powers board in any city
or town which is a member of the board. The published
notice shall state the place, date and time when the bids
or proposals will be received and bids will be publicly
opened and the place where interested persons may obtain
complete specifications of work to be performed.

15-1-116. Ordinances; publication required;
exception; attestation; recodification or revision.

(a) Every ordinance before becoming effective shall
be published for not less than one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system or at least once in a
newspaper of general circulation, which maintains a
physical office at which advertisements are accepted and
which is open to the public during regularly set business
hours within the boundaries of the city or town. The
newspaper shall publish the ordinance shall be published
within nine (9) days from the date of receipt. If the
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
ordinance is not published on the centralized electronic
notice system and there is no such newspaper of general
circulation, the ordinance shall be posted for at least ten
(10) days in the city clerk's office and in such other
places as the governing body determines. Emergency
ordinances are effective upon proclamation of the mayor,
and as soon thereafter as is practicable they shall be
published and posted in the manner required of other
ordinances.

15-1-205. Application; hearing; appointment of
election inspectors; duties thereof; style of ballots.

(b) The inspectors shall:

(ii) Provide for a notice of the election which
shall:

(A) Be published for three (3) consecutive
weeks on the centralized electronic notice system or at
least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in some
newspaper published within the territory, and posted in
five (5) places within the territory, with the posting and
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
publication occurring not less than three (3) weeks prior
to the election;

15-1-206. Notice of election results; filing thereof;
completion date.

(a) If a majority of the ballots cast at the election
are in favor of incorporation, the county clerk,
immediately after the report has been filed in his office,
shall publish the result on the centralized electronic
notice system or in a newspaper published within the
county, or if there is none, the clerk shall post the
result in five (5) public places within the limits of the
proposed city or town. A copy of the notice with proof of
its publication or posting shall be filed in the office of
the county clerk with the other documents relating to the
incorporation.

15-1-405. Annexing territories; public hearing
required; notice thereof.

(b) The clerk shall give notice of the public hearing
by publishing a notice for not less than two (2) days on
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the centralized electronic notice system or at least twice
in a newspaper of general circulation in the territory
sought to be annexed. The first notice shall be given at
least fifteen (15) business days prior to the date of the
public hearing. The notice shall contain a location map
which includes identifiable landmarks and boundaries of the
area sought to be annexed and the area which will, as a
result of the annexation then be brought within one-half
(1/2) mile of the new corporate limits of the city, if it
has exercised the authority granted under W.S.
15-3-202(b)(ii). The notice shall include a summary of the
proposed annexation report prepared pursuant to W.S.
15-1-402(c). Upon written request to the clerk of the
annexing municipality, the clerk shall provide a legal
description of the area and the names of the persons owning
property within the area.

15-1-416. Landowner petition to exclude tract from
city or town; disposition thereof; exclusion of land for
highway purposes.

(c) The governing body may exclude from any city or
town land sufficient for the construction of state
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
highways. Notice of the intended action and the time and
place of public hearing for objections shall be published
for four (4) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing on the
centralized electronic notice system or once each week for
four (4) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing in a
newspaper of general circulation within the city or town.
No action may be taken by the governing body to exclude
land for highway purposes over the objection of any owner
of property to be excluded.

15-1-421. Municipal de-annexation.

(b) The petitioner shall be responsible for
publishing a public notice of the petition on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation in the affected municipality no more
than ten (10) days after filing the petition with the
municipal clerk. The notice shall also include a map
showing identifiable landmarks and boundaries.

15-1-602. Regulations; powers of governing body;
public hearing; notice.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(b) No regulation, restriction or boundary is
effective until after a public hearing. At least fifteen
(15) days prior to the hearing notice of the time and place
of the hearing shall be published on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper of general
circulation in the city or town.

15-2-204. Notice of receipts and expenditures;
contents.

(a) Immediately after the end of the fiscal year, the
governing body shall publish on the centralized electronic
notice system or in a newspaper, if one is published in the
town, or if there is none then by posting in three (3) or
more public places, an exhibit of the receipts and
expenditures specifying:

15-3-101. Population requirement; issuance of
proclamation; receipt as evidence.

If it is ascertained that any city or town has attained a
population of more than four thousand (4,000) inhabitants
and that fact is certified to the governor by the mayor of
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the city or town, attested by its seal, the governor, by
public proclamation, shall declare the city or town to be a
city of the first class. The proclamation shall be
published by the city for three (3) consecutive weeks on
the centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper
of general circulation in the city. A certified copy of
the proclamation shall be recorded in the office of the
county clerk of the county in which the city is situated.
The record of the proclamation shall be received as
evidence of the organization and corporate existence of the
city as a city of the first class in any court within the
state.

15-6-202. Initiative resolution; contents; acceptable
bids; notice to be published and mailed; caption.

(d) The resolution shall fix the time and place, when
and where the governing body will meet to consider any
remonstrances and objections to the proposed improvements,
and the time within which remonstrances and objections must
be filed with the city or town recorder. It shall direct
the recorder to give a fifteen (15) day notice to all legal
owners of record of the property liable to assessment for
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the proposed improvements by publishing the resolution on
the centralized electronic notice system or in one (1)
issue of some newspaper published in the city or town once
a week or more often. If notice is not published on the
centralized electronic notice system and no newspaper is
published within the city or town, notice may be published
in any newspaper of general circulation in the county once
a week or more often. In addition to the publication, a
copy of the resolution of intention shall be mailed,
postage prepaid, at least fifteen (15) days prior to the
hearing, to each legal owner of record of the property
within the proposed district.

15-6-301. General requirements; cooperation with
federal government.

(b) The improvements may be made under contracts, or
as a part of a contract, publicly let by the state or any
agency thereof, or by the city or town in the manner
provided in this section and W.S. 15-6-302, or the city or
town may make the improvements with its own equipment,
labor and materials, without contract, or any combination
of methods may be followed. If the improvements are to be
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
made by municipal contracts, the city clerk shall call for
bids by publishing a notice on the centralized electronic
notice system or in at least one (1) issue of some
newspaper published within the city or town or within the
county in which the city or town is located and in such
other papers as the governing body may provide in the
ordinance.

15-6-405. Assessments; roll; preparation and filing;
hearing; notice; action by governing body; objections;
amendments; certification.

(a) When an assessment roll for local improvements
has been prepared, it shall be filed with the clerk of the
city or town. The governing body shall then fix a date for
hearing upon the roll before it and direct the clerk to
give notice of the time and place of the hearing. Any
person may object to the roll in writing and file the
objections with the clerk on or before the date of the
hearing. At the time and place fixed and at such other
times to which the hearing may be continued, the governing
body shall sit as a board of equalization to consider the
roll. At the hearing or hearings, the governing body will
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
consider the objections or any part thereof, and correct,
revise, raise, lower, change or modify the roll or any part
thereof, or set it aside and order that the roll
assessments be made de novo, in a manner appearing just and
equitable, and then proceed to confirm the roll by
ordinance. The notice of the hearing shall be published for
two (2) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system or at least twice, by two (2) weekly
publications in a newspaper of general circulation in the
city or town. However, at least fifteen (15) days must
elapse between the date of the first publication and the
date fixed for the hearing.

15-6-410. Assessments; sale of property for
delinquency; generally.

(b) The treasurer shall give notice of such sales by
publishing a notice for three (3) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or once a week for
three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published within
the city or town, or if there is none, then in a newspaper
of general circulation within the county. The notice shall
contain a list of all property upon which assessments are
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
delinquent with the amount of the assessments, interest,
penalties and costs to date of sale, including the cost of
advertising the sale, together with the names of the owners
of the property, or the words "unknown owners," as they
appear upon the assessment roll. The notice shall include,
in addition to the legal description of the property, the
street address for the property used by the United States
postal service when available, or the street address used
by the county or municipality if available. The notice
shall specify the time and place of sale and that the
property described will be sold to satisfy the assessments,
interest, penalties and costs due upon it. All such sales
shall be made between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m.
and shall take place at the front door of the building in
which the governing body holds its sessions. The sale shall
be continued from day to day, omitting Sundays and legal
holidays, until all the property described in the
assessment roll on which any assessment or installment is
delinquent and unpaid is sold. All sales are public, and
each lot, tract or parcel of land, or other property shall
be sold separately in the order in which they appear upon
the assessment roll.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
15-6-417. Assessments; property held in trust; sale
thereof; procedure; notice.

(b) Any such sale shall be conducted only after
notice describing the property has been given and stating
that the city treasurer, on the day specified, will sell
the property at the front door of the building in which the
governing body holds its sessions, between the hours of
10:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m., and continue the sale from day to
day, or withdraw the property from sale after the first day
if he deems that the interests of the city or town so
require. The notice shall be published for not less than
five (5) days on the centralized electronic notice system
or at least five (5) times in a daily newspaper published
within the city or town, or if there is none, then at least
twice in any newspaper of general circulation in the
county. At least fifteen (15) days shall elapse between the
date of the last publication of the notice and the day the
property is sold.

15-6-418. Assessments; redemption of sold property;
procedure; notice; deed; results therefrom.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) Any property sold for an assessment is subject to
redemption by the former owner, or his grantee, mortgagee,
heir or other representative at any time within two (2)
years from the date of the sale, upon the payment to the
treasurer for the purchaser of the amount for which the
property was sold, with interest at the rate of twelve
percent (12%) per year, together with all taxes and special
assessments, interest, penalties, costs and other charges
thereon paid by the purchaser at or since the sale, with
like interest thereon. Unless written notice of taxes and
assessments subsequently paid, and the amount thereof, is
deposited with the city or town treasurer, property may be
redeemed without their inclusion. On any redemption, the
treasurer shall give to the redemptioner a certificate of
redemption and pay over the amount received to the
purchaser of the certificate of sale or his assigns. If
property is not redeemed within the period of two (2)
years, the treasurer, on demand of the purchaser or his
assigns and the surrender to him of the certificate of
sale, shall execute a deed for the property to the
purchaser or his assigns. No deed may be executed until the
holder of the certificate of sale has notified the owners
of the property that he holds the certificate and that he
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
will demand a deed therefor. The notice shall be given by
personal service upon the owners. If the owners are
nonresidents of the state or cannot be found within the
state after diligent search, the notice may be given by
publication on the centralized electronic notice system for
three (3) successive weeks or in a newspaper of general
circulation within the city or town once a week for three
(3) successive weeks. The notice and return thereof, with
the affidavit of the person, or in case of a city or town,
of the comptroller or clerk, claiming a deed, showing that
service was made, shall be filed with the treasurer. If
property is not redeemed within sixty (60) days after the
date of service, or the date of the first publication of
the notice, the holder of the certificate of sale is
entitled to a deed. The deed shall be executed only for the
property described in the certificate, and after payment of
all delinquent taxes and special assessments, or
installments and certificates of delinquency or other
certificates issued for special or local assessments,
whether levied, assessed or issued before or after the
issuance of the certificates of sale. Any deed may be
issued to any city or town for the face amount of the
certificate of sale, plus accrued interest, costs,
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
penalties and charges, and be held by the city or town
subject to the liens of general taxes and special
assessments.

15-6-435. Bonds; payment of principal and interest;
redemption call.

The city or town treasurer shall pay the principal and
interest on bonds issued out of the respective local
improvement funds from which they are payable. If there is
sufficient money in any local improvement fund over the
amount required for the payment of maturing principal and
interest to pay the principal of one (1) or more bonds,
which are subject to redemption on the next interest
payment date, the treasurer shall call in and pay those
bonds in numerical order. Notice of the call shall be made
by publication on the centralized electronic notice system
or in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or
town, or by mail to the holder, if known, not less than
fifteen (15) days prior to the date of call and shall state
that bonds no. .... (giving the serial number or numbers of
the bonds called) will be paid on the call day, and
interest on those bonds shall cease upon that date.
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

15-6-439. Payment of assessments; redemption from
liability; notice; bonds; use of sums.

The owner of any lot, tract or parcel of land or other
property charged with any assessments may redeem it from
all or any portion of the liability for the contract price
of the improvement by paying the entire assessment or any
portion thereof charged against the lot or parcel of land,
without interest, within thirty (30) days after notice to
him of the assessment unless the legal owners of record of
all of the property assessed in the district have waived
this thirty (30) day period. Unless the legal owners of
record of all property assessed in the district waive the
thirty (30) day cash payment period, the city or town
treasurer, as soon as the assessment roll has been placed
in his hands for collection, shall publish the notice on
the centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper
of general circulation within the city or town. The notice
shall be published for two (2) consecutive weeks, if notice
is published on the centralized electronic notice system,
or once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, and if notice
is published in a newspaper. The notice shall specify that
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the roll is in his hands for collection and that any
assessment thereon or any portion of any assessment may be
paid at any time within thirty (30) days from the date of
the first publication of the notice without penalty,
interest or costs. Bonds may be issued prior to the
expiration of the thirty (30) day period but only if the
legal owners of all of the property assessed in the
district have waived the thirty (30) day cash payment
period, and bonds may be issued at any time after the
expiration of the thirty (30) day period. The governing
body may provide that the owner of any lot or parcel of
land may redeem it from all liability for the unpaid amount
of the assessment at any time after the thirty (30) days,
if applicable, by paying all the installments of the
assessment remaining unpaid, with interest thereon to the
date of the maturity of the installment next falling due.
If any sum is paid as provided in this section, it shall be
paid to the city treasurer, or to the officer whose duty it
is to collect the assessments, and all sums so paid shall
be applied solely to the payment of the cost and expense of
the improvements or to the redemption of the bonds issued.

15-6-501. Contracts for construction.
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

Any first class city or any town having a population of
four thousand (4,000) or more may provide by ordinance for
letting to the lowest responsible bidder for any period not
exceeding one (1) year, as prescribed by the ordinance, a
contract for the construction, in accordance with
specifications prepared by the city engineer and approved
by the governing body, of all cement or concrete sidewalks
which the governing body may order constructed during the
term of the contract. The proposed ordinance shall be
published for not less than two (2) days on the centralized
electronic notice system or at least two (2) times in a
newspaper of general circulation within the city or town,
and written notice thereof shall be served in the manner
provided by Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure upon the owner
or owners of property abutting the sidewalks which have
then been ordered and which are then proposed to be ordered
to be constructed. The first publication of the ordinance
shall be made and written notices served not less than
thirty (30) days before the date for hearing objections.
Any owner of any lot or parcel of land or property to be
assessed for the cost of construction of the sidewalks then
ordered or proposed to be ordered to be constructed may
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
appear in person or by counsel at the hearing and show
cause, if any, why the sidewalks should not be constructed.
If objections are made to the construction of the sidewalks
by the owners or agents representing more than one-half
(1/2) of the total number of lineal feet frontage of all
property which would be assessed to defray the cost of the
sidewalks, the sidewalks shall not be constructed. The
contractor shall give bond for the performance of his
contract as required by the ordinance. The ordinance shall
provide that upon ordering the construction of any such
sidewalk the city engineer or the street commissioner shall
immediately give written notice thereof, served personally
on the owner or owners, or agents of the abutting property,
or by publication for four (4) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or once a week for a
period of four (4) weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation within the city or town, fully describing the
termini, course, width and character of the walk ordered.
The notice shall provide for a period of thirty (30) days
during which parties so desiring may construct the walk
abutting their property, and that all the walks so ordered
remaining unbuilt at the expiration of the thirty (30) days
from the date of service, or of the first publication,
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
shall be constructed by the contractor. The ordinance shall
also provide that at the expiration of the thirty (30) days
the city engineer or the street commissioner shall notify
the contractor to build the portions of the sidewalk
ordered that have not been built. The contractor shall
construct the sidewalk in accordance with the ordinance and
his contract within sixty (60) days after he is so
notified.

15-6-603. Creation; contents of resolution; notice;
hearing; installation and maintenance of posts.

(b) The proposed resolution shall be published for
not less than five (5) days on the centralized electronic
notice system or at least five (5) times in a daily
newspaper of general circulation within the city or town,
or in a weekly newspaper in four (4) issues, and written
notice thereof shall be served upon the owner or owners, or
agents of the abutting property. The first publication of
the resolution shall be made and the written notices served
not less than thirty (30) days before the date set for
hearing objections.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
15-6-604. Creation; assessment; contents; notice,
hearing and objections; final resolution.

(b) A notice signed by the city clerk stating that
the resolution levying the assessment to defray the cost of
installing the lighting system is on file in his office,
subject to inspection for a period of five (5) days, shall
be published for not less than one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system or at least once in a
newspaper of general circulation within the city or town,
and written notice thereof shall be served upon the owner
or owners or agents of the abutting property. The notice
shall state the time and place at which the governing body
will hear objections to the final adoption of the
resolution. The hearing shall not be less than five (5)
days after publication of the notice.

15-7-106. Bonds; notice; receiving bids; exception;
limitation; private sale.

(a) After any bonds to be issued for any of the
purposes set forth in this article, other than special
improvement bonds, have been approved by a vote of the
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
people, the governing body shall give notice by
advertisement for three (3) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper
published in the city or town, if there is one, and if not,
then in some newspaper of general circulation in the city
or town, and in any newspaper published in other places as
may be deemed expedient. The notice shall state that the
city or town will receive bids for the sale of the bonds
and shall give the time and place where bids will be
received and opened. No bonds may be sold for less than
their par value.

15-7-107. Bonds; tax; interest; sinking fund;
redemption.

A tax to be fixed by ordinance shall be levied each year to
pay the interest on the bonds and to create a sinking fund
for their redemption. The money that may be on hand at any
time belonging to the sinking fund, until there are bonds
redeemable, may be loaned or invested by the governing body
in any public securities of the state, any subdivision
thereof, or of the United States, and the interest that
accrues shall be added to the sinking fund. If at any time
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
after ten (10) years from the issue of the bonds the sum in
the sinking fund equals or exceeds five hundred dollars
($500.00), and from time to time thereafter when it
accrues, the city or town treasurer shall publish a notice
on the centralized electronic notice system or in a
newspaper in the city or town that, thirty (30) days from
the date of the notice, he will redeem the amount of bonds
then payable, giving their number and giving preference to
the oldest issue. If at the expiration of thirty (30) days
the holder of those bonds fails to present them for
payment, the interest thereon ceases, but the treasurer
shall redeem them on presentation. A copy of the notice
shall be sent to the bank designated as the place of
payment of the interest on the bonds.

15-7-113. Borrowing and issuance of bonds for
airports; notice; receiving bids.

If a majority of the votes are "for the bonds," the
governing body shall publish a notice in a newspaper of
general circulation in the city or town, and any other
newspapers published in other places as deemed expedient,
or on the centralized electronic notice system to the
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
effect that the city or town will receive bids for the sale
of the bonds and stating the time and place where bids will
be received and opened.

15-7-207. Election procedure; notice.

If the governing body of the city or town decides to submit
the question of the sale of the property to a vote of the
qualified electors, they shall publish, for a period of at
least three (3) weeks before the election on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation in the city or town, a notice
specifying the amount of the bid and the general terms and
conditions contained in the proposal. A copy of the notice
shall be posted for three (3) weeks immediately preceding
the election in three (3) public places in the city or
town.

15-7-303. Vacation from public use; hearing; notice;
contents; objections.

If the governing body considers it to be in the public
interest to vacate any public park or part thereof from the
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
public use to which it was dedicated, it shall set a time
and place for a public hearing upon the proposal to vacate.
Notice of the hearing shall be published for three (3)
consecutive weeks prior to the hearing on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper published in the
county in which the city or town is located, or if there is
no newspaper published in that county, then in a newspaper
published in this state and of general circulation in that
county. The notice shall contain a statement of the time,
place and purpose of the hearing, the reason for the
proposed vacation and shall provide that any person
objecting to the proposed vacation shall file his
objections with the city or town clerk in writing at least
twenty-four (24) hours before the time of the hearing.

15-9-109. Preliminary requirements for projects;
hearing; publication and contents of notice.

(b) A notice of the hearing shall be published on the
centralized electronic notice system for two (2) successive
weeks or in a newspaper having a general circulation in the
area of operation of the municipality for two (2)
successive weeks, with the last publication thereof to be
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
at least five (5) days prior to the hearing. The notice
shall:

15-9-116. Property acquired in project; disposition
to private persons; procedure; notice; proposals;
contracts.

(a) A municipality may:

(ii) By notice published for four (4)
consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or once each week for four (4) consecutive weeks in
a newspaper having a general circulation in the community,
prior to the execution of any contract to sell, lease or
otherwise transfer real property and prior to the delivery
of any instrument of conveyance with respect thereto under
the provisions of this section, invite proposals from and
make available all pertinent information to private
redevelopers or any persons interested in undertaking to
redevelop or rehabilitate an urban renewal area or any part
thereof. The notice shall:

15-9-124. Bonds; sale or exchange.
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

Bonds may be sold at not less than par at public sales held
after notice published prior to the sale on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper having a general
circulation in the area of operation and in any other
medium of publication as the municipality determines or may
be exchanged for other bonds on the basis of par. However,
the bonds may be sold to the federal government at a
private sale at not less than par. If less than all of the
authorized principal amount on the bonds is sold to the
federal government, the balance may be sold at private sale
at not less than par at an interest cost to the
municipality or not to exceed the interest cost to the
municipality of the portion of the bonds sold to the
federal government.

15-9-136. Agency; annual reports.

An agency authorized to transact business and exercise
powers under this chapter shall file with the local
governing body on or before May 31 of each year a report of
its activities for the preceding calendar year. The report
shall include a complete financial statement setting forth
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
its assets, liabilities, income and operating expenses as
of the end of that calendar year. At the time of filing the
report, the agency shall publish on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper of general
circulation in the community a notice to the effect that
the report has been filed with the municipality and is
available for inspection during business hours in the
office of the clerk of the municipality and in the office
of the agency.

15-9-208. Plan of development; procedure for
approval; public hearings; notice thereof; findings of
governing body.

(c) The governing body shall hold a public hearing on
a plan of development or substantial modification of an
approved plan of development after public notice by one (1)
publication during the week immediately preceding the
hearing, on the centralized electronic notice system or in
a newspaper having a general circulation in the
municipality. The notice shall describe the time, date,
place and purpose of the hearing, shall generally identify
the plan of development area covered by the plan and shall
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
outline the general scope of the development project under
consideration.

15-11-301. Forms of government authorized; procedure
for change.

(a) An incorporated city or town may adopt the
commission or city manager form of government or other
lawful form of government as follows:

(iv) When such petition is filed and determined
by the city clerk to be legally sufficient, the mayor shall
proclaim a special election on the question stating the
present form of government, the proposed new form of
government, and the time of the election. The proclamation
shall be published for four (4) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or at least once a
week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the city or town;

16-4-109. Budget hearings.

HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) A summary of the proposed budget shall be entered
into the minutes and the governing body shall publish the
summary at least one (1) week before the hearing date on
the centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper
having general circulation in which the municipality is
located, if there is one, otherwise by posting the notice
in three (3) conspicuous places within the municipality.

16-4-114. Emergency expenditures.

If the governing body determines an emergency exists and
the expenditure of money in excess of the general fund
budget is necessary, it may make the expenditures from
revenues available under W.S. 16-4-105(a)(ii) as reasonably
necessary to meet the emergency. Notice of the declaration
of emergency shall be published on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper of general
circulation in the municipality.

16-4-404. Types of meetings; notice; recess.

(b) Special meetings may be called by the presiding
officer of a governing body by giving verbal, electronic or
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
written notice, including notice on the centralized
electronic notice system as applicable, of the meeting to
each member of the governing body and to each newspaper of
general circulation, radio or television station requesting
the notice. The notice shall specify the time and place of
the special meeting and the business to be transacted and
shall be issued at least eight (8) hours prior to the
commencement of the meeting. No other business shall be
considered at a special meeting. Proof of delivery of
verbal notice to the newspaper of general circulation,
radio or television station may be made by affidavit of the
clerk or other employee or officer of the agency charged or
responsible for distribution of the notice of the meeting.

16-6-116. Payment to contractor; substantial
completion; final completion; required notices.

(a) When any public work is let by contract, the
public entity under whose direction or supervision the work
is being carried on and conducted shall:

(ii) Upon issuance of a certificate of
substantial completion, cause notice to be published on the
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
centralized electronic notice system for two (2)
consecutive weeks or in a newspaper of general circulation,
published nearest the point at which the work is being
carried on, once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, and
posted on the state procurement website or the public
entity's official website. The notice shall set forth in
substance that the public entity has accepted the work, or
designated portion thereof, as substantially complete
according to the contract and associated documents and that
the general contractor is entitled to payment as provided
in paragraph (iii) of this subsection upon the forty-first
day (and the notice shall specify the exact date) after the
notice was first published and posted. If the contract
provides for multiple substantial completions, this
paragraph shall apply to each substantial completion
designated in the contract;

16-10-105. Ordinance or resolution for construction;
required and authorized provisions.

(e) A governing body shall not fund a surface water
utility until the proposition to impose the means of
financing the surface water drainage utility has been
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
submitted to and adopted by the electors within the
proposed surface water drainage area under this subsection.
Upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the proposition to impose
the means of financing the surface water drainage utility
shall be submitted to the electors within the proposed
utility on an election date determined by the governing
body and authorized under W.S. 22-21-103.A notice of
election shall be given on the centralized electronic
notice system or in at least one (1) newspaper of general
circulation published in the county in which the election
is to be held or in the city or town if only a city wide or
town wide utility is proposed, and the notice shall specify
the proposed means of financing the surface water drainage
utility. At the election the ballots shall contain
appropriate language explaining the proposed means of
financing the surface water drainage utility. If the
proposition is adopted, the governing body may proceed to
issue revenue bonds or otherwise fund the surface water
drainage utility as specified in the ballot proposition. If
the proposition is defeated, a proposition to impose a
means of financing the surface water drainage utility shall
not again be submitted to the electors within the utility
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
before the next election date authorized under W.S.
22-21-103 and occurring not less than two (2) years after
the election at which the proposition was defeated.

17-10-112. Regular meetings; calling of special
meetings; notice of meetings.

In its bylaws each association shall provide for one (1) or
more regular meetings annually. The board of directors
shall have the right to call a special meeting at any time,
and ten percent (10%) of the members or stockholders may
file a petition stating the specific business to be brought
before the association, and demand a special meeting at any
time. Such meeting must thereupon be called by the board of
directors. Notice of all meetings, together with a
statement of the purposes thereof, shall be mailed to each
member at least twenty (20) days prior to the meeting.
Provided, however, that the bylaws may require instead that
such notice may be given by publication on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper of general
circulation, published at the principal place of business
of the association. Date of publication of such meeting is
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
to be at least twenty (20) days before the date of such
meeting.

17-16-141. Notice.

(a) Notice under this act shall be in writing unless
oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances. Notice
on the centralized electronic notice system or by
electronic transmission is written notice.

(b) Notice may be communicated in person; by
telephone, telegraph, teletype, or other form of wire or
wireless communication; or by mail or private carrier. If
these forms of personal notice are impracticable, notice
may be communicated on the centralized electronic notice
system or by a newspaper of general circulation in the area
where published; or by radio, television, or other form of
public broadcast communication.

17-16-1407. Other claims against dissolved
corporation.

(b) The notice shall:
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(i) Be published for one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system or one (1) time in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
dissolved corporation's principal office, or, if none in
this state, its registered office, is or was last located;

17-19-1408. Unknown claims against dissolved
corporation.

(b) The notice shall:

(i) Be published for one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system or one (1) time in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
dissolved corporation's principal office, or, if none in
this state, its registered office, is or was last located;

17-20-729. Amendment of bylaws.

(b) A cooperative utility shall provide notice of any
meeting of the board of directors at which an amendment
proposed under subsection (a) of this section is to be
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
voted upon at least thirty (30) days before the meeting.
The notice shall:

(iii) Be fair and reasonable. Fair and
reasonable notice includes, but is not limited to,
advertisement on the centralized electronic notice system
or in a newspaper of general circulation within the
cooperative utility's service area and direct mailings to
members such as in a bill or other communication.

17-29-704. Other claims against dissolved limited
liability company.

(b) The notice authorized by subsection (a) of this
section shall:

(i) Be published for not less than one (1) day
on the centralized electronic notice system or at least
once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
this state in which the dissolved limited liability
company's principal office is located or, if it has none in
this state, in the county in which the company's designated
office is or was last located;
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

17-30-903. Claims against terminated statutory
foundation.

(b) The notice authorized by subsection (a) of this
section shall:

(i) Be published for not less than one (1) day
on the centralized electronic notice system or at least
once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of
this state in which the principal office of the terminated
statutory foundation was located or, if the foundation does
not have a principal office in this state, in the county in
which the designated office of the foundation is or was
last located;

18-3-501. Composition; election for increasing the
number; term; quorum; election for districting; procedures.

(d) The proposition may be submitted at any general
election. A notice of election shall be given on the
centralized electronic notice system or in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
wherein the election is to be held and shall specify the
object of the election. If notice is given on the
centralized electronic notice system, the notice shall be
published for thirty (30) consecutive days preceding the
election. If notice is given in a newspaper, the notice
shall be published at least once each week for a thirty
(30) day period preceding the election. At the election the
ballots shall contain the words "for increasing the
membership of the board of county commissioners from three
(3) to five (5) members", and "against increasing the
membership of the board of county commissioners from three
(3) to five (5) members".

18-3-515. Preparation and publication of annual
statements.

Each board of county commissioners at their regular July
meeting shall request a statement of the receipts and
expenditures of the county during the preceding twelve (12)
months setting forth the source and amount of all receipts
and the purpose and the amount of all expenditures to be
prepared upon reconciliation of all accounts by the county
treasurer and county clerk, not later than September 30.
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
The statement shall be signed by the chairman and clerk of
the board and shall be posted on the county's designated
official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f)
and published at least once in the county's designated
official newspaper, subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310.

18-3-516. Publication of proceedings; publication of
salary information of certain officials and employees.

(a) Each board of county commissioners shall post a
comprehensive summary of the entire proceedings of all
regular and special meetings held by the board on the
county's official website in the manner provided in
subsection (f) of this section and publish the
comprehensive summary of the entire proceedings of all
regular and special meetings held by them one (1) time in
the county's designated official newspaper, subject to W.S.
9-1-309 and 9-1-310. The county clerk of each county shall
within twelve (12) working days after adjournment of every
meeting for which the next scheduled meeting will be called
to order in two (2) weeks time or less, or within eighteen
(18) working days after adjournment of every meeting for
which the next scheduled meeting will be called to order in
HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
more than two (2) weeks time, furnish the paper with a copy
of the proceedings, subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310.
Except for salaries and wages published under subsection
(b) of this section, the copy shall include any bill
presented to the board stating the amount of the bill, the
amount allowed, the purpose of the bill and the claimant.
Claims for part-time employees may be summarized by
department without listing each part-time employee. The
newspaper shall publish the copy of proceedings within nine
(9) days after receipt. The board shall post on its
official website, and if practicable publish, notice of the
time of all regular and special meetings.

(f) For all publications required by statute to be
posted on a county's official website, the publication
shall be posted at times required for publication in a
designated official newspaper, subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and
9-1-310. Until June 30, 2016, each board of county
commissioners shall cause to be published in the designated
official newspaper once per month, no less than twelve (12)
times per year, a general public notice pertaining to
access to county information. After June 30, 2016, this
100 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
general public notice shall be published at least once per
year.

18-3-518. Legal advertising; rates; type size
requirements; "daily newspaper"; "weekly newspaper."

(a) Legal advertising required by law to be published
in a newspaper shall be purchased at a rate not to exceed
the amount charged by a daily newspaper at the lowest rate
for display advertising or by a weekly newspaper at the
open local display advertising rate. Weekly newspapers
shall grant customary discounts or contractual rates to any
local government fulfilling the requirements necessary to
qualify for the discount or rate. Legal advertising in a
newspaper shall be in the same type size used by that
publisher in regular classified advertising columns,
provided that such type size shall be no larger than nine
(9) point type, with spacing between lines not to exceed
one-half (1/2) point leading.

18-3-519. Requirements as to newspaper publishing
legal notices.

101 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) The publication of any legal notice, printing or
advertising required by law and published in a newspaper is
without force or effect unless published in a newspaper
which has been regularly issued at least once each week for
a period of fifty-two (52) consecutive weeks prior to the
date of the first publication of the notice or
advertisement, has a paid circulation of at least five
hundred (500) and each page is not less than ten (10)
inches by twelve and one-half (12.5) inches in size.

18-3-524. Appointments to fill vacancies; term.

(a) Within twenty (20) days after the office of any
county commissioner becomes vacant the remaining members of
the board shall declare a vacancy to exist and immediately
give notice of the vacancy in writing to the chairman of
the county central committee of the political party which
the member whose office is vacant represented at the time
of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time
of his appointment if not elected to office. The chairman
of the county central committee shall within twenty (20)
days after receipt of the notice call a meeting of the
county central committee. At the meeting the committee
102 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
shall select three (3) persons qualified to fill the
vacancy and transmit the names to the board of county
commissioners. The board of county commissioners shall fill
the vacancy within twenty (20) days after receiving the
list from the county central committee by appointing one
(1) of the persons whose names are submitted by the county
central committee:

(ii) If the incumbent commissioner did not
represent any political party at the time of his election
or appointment, the board of county commissioners shall
publish on the centralized electronic notice system or in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county notice that
within twenty (20) days after publication any qualified
person may make application directly to the county
commissioners for appointment to fill the vacancy. Within
twenty (20) days after the application deadline the county
commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointment of one
(1) person qualified from those submitting applications.

18-3-525. Dissolution of boards; procedure.

103 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) Each board of county commissioners may dissolve
any board or district created under W.S. 18-11-101,
18-12-105 or chapter 9, article 1 of this title in
accordance with the following:

(ii) Not later than one hundred twenty (120)
days before the proposed dissolution, the board of county
commissioners shall publish for not less than two (2) days
on the centralized electronic notice system or not less
than two (2) times in the newspaper designated under W.S.
18-3-517 a plan to dissolve and terminate the board or
district previously created. The plan shall provide for, at
a minimum:

18-3-704. Establishment of lost corners.

(a) Whenever the location of any monument which marks
the corner of any tract or tracts of land is in dispute
between the owners of the adjoining lands, the monument
shall be established as follows:

(i) The county surveyor of the county in which
the corner is located or any registered land surveyor
104 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
employed by one of the landowners shall immediately give
notice in writing to all parties interested in the
establishment of the corner, giving at least thirty (30)
days notice and naming a day when he will make the
necessary surveys to establish or restore the corner. If
written notice cannot be made upon the owners or their
agents because of nonresidence, then the notice shall be
published for four (4) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or once each week for four (4)
consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county,
or if there is no newspaper published in the county then in
a newspaper of general circulation published nearest such
county;

18-4-105. Order of paying warrants; exception as to
Laramie and Albany counties.

All taxes and licenses are payable in money, and all
properly attested orders and warrants are entitled to
preference for payment according to date of presentation
and acceptance at the treasurer's office, the oldest date
to have preference. The treasurer shall not refuse to pay
any order or warrant because there are unpresented prior
105 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
orders or warrants if there is sufficient money in the
treasury to pay all prior orders or warrants, with interest
due thereon, as well as the order then presented. When the
total of payable, interest drawing unpresented orders,
amounts to five hundred dollars ($500.00), the treasurer
shall cause notice to be published on the centralized
electronic notice system for two (2) consecutive weeks or
the treasurer shall cause two (2) weekly notices to be
inserted in the official county newspaper. The notice shall
briefly describing describe them by numbers, date, amount
and in whose favor drawn, notifying the holders that they
will cease to draw interest ten (10) days after notice
begins on the centralized electronic notice system, if
notice is published on the centralized electronic notice
system, or ten (10) days after the second notice in a
newspaper, if notice is published in a newspaper. This
section shall not apply to Laramie and Albany counties.

18-4-306. Notice of intention to issue and sell.

The board shall give notice by posting on the county's
official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f)
106 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
and by publication in the county's designated official
newspaper, subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310.

18-4-405. Notice of intention to issue and sell.

The board of county commissioners shall give notice by
posting on the county's official website in the manner
provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication in the
county's designated official newspaper, subject to W.S.
9-1-309 and 9-1-310.

18-4-502. Funding indebtedness.

Any county desiring to fund, refund, pay or redeem any of
its outstanding indebtedness as provided by W.S. 18-4-501
may call its indebtedness to be redeemed by advertisement
for two (2) weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or for two (2) weeks in the official newspaper of
the county. The advertisement shall notify the holders that
interest will cease twenty (20) days after the date of
notice.

107 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
18-4-504. Notice of intention to issue and sell;
printing and engraving; execution and sale; disposition of
proceeds; redemption; records to be kept.

(a) Each board of county commissioners shall give
notice by publication on the centralized electronic notice
system or in some newspaper published in the county if
there be one otherwise by three (3) notices posted in the
county, one (1) of which is at the courthouse door, of its
intention to issue and negotiate the bonds and invite
bidders therefor. If notice is published by newspaper, the
notice shall also be published in a newspaper of general
circulation in Cheyenne.

18-5-202. Planning and zoning commission;
composition; residency requirements, terms and removal of
members; vacancies; rules; record; meetings to be public;
secretary; preparation and amendments; purpose;
certifications and hearing; amendments.

(b) The planning and zoning commission may prepare
and amend a comprehensive plan including zoning for
promoting the public health, safety, morals and general
108 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
welfare of the unincorporated areas of the county, and
certify the plan to the board of county commissioners.
Before certifying its plan or amendments thereto to the
board the commission shall hold at least one (1) public
hearing. Notice of the time and place of hearing shall be
given for not less than one (1) day on the centralized
electronic notice system not less than thirty (30) days
before the date of the hearing or by one (1) publication in
a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least
thirty (30) days before the date of the hearing. Any person
may petition the planning and zoning commission to amend
any zoning plan adopted under the provisions of W.S.
18-5-201 through 18-5-208.

(c) The planning and zoning commission shall prepare
recommendations to effectuate the planning and zoning
purposes and certify its recommendations to the board of
county commissioners. Before adopting the recommendations
the board shall hold at least one (1) public hearing.
Notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given for
not less than one (1) day on the centralized electronic
notice system not less than fourteen (14) days before the
date of the hearing or by one (1) publication in a
109 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
newspaper of general circulation in the county at least
fourteen (14) days before the date of the hearing. After
public hearing has been held, the board shall vote upon the
adoption of the planning or zoning recommendation. No
planning or zoning recommendation shall be adopted unless a
majority of the board votes in favor thereof.

18-5-503. Application.

(a) To obtain the permit required by W.S. 18-5-502,
the owner or developer of a facility shall submit an
application to the board of county commissioners. The
application shall:

(ii) Certify that notice of the proposed
facility will be published on the centralized electronic
notice system not less than twenty (20) days prior to the
public hearing required by W.S. 18-5-506 or in a newspaper
of general circulation in all counties in which the
facility will be located at least twenty (20) days prior to
the public hearing required by W.S. 18-5-506. The notice
shall include a brief summary of the facility, invite the
110 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
public to submit comments and identify the time and date of
the hearing;

18-6-101. Authority to acquire and dispose of sites
generally.

(b) If a courthouse or jail to be replaced is sold it
shall be sold at public auction to the highest bidder for
cash or on terms of payment as determined by the board and
in case of deferred payments, security is required
satisfactory to the board. No sale shall occur until public
notice has been given by posting on the county's official
website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by
publishing in the county's designated official newspaper
once a week for two (2) weeks, subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and
9-1-310. The notice shall specify the time, place and terms
of sale. All proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the
county treasury and only expended for a site or toward the
erection of a new building to replace the one sold.

18-6-201. Construction of jails; authority of county
commissioners; plans and specifications; maximum cost
111 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
permitted; call for bids; limitations applicable only when
costs paid from general fund.

(a) Whenever the board of county commissioners deems
it in the best interest of the county to have a jail
constructed they shall cause plans and specifications for a
jail to be prepared by a competent architect. After the
plans and specifications are prepared, reviewed and
critiqued by the sheriff and adopted by the board of county
commissioners they shall deposit them in the office of the
county clerk for the county where they shall be available
for the inspection of all persons. The board of county
commissioners shall give notice that they will receive
sealed proposals for the building of the jail according to
the plans and specifications by posting on the county's
official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f)
and by publication in the county's designated official
newspaper once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks,
subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310. The notices shall
state that the commissioners will until a specified day not
less than thirty (30) days from publication of the last
notice receive sealed proposals for the building of all or
112 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
part of the jail. Proposals shall be delivered to the
county clerk.

18-10-216. Form; notice; bids; sale.

If the proposal to issue bonds is approved, the board of
trustees may issue bonds in such form as they decide and
shall give notice by publication in some newspaper
published in the counties in which the district is located
and in some newspaper of general circulation in Cheyenne,
Wyoming, or on the centralized electronic notice system, of
its intention to issue and negotiate such bonds and to
invite bidders therefor. In no case shall the bonds be sold
for less than their full or par value and the accrued
interest thereon at the time of their delivery. The
trustees may reject any bids or sell the bonds at private
sale if they deem it for the best interest of the district.

18-12-105. Commencement of districts; districts to
provide emergency medical services.

(b) After July 1, 2023, as an alternative to forming
a district under subsection (a) of this section, a district
113 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
to provide emergency medical services under W.S.
18-12-112(a)(xxii) may be established by resolution of the
board of county commissioners. A resolution under this
subsection shall establish one (1) or more districts to
provide emergency medical services composed of any portion
of the county. Areas may be added to or subtracted from an
existing district by resolution of the board of county
commissioners. Not less than sixty (60) days before any
resolution pursuant to this subsection is signed, the board
of county commissioners shall hold a public hearing and
publish the proposed resolution, including the date and
time of the public hearing, on the centralized electronic
notice system or in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county. and The proposed resolution and hearing notice
shall also be published on the county's website. The board
of county commissioners shall submit the proposed
boundaries of the district to the county assessor and the
department of revenue for review for any conflict, overlap,
gap or other boundary issue. The assessor and the
department may make written comments thereon to the county
commissioners before the public hearing. The board of
county commissioners may dissolve a district established
under this subsection in accordance with W.S. 18-3-525.
114 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

18-12-117. Notice of resolution; hearing; objections.

(a) At the request of the board the county clerk
shall give notice, by advertisement for not less than one
(1) day on the centralized electronic notice system or once
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, to the
owners of the property to be assessed to provide:

18-15-106. Candidates to file petition; printing
names of candidates on ballot; publication of names.

(c) All names filed shall be printed on a ballot and
furnished to each elector at each polling place on the day
of election. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent a voter from writing in the name of any qualified
person on the ballot. The names of all persons filing as
candidates shall be published on the centralized electronic
notice system or in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county not later than the Saturday preceding the
election.

115 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
18-15-111. Fund; disposition of revenue; contract
requirements; expansion of the provision of services.

(d) Between July 1, 2023 and the date on which a
district is required to renew a mill levy in accordance
with this chapter, a district may designate and provide
additional senior citizen service district programs or
services under this chapter. The provision of additional
programs or services under this subsection shall be in
accordance with all of the following:

(i) Before providing the additional services or
programs, the district shall:

(C) Publish a description of the proposed
additional programs or services and the date, time and
place of the public hearing for not less than one (1) day
on the centralized electronic notice system or not less
than one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in
the district and not later than thirty (30) days before the
public hearing;

18-16-112. Notice of resolution; hearing; objections.
116 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(a) At the request of the board, the county clerk
shall give notice, by advertisement for not less than one
(1) day on the centralized electronic notice system or once
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, to the
owners of the property to be assessed to provide:

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:

(i) Prescribe and enforce rules, regulations and
policies for its own government and for the government of
the schools under its jurisdiction. Rules and regulations
shall be consistent with the laws of the state and rules
and regulations of the state board and the state
superintendent and shall be open to public inspection. Any
requirement to provide notice by publication in a newspaper
under this section may be met by publishing notice on the
centralized electronic notice system;

21-3-118. Duties of treasurer of school district.
117 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(a) The treasurer of each school district within the
state shall:

(iii) Render a statement of the finances of the
district at any time when required by the district board of
trustees; and cause a detailed report showing the sources
of revenue and the purposes for which moneys were expended
to be published at the close of each fiscal year on the
centralized electronic notice system or in some newspaper
of general circulation within the school district.

21-6-206. Duties of secretary.

The secretary shall keep an accurate record showing the
boundaries of all the districts in his county. The
secretary shall give each member one (1) day written notice
before each hearing or meeting and shall publish on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation within the county, notice of any
hearing or meeting at which a change in boundaries or
reorganization of a school district or combining of school
districts is to be considered. If notice is given on the
118 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
centralized electronic notice system, notice shall be
published for the two (2) consecutive weeks immediately
preceding the time set for the hearing or meeting. If
notice is given in a newspaper, notice shall be published
at least once each week for the two (2) weeks immediately
preceding the time set for the hearing or meeting.

21-6-207. Proposal to change boundaries, reorganize
or combine districts; criteria.

(b) Except as provided in this subsection, all
actions taken under this article shall conform to the
following criteria:

(vii) A public hearing or hearings shall be held
prior to the submission of a proposal by the district
boundary boards prior to the organization, reorganization,
boundary adjustment or combining of school districts to
receive and keep a record of testimony. Notice of each
public hearing shall be published on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper of general
circulation in the area. If notice is published on the
centralized electronic notice system, notice shall be
119 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
published for the two (2) weeks immediately preceding the
time set for each hearing. If notice is published in a
newspaper, notice shall be published at least once each
week for the two (2) weeks immediately preceding the time
set for each hearing. The notice shall contain a statement
of the time and place of the hearing and a brief summary of
its purpose. In addition, at least ten (10) days and not
more than fourteen (14) days before the hearing, a copy of
the notice shall be sent by mail to each school district
trustee residing in the area involved in the hearing. A
subcommittee composed of not less than three (3) members of
each district boundary board involved, may hold any hearing
required to be held under this paragraph.

21-13-103. Cancellation of unpaid warrants; remedy of
holders.

The treasurer of each school district shall on the first
Monday in April of each year cancel all unpaid warrants of
such school district which have been issued for a period
exceeding twelve (12) months, and shall at the same time
certify to the board of trustees of such school district
the number and amount of each warrant which he has
120 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
canceled. Such list of canceled warrants shall be entered
in the minutes of the board and published for not less than
one (1) day on the centralized electronic notice system or
at least once in a regular issue of a newspaper published
in the county, during the month in which such warrants were
canceled. Any person or persons holding a school district
warrant which has been canceled under the provisions of
this section, may present such warrant to the board of
trustees of such school district at any subsequent time,
not later than five (5) years after the date such warrant
was canceled. The said board of trustees shall issue to the
holder of such school district warrant, a new warrant
covering the amount due on the original warrant at the time
so canceled.

21-13-704. Sale of bonds generally.

If a proposed issue of bonds has been approved in the
election and issuance thereof has been authorized by the
school district board of trustees as provided by this
article, the bonds shall thereafter at one (1) time or from
time to time be sold at public or private sale. All costs
and expenses incident to the issue and sale of the bonds
121 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
If the bonds are to be sold at public sale, the school
district board of trustees shall give notice of sale on the
centralized electronic notice system or by at least one (1)
insertion of such notice in some newspaper of general
circulation in the district of its intention to sell the
bonds. The notice shall briefly describe the bonds and the
time and place where the sale thereof will take place. If
notice is given by newspaper and there is no newspaper of
general circulation in the district, the board may publish
the notice of sale in any newspaper published in the county
seat of any county in which the district is wholly or
partially located. Publication shall be made not less than
ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days prior to the
date designated for the sale of the bonds.

21-18-303. District board generally; powers; board
approved additional mill levy.

(b) In addition to the levy imposed under W.S.
21-18-304(a)(vii) and any levy imposed under W.S.
21-18-311(f), the community college district board may
approve up to one (1) additional mill levy on the assessed
122 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
value of the district for a period not to exceed two (2)
years for the regular support and operation of the college.
A determination by the board shall be made at a regular or
special meeting following a public hearing announced by the
board. Notice of intent to levy all or a portion of the
additional one (1) mill shall be published on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation within the district at least thirty
(30) days before the hearing date. Upon approval, the board
shall report the additional levy to the board of county
commissioners of each county within the district in the
same manner the necessary levy under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii)
is reported. Any tax imposed under this subsection may be
renewed by the board for additional two (2) year periods
subject to public hearing requirements specified under this
section and shall be levied, collected and distributed
separate from the tax imposed under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii)
and any additional levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-311(f).
Revenues collected under this subsection shall not be
restricted by the commission in any manner but shall be
identified in the biennial funding report of the college
under W.S. 21-18-205(b).

123 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
21-18-312. Formation of districts; initial elections.

(g) The county clerk of the county wherein the
proposed community college is to be located shall publish
at least one (1) notice of election on the centralized
electronic notice system or in a newspaper of general
circulation in the proposed community college district. The
publication shall be made no more than thirty (30) days nor
fewer than fifteen (15) days prior to the date set for the
election. The notice shall state that the purpose of the
election is to determine the question of creation of a
community college district with authority to levy a tax not
to exceed four (4) mills on the dollar of assessed
valuation of property located within the proposed district
and to elect members of the initial community college
district board.

(j) Nominations to the initial community college
district board are submitted on forms provided by the
county clerk of the county wherein the proposed community
college is to be located to be substantially the same as
those required for the nomination of a candidate in a
regular district board member election. All names so filed
124 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
shall be printed in alphabetical order, without designation
of party name or election subdistrict, on the ballot to be
furnished the electors at each polling place on the day of
the election by the county clerk of the county wherein the
proposed community college is to be located. The names of
all persons filing as candidates shall be published on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation in the proposed community college
district not later than the Saturday preceding the date of
the election. Nothing in this section prevents a voter
from writing the name of any qualified person on such
ballot.

21-18-314. Bond issues; general obligation bonds;
bond elections; bond tax levy.

(d) If the proposed issue of bonds is approved in the
election and issuance thereof is authorized by the
community college district board the bonds may be sold at
either public or private sale. All costs and expenses
incident to the issue and sale of the bonds made may be
paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds. If the
bonds are sold at public sale the community college
125 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
district board must give at least one (1) notice by
publication in some newspaper of general circulation in the
community college district, and also in some newspaper
published in the capital of this state, or on the
centralized electronic notice system, of its intention to
sell the bonds, briefly describing same, and the time and
place where the sale will take place. The publication
shall be made not less than fifteen (15) days, nor more
than thirty (30) days prior to the date designated for the
sale of the bonds.

21-20-110. Additional special school district tax;
election; limitations; special community college district
levy.

(b) Except as provided by subsection (h) of this
section, no additional tax shall be levied under this
section until a proposition to impose the levy is submitted
to a vote of the qualified electors of the member school
districts comprising the board and a majority of all votes
cast within the member districts vote in favor of imposing
the additional tax levy. The proposition to impose the
additional levy shall be submitted at an election held on a
126 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. The board shall
publish notice of the election on the centralized
electronic notice system or within a newspaper of general
circulation in the affected districts and the election
shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures
provided by W.S. 22-22-301 through 22-22-304. Each member
school district shall pay all costs incident to the
election within its district or if a concurrent election,
an equally proportioned share of the costs as determined by
the county clerk.

22-2-109. County clerk to publish proclamation.

(a) Between one hundred one (101) and ninety-one (91)
days before each primary election the county clerk in each
county shall publish at least once in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county or on the centralized
electronic notice system and post in the county clerk's
office and at the place where each municipality within the
county regularly holds its council meetings a proclamation
setting forth the date of the election, the offices to be
filled at the election including the terms of the offices,
the number of persons required by law to fill the offices,
127 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the filing deadline for the offices and the requirements
for filing statements of campaign contributions and
expenditures. The proclamation shall also include the
aforementioned information regarding offices to be filled
at the general election and any other pertinent primary
election information. In addition, the description of any
ballot proposition submitted to the voters of the state, a
political subdivision thereof, county or other district
shall be included.

(b) Between ninety (90) and seventy (70) days before
each general election, the county clerk in each county
shall publish at least once in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county or on the centralized electronic
notice system and post in the county clerk's office and at
the place where each municipality within the county
regularly holds its council meetings a proclamation setting
forth the following:

22-3-104. Methods of verification; signing oath; time
for proving eligibility; registration locations.

128 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(j) A county or city clerk may establish and maintain
registration facilities in a public area owned or occupied
by a political subdivision or governmental institution,
agency or entity, after giving not less than two (2) days
notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county or on the centralized electronic notice
system and by posting such notice in such clerk's office.
The requirements of subsection (h) of this section
regarding the place of registration shall not apply to a
person registering in accordance with this subsection.

22-4-104. County central committee organizational
meeting; notice of meetings.

The county central committee shall meet and organize under
the direction of the county chairman at the time and place
determined by the county chairman within thirty (30) days
after the term of its members begins. The county chairman
shall also publish a notice of all meetings of the county
central committee in a newspaper of general county
circulation or on the centralized electronic notice system
not less than two (2) days prior to a meeting.

129 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
22-4-105. County central committee odd year meeting;
notice; election of chairman, state committeeman and
committeewoman.

The county central committee shall meet at the county seat
each odd-numbered year at a time and place determined by
the county chairman. The county chairman shall publish
notice of the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation
within the county or on the centralized electronic notice
system not less than ten (10) days before this meeting. At
the meeting, the county central committee shall elect the
chairman of the county central committee, one (1) state
committeeman and one (1) state committeewoman and other
offices as provided by the party bylaws. A state political
party may provide in its rules for the election of
additional state committeemen and additional state
committeewomen. Neither the chairman, state committeeman or
state committeewoman need be members of the county central
committee.

22-6-105. Sample ballots; publication.

130 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
The officer providing the official ballots shall publish
sample ballots at least once in a newspaper of general
circulation in the district in which each primary and
general election is held or on the centralized electronic
notice system within two (2) weeks prior to the election.
This notice shall also state that the names of candidates
will be rotated on the official ballots and will not always
appear in the order indicated in the sample ballots.

22-7-102. Change in precinct boundary.

(a) A precinct boundary shall not be changed unless a
notice describing all proposed changes is posted on the
county's official website in the manner provided in W.S.
18-3-516(f) and published once a week for two (2)
consecutive weeks in the designated official newspaper of
the county, subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310. The board
shall also mail by certified mail return receipt requested
copy of this notice to the county chairman of each
political party in the county not later than fifteen (15)
days before the meeting at which the proposed changes will
be discussed. A proposed change in a precinct boundary may
131 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
be finalized by the board only at the designated meeting.
Each precinct shall be designated by number.

22-12-101. Designation and notice of polling places;
external location; change in location.

(a) Polling places shall be designated by the county
clerk, who shall publish their location at least once in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county or on the
centralized electronic notice system within two (2) weeks
prior to a statewide election. Polling places may be
located outside of the precinct if the board of county
commissioners determines and records in its minutes the
reasons that it is required by the public convenience.

(b) A polling place designated pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section and used in the 2014 general election
shall be not be changed unless a notice describing the
proposed change is posted on the county's official website
in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and published
once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in the designated
official newspaper of the county, subject to W.S. 9-1-309
and 9-1-310. The notice shall include the date and place of
132 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the county commissioners' meeting where the proposed change
will be discussed. The county clerk shall notify the county
chairman of each political party in the county not later
than fifteen (15) days before the meeting. A proposed
change in the location of a polling place may be adopted by
the county clerk at a meeting of the county commissioners
during which the proposed change is discussed.

22-16-122. Election declared null and void; special
election.

(g) Not more than fourteen (14) nor less than five
(5) days before the special election the county clerk shall
publish at least once in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county or on the centralized electronic notice
system a proclamation setting forth the date of the
election, the offices to be filled at the election
including the terms of the offices, the number of persons
required by law to fill the offices, the requirements for
filing statements of campaign contributions and
expenditures, and any other pertinent information.

133 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
22-18-111. Vacancies in other offices; temporary
appointments.

(a) Any vacancy in any other elective office in the
state except representative in congress or the board of
trustees of a school or community college district, shall
be filled by the governing body, or as otherwise provided
in this section, by appointment of a temporary successor.
The person appointed shall serve until a successor for the
remainder of the unexpired term is elected at the next
general election and takes office on the first Monday of
the following January. Provided, if a vacancy in a four
(4) year term of office occurs in the term's second or
subsequent years after the first day for filing an
application for nomination pursuant to W.S. 22-5-209, no
election to fill the vacancy shall be held and the
temporary successor appointed shall serve the remainder of
the unexpired term. The following apply:

(i) If a vacancy occurs in the office of United
States senator or in any state office other than the
governor, member of the state legislature, the office of
justice of the supreme court and the office of district
134 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
court judge, the governor shall immediately notify in
writing the chairman of the state central committee of the
political party which the last incumbent represented at the
time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the
time of his appointment if not elected to office. The
chairman shall call a meeting of the state central
committee to be held not later than fifteen (15) days after
he receives notice of the vacancy. At the meeting the
state central committee shall select and transmit to the
governor the names of three (3) persons qualified to hold
the office. Within five (5) days after receiving these
three (3) names, the governor shall fill the vacancy by
temporary appointment of one (1) of the three (3) to hold
the office. If the incumbent who has vacated office did
not represent a political party at the time of his
election, or at the time of his appointment if not elected
to office, the governor shall notify in writing the
chairman of all state central committees of parties
registered with the secretary of state. The state central
committees shall submit to the governor, within fifteen
(15) days after notice of the vacancy, the name of one (1)
person qualified to hold the office. The governor shall
also cause to be published in a newspaper of general
135 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
circulation in the state or on the centralized electronic
notice system, notice of the vacancy in office. Persons
qualified to hold the office who do not belong to a party
may, within fifteen (15) days after publication of the
vacancy in office, submit a petition signed by one hundred
(100) registered voters, seeking consideration for
appointment to the office. Within five (5) days after
receiving the names of persons qualified to hold the
office, the governor shall fill the vacancy by temporary
appointment to the office, from the names submitted or from
those petitioning for appointment;

(ii) If a vacancy occurs in a county elective
office, except as provided in W.S. 18-3-524, the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the vacancy
occurs shall immediately notify in writing the chairman of
the county central committee of the political party which
the last incumbent represented at the time of his election
under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his
appointment if not elected to office. The chairman shall
call a meeting of the county central committee to be held
not later than fifteen (15) days after he receives notice
of the vacancy. At the meeting the county central
136 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
committee shall select and transmit to the board of county
commissioners the names of three (3) persons qualified to
hold the office. Within five (5) days after receiving
these three (3) names, the board of county commissioners
shall fill the vacancy by appointment of one (1) of the
three (3) to hold the office. If the incumbent who has
vacated office did not represent a political party at the
time of his election, or at the time of his appointment if
not elected to office, the county commissioners shall
publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county
or on the centralized electronic notice system, notice that
within fifteen (15) days after publication any person
qualified to hold the office may make application directly
to the county commissioners for appointment to fill the
vacancy. Within twenty (20) days after the publication of
the vacancy in office the county commissioners shall fill
the vacancy by appointment of one (1) person qualified to
hold the office from those submitting applications;

(iii) If a vacancy occurs in the office of a
member of the state legislature:

137 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(C) If the incumbent who has vacated office
did not represent a political party at the time of his
election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his
appointment if not elected to office, the county
commissioners shall proceed in accordance with the
provisions of this subparagraph. The county commissioners
shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county or on the centralized electronic notice system,
notice that within fifteen (15) days after publication, any
person qualified to hold the office may make application
directly to the county commissioners for appointment to
fill the vacancy. Within twenty (20) days after
publication of the notice of the vacancy in office, the
county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointing
one (1) person qualified to hold the office from among
those submitting applications;

22-20-104. Publication by secretary of state;
supplemental publication by clerk.

(a) The secretary of state shall publish each
proposed amendment and a notice that it will be submitted
138 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
to the electors at the next general election, for the
following:

(i) Twelve (12) consecutive weeks prior the
election on the centralized electronic notice system; or

(ii) Once a week for at least twelve (12)
consecutive weeks prior to the election in a newspaper of
general circulation published in each county and, if
possible, once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks
within thirty (30) days prior to the election in one (1)
other newspaper of general circulation in each county.

(b) The clerk may supplement publication thereof by
radio or television broadcasts or both. The broadcasts
shall identify the proposed amendment or other question, by
letter and statement of purpose as prescribed by law, and
shall state the name of the newspaper in which the
published notice will appear or shall state that the notice
will be published on the centralized electronic notice
system and shall state the date on which it will appear.

139 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
22-21-104. Publication or posting of election notice;
contents.

Between one hundred one (101) and ninety-one (91) days
before a bond election held in conjunction with a primary
or other August election and between ninety (90) and
seventy (70) days before a bond election held in
conjunction with a May, general or other November election,
the county clerk shall publish notice of the election at
least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the
political subdivision or on the centralized electronic
notice system. If notice is not provided on the centralized
electronic notice system and there is no newspaper of
general circulation in the political subdivision, notice
shall be posted at each polling place in the political
subdivision between ninety (90) and seventy (70) days
before the election. Any notice of election hereunder shall
specify the name of the political subdivision, the date,
time and place of election, the question or questions to be
submitted, and the fact that only qualified electors of the
political subdivision may vote thereon. If a bond election
is being held within a political subdivision at the same
time and place as a regular or other election, the notice
140 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of bond election may, at the discretion of the county
clerk, be combined with and given in the same manner as the
notice of the regular or other election in such political
subdivision.

22-23-802. Proclamation; supplementation of
advertisement.

The date of a special election and the location of polling
places shall be proclaimed by the governing body of the
municipality not more than thirty (30) nor less than
fifteen (15) days before the special election. The
proclamation shall state the purpose of the election and
shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general
circulation in the municipality or for not less than two
(2) days on the centralized electronic notice system. The
advertisement may be supplemented by the county or
municipality as provided by W.S. 22-20-104(b).

22-24-318. Ballot proposition; procedure for placing
on ballot; publication requirements.

141 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(b) The ballot proposition for an initiative shall be
published by the secretary of state in a newspaper of
general circulation in the state in the newspaper edition
or on the centralized electronic notice system immediately
preceding the general election. Publication under this
subsection shall contain the text of the initiative ballot
and shall identify both a physical location and a web site
address or other electronic location where the entire text
of the initiative can be viewed.

22-24-415. Ballot proposition; procedure for placing
on ballot; publication requirements.

(b) The ballot proposition for a referendum shall be
published by the secretary of state in a newspaper of
general circulation in the state in the newspaper edition
or on the centralized electronic notice system immediately
preceding the general election. Publication under this
subsection shall contain the text of the referendum ballot
and shall identify both a physical location and a web site
address or other electronic location where the entire text
of the referendum can be viewed.

142 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
22-29-109. County commissioners' action on formation
petition.

(a) A petition for formation of a district shall be
filed with the county commissioners. Before the petition
is filed, the county assessor and the department of revenue
shall review, within sixty (60) days of receiving notice of
the petition, the boundaries of the proposed district for
any conflict, overlap, gap or other boundary issue and make
written comments thereon to be submitted with the petition.
Further, the petition shall be approved by any agency
required by the principal act to approve the petition. If
the petition satisfies all requirements of the principal
act, the county commissioners shall:

(ii) The county commissioners shall cause notice
of the hearing to be posted in at least three (3) public
places and published by two (2) insertions in a newspaper
of general circulation in that county or counties in which
all or any part of the district is proposed to be located
or published for not less than two (2) days on the
centralized electronic notice system. The last of the
143 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
notices shall be published at least ten (10) business days
prior to the hearing. The notice shall state:

22-29-110. County clerk to publish proclamation;
filing period.

(a) Between one hundred one (101) and ninety-one (91)
days before an organizational election held in conjunction
with a primary or other August election, between ninety
(90) and seventy (70) days before an organizational
election held in conjunction with a May, general, November
or mail ballot election held at any other time, the county
clerk shall publish at least once in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county in which all or part of the
proposed district is situated or for not less than one (1)
day on the centralized electronic notice system a
proclamation setting forth the date of the election, what
county clerk is the filing officer, the question of
formation, what offices are to be filled including the
terms of the offices, the filing period for the offices and
other pertinent election information. Minor errors in the
proclamation shall not invalidate the forthcoming election.

144 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(c) The county clerk shall publish a sample ballot
with the question of formation and candidates for directors
together with any other ballot proposition at least once in
a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which
all or part of the proposed district is located or for not
less than one (1) day on the centralized electronic notice
system, at least ten (10) business days prior to the
election.

22-29-112. Subsequent director elections.

(c) Not more than one hundred twenty (120) and not
less than one hundred (100) days before the election, the
secretary of the district shall publish at least once in a
newspaper of general circulation in each county in which
all or part of the district is situated or for not less
than one (1) day on the centralized electronic notice
system, a proclamation setting forth the date of the
election, what district officer is the filing officer, what
offices are to be elected and the terms of office, the
filing period for the offices and other pertinent election
information.

145 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(e) The name of all qualified candidates shall be
published in a newspaper of general circulation in each
county in which the district is located or on the
centralized electronic notice system not later than ten
(10) business days prior to the date of such election.

22-29-117. Change of district name.

(b) The directors shall not adopt a resolution for a
district name change without publishing notice once of the
proposed name change in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county or on the centralized electronic notice
system.

24-1-101. Public highways defined and established;
creation by adverse possession.

(a) On and after January 1, 1924, all roads within
this state shall be highways, which have been or may be
declared by law to be state or county highways. It shall be
the duty of the several boards of county commissioners,
within their respective counties, prior to said date, to
determine what, if any, such roads now or heretofore
146 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
traveled but not heretofore officially established and
recorded, are necessary or important for the public use as
permanent roads, and to cause such roads to be recorded, or
if need be laid out, established and recorded, and all
roads recorded as aforesaid, shall be highways. No other
roads, except roads located on federal public lands prior
to October, 1976 which provide access for a private
residence or agricultural operation shall be highways upon
acceptance by the board of county commissioners of the
county where the road is located, shall be highways unless
and until lawfully established as such by official
authority. Except, nothing contained herein shall be
construed as preventing the creation or establishment of a
public highway right-of-way with reference to state and
county highways under the common-law doctrines of adverse
possession or prescription either prior to or subsequent to
the enactment hereof. If any such board shall resolve the
creation or establishment of a public highway right-of-way
based upon the common-law doctrines of adverse possession
or prescription, it shall, following the filing of a plat
and accurate survey required in accordance with the terms
and provisions of W.S. 24-3-109, proceed with the
publication of the proposed road for three (3) successive
147 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
weeks on the centralized electronic notice system or for
three (3) successive weeks in three (3) successive issues
of some official newspaper published in the county, if any
such there be, and if no newspaper be published therein,
such notice shall be posted in at least three (3) public
places along the line of the proposed road, which notice
shall be exclusive of all other notices and may be in the
following form:

To all whom it may concern: The board of county
commissioners of .... county has resolved the creation and
establishment of a public highway right-of-way under the
common-law doctrine of prescription in that the road was
constructed or substantially maintained by the (either the
state or county) for general public use for a period of
(ten years or longer) said road commencing at .... in ....
county, Wyoming, running thence (here describe in general
terms the points and courses thereof), and terminating at
....

All objections thereto must be filed in writing with
the county clerk of said county before noon on the .... day
148 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of .... A.D., ...., or such road will be established
without reference to such objections.

.... County Clerk

Dated .... A.D.

24-1-132. Contracts for county, city and town bridge
work; bids; exception.

(e) The board of county commissioners of any county
or governing body of any city or town shall cause notices
of the contract to be let to be published for two (2)
consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation
within the state or for two (2) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system, and to take any other
means available to achieve as wide a notice as possible,
but in no case shall any letting of the contract be held
within fifteen (15) days of the last published notice.

24-3-110. Notice of location of road to be published
or posted; notice by mail to property owners.

149 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) Notice shall be published of the proposed
location or alteration of any road by posting on the
county's official website in the manner provided in W.S.
18-3-516(f) and by publication for two (2) successive weeks
in the designated official newspaper of the county, which
subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310. If notice is published
on the centralized electronic notice system, the notice
shall be published for two (2) successive weeks. The notice
may be in the following form:

To all to whom it may concern: The Board of County
Commissioners have decided to locate (or alter, as the case
may be) a road commencing at .... in .... County, Wyoming,
running thence (here describe in general terms the points
and courses thereof), and terminating at .... .

All objections thereto or claims for damages by reason
thereof must be filed in writing with the county clerk of
said county, before noon on the .... day of .... A.D. ....
or such road will be established (or altered) without
reference to such objections or claims for damages.

........... County Clerk
150 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

Dated .... A.D.

24-3-204. Notice of identification to be published.

(a) Prior to adoption of a resolution identifying
county roads in any area in the county, notice of the
proposed identification shall be posted on the county's
official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f)
and published for two (2) successive weeks in the
designated official newspaper of the county, subject to
W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310. If notice is published on the
centralized electronic notice system, the notice shall be
published for two (2) successive weeks. The notice shall be
in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF IDENTIFICATION OF COUNTY ROADS UNDER

W.S. 24-3-201 THROUGH 24-3-206

TO WHOM IT MAY CONCERN: The Board of County
Commissioners intends to identify county roads in the
following areas of .... (name of county) county under the
151 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
identification procedure contained in W.S. 24-3-201 through
24-3-206: (general description of areas described in the
map, i.e. USGS Quad map, section, township, range, etc.)

The only county roads in the township which shall
exist after this identification procedure are described as
follows:

(Road name, road number or petition number) .........

All other county roads within the area identified in
the map which are not described above shall be accordingly
vacated upon adoption of the resolution for identification.
All objections to or claims for damage by reason of this
identification procedure shall be filed in writing with the
county clerk of this county before 12:00 noon on the ....
day of .... (not less than thirty (30) days after
publication of the second notice) or the county roads will
be vacated as indicated without reference to the objections
or claims.

24-5-109. Notice of proposed location of road; form
of notice; publication; posting; registered mail.
152 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(a) Notice shall be published of the proposed
location of such road by posting on the county's official
website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by
publishing once weekly for two (2) successive weeks in the
designated official newspaper of the county, which subject
to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310. If notice is published on the
centralized electronic notice system, the notice shall be
published for two (2) successive weeks. The notice shall be
in the following form:

TO WHOM IT MAY CONCERN: The Board of the County
Commissioners have decided to locate a road commencing at
.... in .... County, Wyoming, running thence (here describe
in general terms the points and courses thereof), and
terminating at ..... All objections thereto or claims for
damages by reason thereof must be filed in writing with the
County Clerk of said county, before noon on the .... day of
...., (year), or such road will be established without
reference to such objections or claims for damages.

Dated .... County Clerk.............

153 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
24-8-103. Notice of intention to issue; sale to
public; rejection of bids.

The state treasurer shall give notice by publication in not
less than three (3) newspapers published in the state and
at least one (1) newspaper published outside the state, or
on the centralized electronic notice system, of his
intention to issue and negotiate bonds in all cases where
the same are not purchased out of state funds and the bonds
shall be sold at not less than the par value thereof to the
highest responsible bidder in response to such
advertisement. The state treasurer, however, may reject any
or all bids.

26-3-117. Suspension and revocation of certificate of
authority; order and notice of suspension.

(c) The commissioner shall publish notice of any
suspension, revocation or refusal to continue in a
newspaper in general circulation or on the centralized
electronic notice system.

154 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
26-31-109. Duties and powers of commissioner;
judicial review.

(a) The commissioner shall:

(iii) Require that the association notify the
insolvent insurer's insureds and any other interested
parties of the insolvency determination and of their rights
under this chapter. The notification shall be by mail at
their last known address, if available, but if sufficient
information for notification by mail is not available,
notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation
or on the centralized electronic notice system is
sufficient.

27-4-406. Wage rate to be filed with director and
mailed to employers and certain employees.

(b) Upon determining the prevailing hourly rate of
wages under subsection (a) of this section, the department
shall provide notice of its determination to:

155 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(i) The general public by publication in a
newspaper of general circulation within each locality for
which a prevailing wage rate is determined or on the
centralized electronic notice system; and

29-7-205. Sale at auction; publication or posting of
notice; contents thereof; new notice required in case of
adjournment; lien claimant may purchase; bill of sale to be
filed.

(a) A sale shall be made at public auction. The
lienholder shall first give ten (10) days notice in any
newspaper published in the county where the notice of lien
is filed or on the centralized electronic notice system. If
notice is not given on the centralized electronic notice
system and no newspaper is published in the county the
notice shall be posted for two (2) weeks in at least three
(3) public places in the county, one (1) of which shall be
at the front door of the courthouse. The notice shall:

30-2-306. State mining council; examinations for
certificates; duty as to examinations generally; meetings;
notice of meetings.
156 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

The state mining council shall examine applicants for
certification as mine foreman and mine examiner, and shall
issue certificates of competency to qualified applicants
who pass the examination. The council shall meet at least
annually in May at Rock Springs to examine applicants for
certificates and may meet at other times and places. The
council shall decide the day and place of all meetings. At
least fifteen (15) days notice of the place and date of
every meeting of the council held for the purpose of
examining applicants shall be given by publication in a
newspaper published in the area where the examination is to
be held or on the centralized electronic notice system, and
by posting copies of the published notice at all mines in
the vicinity of said place. A meeting held pursuant to
this section may be held in conjunction with regular
council meetings required by W.S. 30-2-303.

30-5-111. Rules of practice and procedure; hearings;
emergency orders; notice; public inspection.

(d) Notice of all hearings before the commission
shall be given by the commission by one (1) publication in
157 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
a newspaper of general circulation in Natrona county, and
by one (1) publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the land affected, or some
part thereof, is situated, or by publication for not less
than one (1) day on the centralized electronic notice
system. In all cases where there is an application for the
entry of a pooling order, the commission, in addition to
such publication notice, shall cause notice of the hearing
to be mailed to all owners whose interests are sought to be
pooled. In all cases where a complaint is made by the
commission, or by the state oil and gas supervisor or by
any party that any provision of this act, or any rule,
regulation or order of the commission is being violated,
notice of the hearing on such complaint shall be served on
the parties charged with such violation by any officer
authorized by law to serve summons in civil actions or by
an agent authorized and directed by the commission or its
secretary, in the same manner as is provided in the code of
civil procedure for service of process in civil actions in
the district courts of this state; proof of such service by
an officer shall be in the form provided by law with
respect to civil process and proof of such service by an
agent shall be by such agent's affidavit.
158 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

31-5-1212. Audit of traffic citation records; annual
summary of traffic violation notices.

(b) The fiscal officer shall publish or cause to be
published an annual summary of all traffic violation
notices issued by the traffic enforcement agency and the
dispositions thereof in at least one (1) local daily
newspaper of general circulation or for not less than one
(1) day on the centralized electronic notice system.

31-11-104. Sale of seized vehicles; disposition of
proceeds; proof of ownership after sale.

All vehicles seized under W.S. 31-11-111 remaining
unclaimed after ninety (90) days from the date of seizure,
shall be sold by the department or its authorized
representative, at public auction, to the highest bidder.
Notice of sale shall be published not less than ten (10)
days preceding the date of the sale, in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county where the vehicle is to
be sold or on the centralized electronic notice system,
giving a full description of the vehicle together with
159 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
engine or serial numbers or marks, if any. All expenses
incident to the sale and storage of the vehicle shall be
first paid from the receipts from the sale, and any residue
shall be paid by the department to the state treasurer for
credit to the general fund. Should any claimant prove
ownership of a vehicle sold by the department under this
act within six (6) months after the date of sale, the state
auditor shall upon proper proof of ownership approved by
the department, draw a warrant upon the state treasurer in
favor of the claimant for the amount which was paid into
the state treasury.

31-13-106. Mailing of notice of impoundment by a
police officer; notice by publication.

(b) The notice required by W.S. 31-13-104, if the
identity of the vehicle owner of record or lienholders of
record, if any, cannot be determined or if the registration
contains no address for the owner, shall be by one (1)
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county where the vehicle was abandoned or on the
centralized electronic notice system. Notice by publication
may contain multiple listings of abandoned vehicles. Any
160 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
notice shall be in compliance with the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section.

31-13-108. Disposition of abandoned vehicles
impounded by a police officer; payment of expenses;
extinguishment of liens.

(a) As to vehicles impounded by a police officer
having a fair market value of two thousand dollars
($2,000.00) or more after thirty (30) days have elapsed
from the date notice was given as provided in W.S.
31-13-106, the sheriff shall sell the vehicle and its
contents, if any, at public auction to the highest bidder
or cause an action to be filed pursuant to W.S.
31-13-112(e). Notice of the sale shall be published once in
a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
vehicle is impounded or for not less than one (1) day on
the centralized electronic notice system not less than ten
(10) days preceding the date of the sale, giving a full
description of the vehicle together with engine or serial
numbers or marks, if any, and the amount of money claimed
to be due thereon and the time and place of sale. All
expenses incident to the removal, preservation, custody,
161 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
sale and storage of the vehicle shall be paid and any
proceeds shall be distributed pursuant to W.S. 31-13-111.
After any vehicle has been sold under this section, the
former owner, any lienholder or person entitled to
possession of the vehicle has no further right, title,
claim or interest in or to the vehicle or its contents, and
all liens, encumbrances and security interests are
extinguished.

31-13-109. Disposition of vehicles left unattended or
unclaimed on private property and sold by the property
owner or through a court action.

(d) The owner or person in lawful control of the
property shall give a written notice of sale after the
thirty (30) day time period provided in subsection (a) of
this section expires but not less than ten (10) days
preceding the date of sale to the sheriff of the county in
which the vehicle is sold and by certified mail, return
receipt requested, to the owner and any lienholder of
record, if they are identified through reasonable efforts.
The owner or person in lawful control of the property shall
publish notice of the sale for two (2) consecutive weeks on
162 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the centralized electronic notice system or once per week
for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the vehicle is abandoned.
The notice shall contain the following:

31-18-707. Nonpayment of fees, taxes, penalties or
interest.

All fees under chapter 18 of title 31, diesel fuel taxes,
penalty or interest under title 39 or commercial vehicle
registration fees under title 31 become delinquent if not
paid as provided for by law from the date due. Delinquent
diesel fuel taxes, penalties, interest or commercial
vehicle registration fees are a lien on all motor vehicles
owned or operated in this state by the person liable for
payment of the taxes, penalties, interest or fees. If any
such taxes, penalties, interest or fees remain delinquent
for thirty (30) days or if any vehicle subject to the lien
is about to be removed from the state, the department or
its authorized enforcement agent may seize and sell the
vehicle subject to all existing liens and security
interests held by others, at public auction upon notice to
the owner and lienholder of record as provided by Rule 4 of
163 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, and upon four (4)
weeks notice of the sale in a newspaper published in the
counties in which the vehicle is titled and registered or
on the centralized electronic notice system. The department
may bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to
collect any delinquent fees or taxes, penalties and
interest under this section.

34-4-104. Publication and service of notices;
generally.

(a) Notice that the mortgage will be foreclosed by a
sale of the mortgaged premises, or some part of them, shall
be given by publishing the notice for four (4) consecutive
weeks on the centralized electronic notice system or in a
newspaper as provided in this subsection. If notice is
published in a newspaper, the notice shall be published for
four (4) consecutive weeks, at least once in each week, in
a newspaper printed in the county where the premises
included in the mortgage and intended to be sold, or some
part of them, are situated, if there be one; and if no
newspaper be printed in the county, then notice shall be
published in a paper printed in the state and of general
164 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
circulation in the county. Prior to first date of
publication, a copy of the notice shall be served by
certified mail with return receipt requested upon the
record owner, the person in possession of mortgaged
premises, if different than the record owner, and all
holders of recorded mortgages and liens subordinate to the
mortgage being foreclosed, which appear of record at least
twenty-five (25) days before the scheduled foreclosure
sale. The notice shall be sent to the last known address
for the addressee, which shall be the address set forth in
the mortgage or lien filed of record unless another address
has been recorded in the real estate records or has been
provided to the foreclosing mortgagee or lienholder. Proof
of compliance with this section shall be made by affidavit
of an authorized representative of the foreclosing
mortgagee or lienholder. A person or entity who acts in
reliance upon the affidavit without knowledge that the
representations contained therein are incorrect shall not
be liable to any person for so acting and may assume
without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the
affidavit.

34-4-109. Postponement of sale.
165 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

A foreclosure sale may be postponed from time to time by
inserting a notice of the postponement as soon as
practicable on the centralized electronic notice system or
in the newspaper in which the original advertisement was
published and continuing the publication until the time to
which the sale shall be postponed, at the expense of the
party requesting the postponement., provided that If the
original advertisement is published at least once a week,
over on the centralized electronic notice system, a
foreclosure sale shall only be postponed if the original
advertisement is published on the centralized electronic
notice system for at least four (4) consecutive weeks, and
the notice of postponement is published at least once a
week, over on the centralized electronic notice system for
two (2) consecutive weeks. If the original advertisement is
published in a newspaper, a foreclosure sale shall only be
postponed if the original advertisement is published in the
newspaper at least once a week, over four (4) consecutive
weeks, and the notice of postponement is published in the
newspaper at least once a week, over two (2) consecutive
weeks.

166 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
34-14-210. Extinguishment of claim for relief.

(b) A claim for relief with respect to a fraudulent
transfer or obligation under this act involving qualified
transfers to a qualified spendthrift trust as provided by
W.S. 4-10-510 through 4-10-515 or involving transfers to an
irrevocable discretionary trust, provided that the trustee
may only make discretionary distributions under W.S.
4-10-506(c), is extinguished unless an action is brought:

(ii) With respect to a creditor not known to the
settlor, one hundred twenty (120) days after the date on
which notice of the transfer is first published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the
settlor resides or on the centralized electronic notice
system, provided that the notice includes the information
required in paragraph (i) of this subsection;

34-23-102. Notice to lender.

(c) Notice to a lender by a museum shall be deemed
given under this chapter if sent by certified mail to the
lender's address, return receipt requested. If the lender's
167 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
address is not available to the museum or if proof of
receipt is not received by the museum, notice shall be by
publication for three (3) successive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or by publication at
least once a week for three (3) successive weeks in a
newspaper of general circulation in both the county in
which the museum is located and the county of the lender's
address, if any.

34-24-123. Public sale of abandoned property.

(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of
this section, the administrator, within three (3) years
after the receipt of abandoned property, shall sell it to
the highest bidder at public sale in whatever city in the
state affords in the judgment of the administrator the most
favorable market for the property involved. The
administrator may decline the highest bid and reoffer the
property for sale if in the judgment of the administrator
the bid is insufficient. If in the judgment of the
administrator the probable cost of sale exceeds the value
of the property, it need not be offered for sale. Any sale
held under this section shall be preceded by a single
168 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
publication of notice, at least three (3) weeks in advance
of sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the property is to be sold or on the
centralized electronic notice system.

34.1-7-210. Enforcement of warehouse's lien.

(b) A warehouse may enforce its lien on goods, other
than goods stored by a merchant in the course of its
business, only if the following requirements are satisfied:

(v) After the expiration of the time given in
the notification, an advertisement of the sale shall be
published for two (2) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or one (1) time per week for two
(2) weeks consecutively in a newspaper of general
circulation where the sale is to be held. The advertisement
shall include a description of the goods, the name of the
person on whose account the goods are being held, and the
time and place of the sale. The sale shall take place at
least fifteen (15) days after the first publication. If
advertisement of the sale is not published on the
centralized electronic notice system and there is no
169 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
newspaper of general circulation where the sale is to be
held, the advertisement shall be posted at least ten (10)
days before the sale in not fewer than six (6) conspicuous
places in the neighborhood of the proposed sale.

35-2-340. Preparation and submission to surgeon
general; notice and hearing prerequisite to submission;
publication upon approval; subsequent modifications.

The commissioner shall prepare and submit to the surgeon
general a state plan which shall include the hospital and
medical facilities construction program developed under
W.S. 35-2-320 through 35-2-322 and which shall provide for
the establishment, administration, and operation of the
hospital and medical facilities construction activities in
accordance with the requirements of the federal act and
regulations thereunder. The commissioner shall, prior to
the submission of such plan to the surgeon general, give
adequate publicity to a general description of all the
provisions proposed to be included therein, and hold a
public hearing at which all persons or organizations with a
legitimate interest in such plan may be given an
opportunity to express their views. After approval of the
170 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
plan by the surgeon general, the commissioner shall publish
a general description of the provisions thereof in at least
one (1) newspaper having general circulation in each county
in the state or on the centralized electronic notice
system, and shall make the plan, or a copy thereof,
available upon request to all interested persons or
organizations. The commissioner shall from time to time
review the hospital and medical facilities construction
program and submit to the surgeon general any modifications
thereof which he may find necessary and may submit to the
surgeon general such modifications of the state plan, not
inconsistent with the requirements of the federal act, as
he may deem advisable.

35-2-417. General obligation coupon bonds; issuance,
form, notice, value, rejection of bids, and private sale.

If the proposal to issue said bonds shall be approved, the
board of trustees may issue such bonds in such form as the
board may direct and shall give notice by publication in
some newspaper published in the counties in which said
district is located and in some newspaper of general
circulation in the capital of this state or on the
171 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
centralized electronic notice system, of its intention to
issue and negotiate such bonds, and to invite bidders
therefor; provided that in no case shall such bonds be sold
for less than their full or par value and the accrued
interest thereon at the time of their delivery. And the
said trustees are authorized to reject any bids, and to
sell said bonds at private sale, if they deem it for the
best interests of the district.

35-2-709. Bond issue.

(b) If the proposal to issue bonds is approved, the
board of trustees may issue bonds in such form as the board
directs, provided any bonds issued under this article shall
be in registered or bearer form and shall otherwise comply
with W.S. 16-5-501 through 16-5-504. The board of trustees
shall give notice by publication in some newspaper
published in the counties in which the district is located
or on the centralized electronic notice system of its
intention to issue and negotiate the bonds and to invite
bidders therefor. In no case shall the bonds be sold for
less than their full or par value and the accrued interest
thereon at the time of their delivery. The trustees are
172 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
authorized to reject any bids, and to sell the bonds at
private sale, if they deem it for the best interests of the
district.

35-3-105. Election and compensation of clerk;
employment of engineer; ordinances, rules and regulations;
publication of proceedings.

The board of trustees shall elect one (1) of their members
clerk and have the power to appoint, employ and pay an
engineer, who shall be removable at pleasure. The clerk may
be paid not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) per
year by said board. The board shall have power to pass all
necessary ordinances, orders, rules and regulations for the
necessary conduct of its business and to carry into effect
the objects for which such sanitary and improvement
district is formed. Immediately after each regular and
special meeting of said board, it shall cause to be
published in one (1) newspaper of general circulation in
the district or on the centralized electronic notice
system, a brief statement of its proceedings, including an
itemized list of bills and claims allowed, specifying the
amount of each, to whom paid and for what purpose;
173 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
provided, no publication shall be required unless the same
can be done at an expense not exceeding one-third of the
rate for publication of legal notices.

35-3-121. Bonds; objections to issuance; submission
of question to voters; issuance upon favorable vote; rate
of interest.

If the electors of the district, equal in number to forty
percent (40%) of the electors of the district voting at the
last general state election, file written objections to the
proposed issuance of the bonds with the clerk of the board
of trustees within twenty (20) days after the first
publication of notice, the board of trustees shall submit
the proposition of issuing the bonds to the electors of the
district at an election on a date as determined by the
board of county commissioners and authorized under W.S.
22-21-103, notice of which shall be given by publication in
a legal newspaper published or of general circulation in
the district three (3) consecutive weeks or on the
centralized electronic notice system for three (3)
consecutive weeks. If a majority of the qualified electors
of the district, voting upon the proposition, vote in favor
174 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of issuing bonds, the board of trustees may issue and sell
bonds and, if revenue bonds are issued, pledge for the
payment of same the revenues and earnings of the
improvements as proposed in the notice, and enter into
contracts in connection therewith as may be necessary or
proper. The bonds shall draw interest from and after the
date of the issuance thereof, at a rate determined by the
board. In the event the electors fail to approve the
proposition by majority vote, the proposition shall not be
again submitted to the electors for their consideration
until five (5) months have elapsed from the date of the
election.

35-3-124. Preparation of plans and specifications for
improvement; estimate of cost; notice required before
adoption; information to be shown in notice.

(c) Such notice shall be signed by the clerk of the
board of trustees and be published three (3) consecutive
weeks in a legal newspaper published or of general
circulation in the district or published on the centralized
electronic notice system for three (3) consecutive weeks.

175 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
35-8-212. Authority to declare abandoned unoccupied
lots; procedure; resale.

Any city, town or special cemetery district may declare
abandoned the ownership of any unoccupied lots or parcels
of land in municipally owned cemeteries, created under and
by virtue of W.S. 35-8-201 through 35-8-211, inclusive, or
any special cemetery district whenever there has been no
contact with or knowledge of the owners, heirs, or assigns,
as the case may be, of such lots or parcels for more than
twenty-five (25) years. Prior to declaring such
abandonment, notice shall be served by registered mail at
the last known address of such owner, heirs, or assigns. In
the event that the address cannot be ascertained, notice
shall be given by one (1) publication in the official
newspaper of the municipality or special cemetery district
in which the cemetery is located or on the centralized
electronic notice system. Said notice shall allow thirty
(30) days for the owner, heirs, or assigns to advise the
city or town or special cemetery district of his identity
and address; and if he does so, the city or town or special
cemetery district shall not declare the abandonment. Upon
the failure of the owner, heirs, or assigns to so
176 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
communicate with the city or town, it may by resolution
declare such lots or parcels abandoned. Thereafter, it may
resell such lots or parcels, but shall place in trust an
amount of money equivalent to the original selling price of
such lots or parcels for payment to the owner, heirs, or
assigns. Said trust fund shall be placed in legal
investments, and the interest received therefrom shall
annually be deposited to the city's or town's general fund
or the general fund of the special cemetery district. Money
received from the resale of such lots and parcels and
deposited in said trust fund may be withdrawn by the cities
or towns or the special cemetery district and placed in
their general fund if not claimed by the owner, heirs, or
assigns within twenty-five (25) years after being so
deposited. So long as such lots or parcels remain unsold,
the owners, heirs, or assigns may reclaim them by
identifying themselves and establishing their right to such
lots or parcels.

35-8-318. Bond issue; issuance; form; advertising for
bidders; sale.

177 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
If the proposal to issue said bonds shall be approved, the
board of trustees may issue such bonds in such form as the
board may direct and shall give notice by publication in
some newspaper published in the counties in which said
district is located and in some newspaper of general
circulation in the capital of this state of its intention
to issue and negotiate such bonds, or on the centralized
electronic notice system, and to invite bidders therefor;
provided that in no case shall such bonds be sold for less
than their full or par value and the accrued interest
thereon at the time of their delivery. And the said
trustees are authorized to reject any bids, and to sell
said bonds at private sale, if they deem it for the best
interests of the district.

35-9-206. Issuance of bonds; notice; bids.

If the proposal to issue said bonds shall be approved, the
board of directors must issue such bonds in such form as
the board may direct and shall give notice by publication
in some newspaper published in the counties in which said
district is located and in some newspaper of general
circulation in the capital of the state of its intention to
178 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
issue and negotiate such bonds, or on the centralized
electronic notice system, and to invite bidders therefor;
provided that in no case shall such bonds be sold for less
than their full or par value and the accrued interest
thereon at the time of their delivery. And the said
trustees are authorized to reject any bids, and to sell
said bonds at private sale, if they deem it for the best
interests of the district.

35-11-313. Carbon sequestration; permit requirements.

(f) The administrator of the water quality division
of the department of environmental quality, after receiving
public comment and after consultation with the state
geologist, the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission
and the advisory board created under this act, shall
recommend to the director rules, regulations and standards
for:

(ii) Requirements for the content of
applications for geologic sequestration permits. Such
applications shall include:

179 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(N) Proof of notice to surface owners,
mineral claimants, mineral owners, lessees and other owners
of record of subsurface interests as to the contents of
such notice. Notice requirements shall at a minimum
require:

(I) The publishing of notice of the
application on the centralized electronic notice system for
four (4) consecutive weeks or in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county of the proposed operation at
weekly intervals for four (4) consecutive weeks;

35-11-406. Application for permit; generally; denial;
limitations.

(g) After the application is determined complete, the
applicant shall publish a notice of the filing of the
application on the centralized electronic notice system for
two (2) consecutive weeks or once each week for two (2)
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
the locality of the proposed mining site.

180 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(j) The applicant shall cause notice of the
application to be published on the centralized electronic
notice system for four (4) consecutive weeks commencing
within fifteen (15) days after being notified by the
administrator or in a newspaper of general circulation in
the locality of the proposed mining site once a week for
four (4) consecutive weeks commencing within fifteen (15)
days after being notified by the administrator. The notice
shall contain information regarding the identity of the
applicant, the location of the proposed operation, the
proposed dates of commencement and completion of the
operation, the proposed future use of the affected land,
the location at which information about the application may
be obtained, and the location and final date for filing
objections to the application. For initial applications or
additions of new lands the applicant shall also mail a copy
of the notice within five (5) days after first publication
to all surface owners of record of the land within the
permit area, to surface owners of record of immediately
adjacent lands, and to any surface owners within one-half
(1/2) mile of the proposed mining site. The applicant shall
mail a copy of the application mining plan map within five
(5) days after first publication to the Wyoming oil and gas
181 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
commission. Proof of notice and sworn statement of mailing
shall be attached to and become part of the application.

(p) The following objection procedure shall apply to
applications for mining permits for coal:

(ii) If an informal conference is requested by
the applicant or objector, the director shall hold the
informal conference in the locality of the proposed
operation within thirty (30) days after the final date for
filing objections under paragraph (i) of this subsection
unless a different period is stipulated to by the parties.
The director shall publish notice of the time, date and
location of the informal conference in a newspaper of
general circulation in the locality of the proposed
operation or on the centralized electronic notice system at
least two (2) weeks before the date of the informal
conference;

35-11-415. Duties of operator.

182 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(b) The operator, pursuant to an approved surface
mining permit and mining plan and reclamation plan, or any
approved revisions thereto, shall:

(xi) For surface coal mining operations, insure
that explosives are used only in accordance with existing
state and federal law and the rules and regulations
promulgated by the council, which shall include but are not
limited to provisions to:

(A) Provide adequate advance written notice
to local governments and residents who might be affected by
the use of these explosives by publication of the planned
blasting schedule in a newspaper of general circulation in
the locality or on the centralized electronic notice system
and by mailing a copy of the proposed blasting schedule to
every resident within one-half (1/2) mile of the proposed
blasting site and by providing daily notice to the resident
or occupiers in these areas prior to any blasting;

35-11-502. Solid waste management facilities permits;
term; renewals.

183 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(g) After the application is determined complete, the
applicant shall give written notice of the application to
the county where the applicant plans to locate the facility
and to any municipalities which may be affected by the
facility. The applicant shall simultaneously cause to be
published for two (2) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or once a week for two (2)
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
within the county where the applicant plans to locate the
facility, notice of the proposed location, method and
length of operation, and such other information as the
council may require by rule and regulation. In addition,
the council may by rule require an applicant for a proposed
permit or for amendment to an existing permit to notify
other affected persons of the application and any other
information required by the council.

(j) The applicant shall give written notice of the
proposed permit to the governing board of any county where
the applicant plans to locate the facility and to any
governing board of municipalities which may be affected by
the facility. The applicant shall simultaneously cause
notice of the proposed permit to be published in a
184 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
newspaper of general circulation within the county where
the applicant plans to locate the facility or on the
centralized electronic notice system. If notice is
published in a newspaper, the notice shall be published
once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks commencing within
fifteen (15) days after being notified by the administrator
that the application is suitable for publication. If the
notice is published on the centralized electronic notice
system, the notice shall be published for two (2)
consecutive weeks commencing within fifteen (15) days after
being notified by the administrator that the application is
suitable for publication. The notice shall contain
information regarding the identity of the applicant, the
location of the proposed operation, the method and length
of the operation, the location at which information about
the application may be obtained, and the location and final
date for filing objections to the application. In
addition, the council may by rule require an applicant for
a proposed permit or for amendment of an existing permit to
notify other affected persons as authorized under
subsection (g) of this section.

185 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(k) Any interested person has the right to file
written objections to the proposed permit with the director
within thirty (30) days after the last publication of the
notice given pursuant to subsection (j) of this section. If
substantial written objections are filed, a public hearing
shall be held within twenty (20) days after the final date
for filing objections unless a different period is deemed
necessary by the council. The council or director shall
publish notice of the time, date and location of the
hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county
where the applicant plans to locate the facility once a
week for two (2) consecutive weeks immediately prior to the
hearing or on the centralized electronic notice system for
two (2) consecutive weeks immediately prior to the hearing.
The hearing shall be conducted as a contested case in
accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act,
and right of judicial review shall be afforded as provided
in that act.

35-11-514. Approval of commercial solid waste
management, commercial incineration and disposal
facilities.

186 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) No construction shall commence of, nor shall any
wastes be accepted or received at, any commercial solid
waste management facility, or any commercial waste
incineration or disposal facility subject to regulation
under W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii) unless the facility has been
approved by resolution of the board of county commissioners
of the county where the proposed facility is to be located.
The county commissioners shall hold one (1) or more public
hearings before making their decision. The county
commissioners shall publish notice of each hearing in a
newspaper of general circulation in the area of the
proposed facility once each week for at least two (2)
consecutive weeks prior to the hearing or on the
centralized electronic notice system for at least two (2)
consecutive weeks prior to the hearing. The board of county
commissioners may authorize a proposed facility upon
considering that the facility:

35-11-601. Applications; authority to grant; hearing;
limitations; renewals; judicial review; emergencies.

(a) Any person who owns or is in control of any real
or personal property, any plant, building, structure,
187 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
process or equipment may apply to the administrator of the
appropriate division for a variance from any rule,
regulation, standard or permit promulgated under this act.
A variance may be granted upon notice and hearing. Except
where public notice is given on the centralized electronic
notice system, the administrator shall give public notice
of the request for a variance in the county in which such
real or personal property, plant, building, structure,
process or equipment is in existence for which the variance
is sought. The notice shall designate who has applied for
the variance and the nature of the variance requested and
the time and place of hearing and shall be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in said county once a week
for four (4) consecutive weeks prior to the date of the
hearing or on the centralized electronic notice system for
four (4) consecutive weeks prior to the date of the
hearing. The cost of publication shall be paid by the
person applying for the variance. The administrator of the
division shall promptly investigate the request, consider
the views of the persons who may be affected by the grant
of the variance, and all facts bearing on the request, and
make a decision with the approval of the director within
188 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
sixty (60) days from the date the hearing for a variance is
held.

35-11-1204. Right of entry.

(b) Prior to entry, notice shall be given by mail to
the owners, if known, or if not known, by posting notice
upon the premises and advertising once in a newspaper of
general circulation in the locality of the land or for not
less than one (1) day on the centralized electronic notice
system.

35-11-1604. Public participation; notice; plan.

(a) Following any determination by the department
that a site is an eligible site, or following the
submission of any application to modify an existing remedy
agreement, the owner or operator shall give written notice
to all surface owners of record of land which is contiguous
to the site, and to all known adjacent surface owners of
record of land, and shall publish notice once per week for
four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the site is located or
189 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
on the centralized electronic notice system for four (4)
consecutive weeks. The notice published in a newspaper or
on the centralized electronic notice system shall be a
display advertisement. The notice to individual landowners
and the notice published in a newspaper or on the
centralized electronic notice system shall identify the
site, provide a summary of the criterion in W.S. 35-11-1602
which makes the site eligible for participation in the
voluntary remediation program under this article, describe
the process for the public to request the development of a
public participation plan under subsection (b) of this
section, and provide a thirty (30) day period for the
public to request that a public participation plan be
developed.

(d) At a minimum for any eligible site regardless of
whether a public participation plan has been required,
prior to entering into a remedy agreement, the owner shall
give written notice of the proposed remedy agreement to all
surface owners of record of land adjacent to the site, and
publish notice once per week for four (4) consecutive weeks
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the site is located or for four (4) consecutive weeks
190 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
on the centralized electronic notice system. The notice
shall be of a form and content prescribed by the
department, and shall summarize the proposed remedy
agreement, provide a description of the site, provide for a
thirty (30) day public comment period after the date of the
last publication, and provide an opportunity for an oral
hearing. An oral hearing on the proposed remedy agreement
shall be held if the department finds sufficient interest.
The department may enter into a remedy agreement following
the public comment period or any hearing, whichever is
later.

35-11-1609. Use control areas; when establishment
required; procedure; contents of petition; notice; failure
of governmental entity to act; enforcement; exception.

(d) Upon submission of a petition for long term use
restrictions, the governmental entity to whom the use area
designation petition has been submitted shall cause the
owner to give written notice of the petition to all surface
owners of record of land contiguous to the site, and to
publish notice of the petition and a public hearing once
per week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
191 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
general circulation in the county in which the site is
located or for four (4) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system. The notice shall
identify the property, generally describe the petition and
proposed use restrictions, direct that comments may be
submitted to the governmental entity or entities to whom
the petition has been submitted, and provide the date, time
and place of a public hearing. The public hearing shall be
held no sooner than thirty (30) days after the first
publication of the notice. After the public hearing has
been held, the governing board, commission or council shall
vote upon the creation of the use control area in
accordance with applicable rules, regulations and
procedures. No use control area shall be created except
upon petition of the owner and a majority vote of the
appropriate board, commission or council.

35-12-108. Quantity of water available; analysis;
public comment; opinions.

(c) Within five (5) days after completion of the
review, the state engineer shall render a preliminary
opinion as to the quantity of water available for the
192 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
proposed facility. The preliminary opinion, or a reasonable
summary, shall be published for three (3) consecutive weeks
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the proposed facility is to be located or for three
(3) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system. The expense of the publication shall be borne by
the applicant.

35-24-110. Contested case hearing on application;
procedure specified; recommendations and final decisions.

(a) If required by W.S. 35-24-107, the director shall
order a contested case hearing. The director shall publish
notice of the time, date and location of the hearing in a
newspaper of general circulation or on the centralized
electronic notice system at least a week prior to the
hearing.

36-3-104. Notice of selection.

Before any selection of lands granted to the state is made,
it shall be the duty of the director to publish in at least
one (1) newspaper of general circulation in each county in
193 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the state or on the centralized electronic notice system a
notice giving the area of the said lands so to be selected,
and the time on or about when the director will receive
applications for and begin the selection of said lands, and
before any lands so selected shall be leased, sold or
otherwise disposed of, a description of such lands together
with the name of the person for whom selected, shall be
published at least once in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county wherein said lands are located,
or on the centralized electronic notice system, and such
lands shall thereafter be sold, leased or otherwise
disposed of in the same manner and under the same
restrictions as provided by law for the disposition of
other state lands.

36-5-114. Leasing for industrial, commercial,
residential and recreational purposes; authority; rental
fees; rules and regulations.

(d) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations
implementing policies, procedures and standards for the
long-term leasing of state lands for industrial, commercial
and recreational purposes under the provisions of W.S.
194 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
36-5-114 through 36-5-117, including provisions requiring
compliance with all applicable land use planning and zoning
laws and permitting the board to terminate a lease for good
cause shown. When the office of state lands and investments
initiates a request for a proposed leasing of state lands,
the office shall require not less than thirty (30) days
notice be provided:

(ii) In a newspaper of general circulation in
the county or counties where the state lands are to be
leased or on the centralized electronic notice system; and

36-7-322. Notice upon failure to fulfill; sale of
incompleted works; option to complete.

Upon the failure of any parties, having contracts with the
state for the construction of irrigation works, to begin
the same within the time specified by the contract, or to
complete the same within the time or in accordance with the
specifications of the contract with the state, it shall be
the duty of the director to give such parties written
notice of such failure, and if, after a period of sixty
(60) days from the sending of such notice, they shall have
195 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
failed to proceed with the work, or to conform to the
specifications of their contract with the state, unless
said parties shall show to the satisfaction of the board
good and sufficient reason for such delay and failure to
complete said works or conform to said specifications and
demonstrate to the satisfaction of said board their
financial ability and intentions to proceed with said work
in good faith, the bond and contract of such parties and
all work constructed thereunder shall be at once and
thereby forfeited to the state, and it shall be the duty of
the board at once so to declare and to give notice once
each week, for a period of four (4) weeks, in some
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the
work is situated, and in one (1) newspaper at the state
capital, in like manner and for a like period, of the
forfeiture of said contract, or for four (4) consecutive
weeks on the centralized electronic notice system, and that
upon a day fixed, proposals will be received at the office
of state lands and investments in the capitol at Cheyenne,
for the purchase of the incompleted works and for the
completion of said contract; the time for receiving said
bids to be at least sixty (60) days subsequent to the
issuing of the last notice of forfeiture. The money
196 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
received from the sale of partially completed works under
the provisions of W.S. 36-7-321, shall first be applied to
the expenses incurred by the state in their forfeiture and
disposal; secondly, to satisfying the bond; and the
surplus, if any exists, shall be paid to the original
contractors with the state; provided, however, that the
board may, in its discretion, accept from any parties
unable for any reason to fulfill the terms of their
contract with the state, the full release, relinquishment
and surrender of any rights acquired from the state under
and by virtue of said contract, and may thereupon abrogate
the same and release said parties from the conditions of
the said contract and bond, and may proceed in its
discretion to enter into a new contract with other parties,
if such there be, for the completion of the works so
surrendered.

36-7-401. Notice lands open for settlement.

Upon receipt of notice by the contracting company that
water for beneficial irrigation can be furnished for all or
any part of the lands in any segregation list at stated
time, it being shown to the satisfaction of the board that
197 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the contracting company will be able to deliver water at
the said time, it shall be the duty of the board, by
publication, at the expense of the contracting company, in
one (1) newspaper in the county in which said lands are
situated and such other newspaper or newspapers as may be
designated by the contracting company, or on the
centralized electronic notice system, to give notice that
certain lands, generally described, are open for
settlement; that the land will be sold at fifty cents
($.50) per acre by the state and that proportionate
interests in the irrigation system for a perpetual water
supply can be purchased at the price named and water for
beneficial irrigation can be furnished on the date named,
and such other information as the board shall deem
advisable.

36-7-504. Notice and place of foreclosure sale;
duties of sheriff; limitation on bids.

All sales shall be advertised on the centralized electronic
notice system for six (6) consecutive weeks or in a
newspaper of general circulation, published in the county
where said land and water right is situate for six (6)
198 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
consecutive weeks, and shall be sold to the highest bidder
at the front door of the courthouse of the county, or such
place as may be agreed upon by the terms of the aforesaid
contract. And the sheriff of said county shall in all such
cases give all notices of sale and shall sell all such land
and water rights and shall make and execute a certificate
of sale to the purchaser thereof, and at such sale no
person, company of persons, association or incorporated
company, owning and holding any lien shall bid in or
purchase any land or water right at a greater price than
the amount due on said deferred payment for said water
right and land, and the costs incurred in making the sale
of said land and water right.

36-9-104. Advertisement.

All sales of state lands under this act shall be advertised
for four (4) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or in some newspaper in the county
in which such land is situated, if there be such paper; if
not, then in some paper published in an adjoining county.
Advertisements of such sales may be made in other papers,
as the board may direct. The advertisement shall state the
199 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
time, place, description of land, and terms of sale, and
the price at which the land was appraised by the board for
each parcel.

37-2-205. Certificate of convenience and necessity;
hearings.

(e) Where a certificate for the construction and
operation of a high voltage electric transmission line of
230 KV or greater is required, the public service
commission shall publish notice of application in a
newspaper of general circulation in each county where the
line will be constructed or on the centralized electronic
notice system. The public service commission shall give
actual notice of hearing on the application by registered
mail at the applicant's expense to each landowner who may
be affected. The notice of hearing shall be given at least
thirty (30) days before the hearing is held and shall
contain a summary of the pertinent facts about the
application.

37-5-503. Purposes; report.

200 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(g) Prior to exercising any rights or powers granted
to it in this section except for activities related to the
administration of pipeline capacity contracted with an
entity operating under the jurisdiction of the federal
energy regulatory commission or a successor agency, the
authority shall publish in a newspaper of general
circulation in Wyoming, and in a newspaper in the area
where the authority contemplates providing facilities or
services, or on the centralized electronic notice system,
in the manner prescribed by law, a notice describing the
acts, facilities or services contemplated by the authority.
Private persons, firms or corporations wishing to perform
the acts, construct the facilities or provide the services
described in the notice shall have ninety (90) days from
the date of last publication of the notice within which to
notify the authority of their intention to perform the
acts, construct the facilities or provide the services
described in the notice. A person or entity giving notice
to the authority shall include an anticipated timeline for
completion of the acts, construction or services. In the
absence of notification by a private person, firm or
corporation, or if a person, firm or corporation, having
given notice of intention to perform the acts, construct
201 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the facilities or provide the services contemplated by the
authority, fails to commence the same within one hundred
eighty (180) days from the date of last publication, the
authority may proceed to perform the acts, construct the
facilities or provide the services for which notice was
given. A private person, firm or corporation that has made
necessary applications to acquire any federal, state, local
or private permits, certificates or other authorizations
necessary to perform the acts, construct the facilities or
provide the services included in the authority's notice
within the time required is deemed to have commenced the
same. When a private person, firm or corporation has given
notice of intent to perform or is performing the acts,
constructing the facilities or providing the services that
the authority contemplated, the authority may conduct
hearings or meetings with the person, firm or corporation
to assess progress toward completion of the intended acts
to be performed, the facilities to be constructed or the
services to be provided. If it appears to the authority
that progress or completion of any or all of the intended
acts may be delayed for one (1) year or more, the authority
may proceed to perform the acts, construct the facilities
or provide the services originally contemplated.
202 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

37-5-505. Bonds.

(h) Any resolution of the authority authorizing the
issuance of bonds shall be published once in a newspaper of
general circulation published in Wyoming, and in a
newspaper in the area where the facility or services are
contemplated, or for not less than one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system. For a period of
thirty (30) days from the date of the publication any
person in interest may contest the legality of the
resolution and of the bonds to be issued under the
resolution and the provisions securing the bonds, including
the validity of any lease or other contract pledged to the
payment thereof. After the expiration of thirty (30) days
from the date of the publication no one shall have any
right of action to contest the validity of the bonds, the
validity of the security pledged to the payment thereof or
the provisions of the resolution under which the bonds were
issued, and all the bonds and all related proceedings shall
be conclusively presumed to be legal.

203 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
37-7-114. Notice and hearing on report of
commissioners.

Upon the filing of said report, the court or judge thereof
shall make and enter an order fixing the time and place
when and where all persons interested may appear and
remonstrate against the confirmation thereof, and the clerk
of said court shall cause notice of the time and place of
such hearing to be given to all parties interested which
notice shall contain a brief description of the lands
benefited and damaged, together with the net damage awarded
the several tracts, parcels, easements and corporations to
which damages are awarded, and the sum in each case
assessed for benefits, and cost of construction against
said several benefited parcels, tracts, easements and
corporations, and the benefits apportioned to each parcel,
tract, easement or corporation in the district. Said notice
shall be published at least three (3) successive weeks,
prior to the day set for the hearing in one newspaper
published in each county in which said lands, or any part
thereof within said district are situate (and if no
newspaper is published in said county, in some newspaper in
an adjoining county), or for three (3) successive weeks on
204 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the centralized electronic notice system, and by serving a
copy of such notice on each of the persons, or
corporations, by said report recommended, to be assessed,
or whose lands are by said report recommended to be
included in said district and who resides in any of the
counties in which any lands of the proposed district are
situated, at least twelve (12) days before the day of
hearing in the same manner that a summons is required to be
served; provided, absence from the county of such person or
corporation shall excuse personal service, whereupon due
publication of such notice shall be sufficient service.

37-7-128. Construction to be done by lowest
responsible bidder; advertisement for bids; applicability
of section.

In all cases where the work to be done at any one time
under the directions of the commissioners will, in their
opinion, cost to exceed twenty-five hundred dollars
($2,500.00), the same shall be let to the lowest
responsible bidder, and the commissioners shall advertise
for sealed bids, by notice published in some newspaper
published in the county in which the petition is filed, and
205 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
may advertise in one (1) or more newspapers published
elsewhere, or by notice published on the centralized
electronic notice system. If notice is not published on the
centralized electronic notice system and there be is no
newspaper published in the county in which the petition is
filed, they shall advertise in some newspaper published in
an adjoining county, which said notice shall particularly
set forth the time and place when and where the bids
advertised will be opened, the kind of work to be let and
the terms of payment. Said commissioners may continue the
letting from time to time, if in their judgment the same
shall be necessary, and shall reserve the right to reject
any and all bids. This section shall not be construed to
apply to the employment of superintendent, engineer,
attorney or other employee engaged in the general work of
the district.

37-13-116. Notice of public hearing on proposed
assessments.

Notice of a public hearing on the proposed assessment
resolution shall be given. At least twenty (20) days before
the date fixed for the hearing, the notice shall be
206 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
published one (1) time in a newspaper in which the first
notice of hearing was published or for not less than one
(1) day on the centralized electronic notice system. Notice
shall also be mailed to each owner of real property whose
property will be assessed for part of the cost of the
improvement at the last known address of the owner as shown
on the last completed real property assessment rolls of the
county wherein the affected property is located. In
addition, a copy of the notice shall be addressed and
mailed to "owner" at the street number of each piece of
property affected by the assessment. Each notice shall
state that at the specified time and place the governing
body will hold a hearing upon the proposed assessments and
that the owner of any property to be assessed pursuant to
the resolution will be heard on the question of whether his
property will be benefited by the proposed improvement to
the amount of the proposed assessment against his property
and whether the amount assessed against his property
constitutes more than his proper proportional share of the
total cost of the improvement. The notice shall further
state that the owner or owners of any property assessed
must file a written objection pursuant to section 37-303 [§
37-13-131] of the statutes if the owner or owners wish to
207 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
do the trenching and backfilling on their own property
outside of utility easements and thereby not be obligated
to pay the public utility therefor, if such is permitted by
the district and public utility tariff. The notice shall
further state where a copy of the proposed resolution
levying the assessments against all real property in the
district is on file for public inspection, and that subject
to such changes and corrections as may be made by the
governing body, it is proposed to adopt the resolution at
the conclusion of the hearing. The published notice shall
describe the boundaries or area of the district with
sufficient particularity to permit each owner of real
property therein to ascertain that his property lies in the
district. The mailed notice may refer to the district by
name and date of creation and shall state the amount of the
assessment proposed to be levied against the real property
of the person to whom the notice is mailed. In the absence
of fraud, the failure to mail any notice does not
invalidate any assessment or any proceeding under this
chapter.

37-13-125. Sale of property held in trust; notice.

208 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(b) Any sale shall be conducted only after notice has
been given, describing the property and stating that the
treasurer will on the day specified sell the property at
the front door of the building in which the governing body
holds its sessions, between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and
4:00 p.m. The notice shall be published at least five (5)
times in a daily newspaper published within the district,
or if there is none, at least twice in a newspaper of
general circulation in the district, or for not less than
five (5) days on the centralized electronic notice system.
The sale cannot be less than fifteen (15) days after the
date of the last publication of the notice.

37-13-128. Errors or irregularities not to void
assessment; civil action to adjudicate grievance; action to
test validity of resolution authorizing bond issue.

No special assessment shall be declared void or set aside
in consequence of any error or irregularity permitted or
appearing in any of the proceedings under this chapter, but
any party feeling aggrieved by any special assessment or
proceeding may bring a civil action to adjudicate the
grievance if the action is commenced prior to the
209 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
expiration of thirty (30) days after adoption of the
assessment ordinance. Every person whose property is
subject to the special assessment and who fails to appear
during the public hearings on assessments to raise his
objection to the tax shall be deemed to have waived all
objection to the assessment except the objection that the
governing body lacks jurisdiction to levy the tax, which
objection must be raised within thirty (30) days after
adoption of the assessment ordinance. Whenever any
enactment authorizing the issuance of any bonds pursuant to
the improvement contemplated is adopted, the resolution
shall be published once in a newspaper in which the
original notice of hearing was published or on the
centralized electronic notice system. For twenty (20) days
thereafter, any person whose property has been assessed and
any taxpayer in the district may institute litigation for
the purpose of questioning or attacking the legality of
such bonds. After the expiration of twenty (20) days, all
proceedings by the governing body, the bonds to be issued
pursuant thereto, and the special assessments from which
the bonds are to be paid, shall be final and no suit
challenging the legality thereof may be instituted in this
210 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
state, and no court shall have the authority to inquire
into such matters.

37-17-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(iii) "Notification" or "written notice" means
publication in a newspaper of general circulation within
the area served by the cooperative electric utility, on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newsletter
distributed by the cooperative electric utility, or sent
with a billing statement by the utility;

39-13-108. Enforcement.

(e) Tax sales. The following shall apply:

(ii) The following shall apply to sales of real
property:

(A) If the county treasurer proceeds to
collect delinquent taxes by sale of real property, he shall
211 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
advertise notice of all sales of real property by
publication thereof, once a week for three (3) weeks in a
legal newspaper in the county or for three (3) consecutive
weeks on the centralized electronic notice system, the
first publication to be at least four (4) weeks prior to
the day of sale and prior to the first week in September.
If notice is not advertised on the centralized electronic
notice system and there is no legal newspaper published in
the county, the county treasurer shall post a written
notice of the sale at least thirty (30) days prior to the
date of the sale within and near the front door of the
courthouse and in three (3) public places in the county in
which the major portion of the real property to be sold is
situated;

(v) The following shall apply to tax deeds to
purchasers:

(B) Holders of certificates of purchase of
real property sold for delinquent taxes, including a
holder's or county's assigns, upon application for a tax
deed therefor shall furnish proof to the county treasurer:

212 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(II) If no person is in actual
possession or occupancy of the property and if the person
in whose name the property was taxed or assessed cannot be
found in the county, that notice was published in a
newspaper printed in the county, or if no newspaper is
printed in the county, then in a newspaper printed in
Wyoming nearest to the county seat of the county in which
the property is located, or on the centralized electronic
notice system. The If notice is provided by newspaper,
notice shall be published once a week for three (3) weeks,
the first publication not more than five (5) months and the
last publication not less than three (3) months prior to
the application. If notice is provided on the centralized
electronic notice system, notice shall be published for
three (3) consecutive weeks, the first day of publication
not more than five (5) months and the last day of
publication not less than three (3) months prior to the
application; and

39-15-108. Enforcement.

(e) Tax sales. The following shall apply:

213 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(i) The tax due together with interest,
penalties and costs may be collected by appropriate
judicial proceedings or the department, with board
approval, or its representative, may seize and sell at
public auction so much of the person's property as will pay
all the tax, interest, penalties and costs. Notice of the
auction must be published for four (4) weeks in a newspaper
published in the resident county of the persons involved or
for four (4) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system.

39-15-203. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

(i) The following provisions apply to imposition
of the general purpose excise tax under W.S.
39-15-204(a)(i):

(C) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
214 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
which the election is to be held, or on the centralized
electronic notice system, and the notice shall specify the
object of the election. If the notice is published in a
newspaper, the notice shall be published at least once each
week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election.
If the notice is published on the centralized electronic
notice system, the notice shall be published for a thirty
(30) day period preceding the election. At the election the
ballots shall contain the words "for the county sales and
use tax" and "against the county sales and use tax". If a
portion of the proceeds from the tax will be used for
economic development as provided by W.S. 39-15-211(a)(i),
the ballot shall contain the words "a portion (or specific
percentage) of the tax proceeds shall be used for economic
development" in a clear and appropriate manner. If the
proposition is approved the same proposition shall be
submitted at subsequent general elections as provided in
this subparagraph until the proposition is defeated. If
the tax proposed is approved after July 1, 1989, the same
proposition shall be submitted at every other subsequent
general election until the proposition is defeated. However
in those counties where the tax is not in effect, the
county commissioners with the concurrence of the governing
215 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
bodies of fifty percent (50%) of the municipalities may
establish the initial term of the tax at four (4) years.
The term of the tax shall be stated in the proposition
submitted to the voters. If a proposition establishing the
term of the tax at four (4) years is approved, the
proposition shall be submitted at the second general
election following the election at which the proposition
was initially approved and at the general election held
every four (4) years thereafter until the proposition is
defeated;

(ii) The following provisions apply to
imposition of the lodging excise tax under W.S.
39-15-204(a)(ii):

(D) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
which the election is to be held or in the city or town if
only a city wide or town wide tax is proposed, or on the
centralized electronic notice system, and the notice shall
specify the object of the election. If the notice is
216 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
published in a newspaper, the notice shall be published at
least once each week for a thirty (30) day period preceding
the election. If the notice is published on the centralized
electronic notice system, the notice shall be published
consecutively for a thirty (30) day period preceding the
election. At the election the ballots shall contain the
words "for the county (or city or town) lodging tax" and
"against the county (or city or town) lodging tax". If the
proposition is approved the same proposition shall be
submitted at subsequent general elections as provided in
this subparagraph until the proposition is defeated. If the
proposition to impose the lodging tax pursuant to W.S.
39-15-204(a)(ii) is approved, the same proposition shall be
submitted, until defeated, at the second general election
following the election at which the proposition was
initially approved and at the general election held every
four (4) years thereafter. If a county, city or town has in
place a lodging tax pursuant to W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii),
either through a petition or by request of the county, city
or town, the proposition posed at the next election may
contain a larger tax not to exceed two percent (2%);

217 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(v) The following provisions apply to imposition
of the excise tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(vi) the purpose
of which is economic development:

(C) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
which the election is to be held, or on the centralized
electronic notice system, and the notice shall specify the
object of the election. If the notice is published in a
newspaper, the notice shall be published at least once each
week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election.
If the notice is published on the centralized electronic
notice system, the notice shall be published for a thirty
(30) day period preceding the election. At the election the
ballots shall contain the words "for the county sales and
use tax for economic development" and "against the county
sales and use tax for economic development". If the tax
proposed is approved, the same proposition shall be
submitted at every other subsequent general election until
the proposition is defeated. However, the county
commissioners with the concurrence of the governing bodies
218 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of fifty percent (50%) of the municipalities may establish
the initial term of the tax at four (4) years. The term of
the tax shall be stated in the proposition submitted to the
voters. If a proposition establishing the term of the tax
at four (4) years is approved, the proposition shall be
submitted at the second general election following the
election at which the proposition was initially approved
and at the general election held every four (4) years
thereafter until the proposition is defeated;

(vi) The following provisions apply to
imposition of the municipal tax under W.S.
39-15-204(a)(vii):

(E) A notice of election shall be given in
at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation published
in the county in which the election is to be held, or on
the centralized electronic notice system, and the notice
shall specify the proposition that will be considered at
the election. If the notice is published in a newspaper,
the notice shall be published at least once each week for a
thirty (30) day period preceding the election. If the
notice is published on the centralized electronic notice
219 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
system, the notice shall be published for a thirty (30) day
period preceding the election. At the election for each
proposition, the ballots shall contain the words "for the
municipal sales and use tax" and "against the municipal
sales and use tax". The ballot shall describe the purposes
of the tax in a clear and appropriate manner;

39-15-211. Distribution.

(b) For all revenue collected by the department from
the taxes imposed by W.S. 39-15-204(a)(iii) the department
shall:

(iv) If taxes collected exceed the amount
necessary for the approved purpose, the excess funds shall
be retained by the county treasurer for one (1) year for
refund of overpayments of the tax imposed pursuant to this
act upon order of the department. After one (1) year any
interest earned on the excess funds and the excess funds
less any refunds ordered shall be deposited in the
applicable reserve account authorized by W.S.
39-15-203(a)(iii)(H) or transferred to the county or
municipality as specified in the resolution adopted
220 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
pursuant to W.S. 39-15-203(a)(iii)(A). If the resolution
fails to specify how excess funds will be expended and
after all approved purposes have been completed, the county
treasurer shall transfer the excess funds less any refunds
ordered to each city and town within the county in the
proportion the population of the city or town bears to the
population of the county and to the county in the
proportion that the population of the unincorporated areas
of the county bears to the population of the county. After
a public hearing, with notice of the public hearing
published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county or on the centralized electronic notice system at
least thirty (30) days before the public hearing, the
governing body of the county and each municipality may
appropriate its proportion of excess funds for other
specific purposes authorized by a majority vote of the
governing body, which shall not include the ordinary
operations of local government. Excess funds collected on
the propositions approved prior to January 1, 1989, and any
interest earned shall be retained by the county treasurer
for use in any purposes approved by the electors in
accordance with procedures set forth in this section and
for refunds of overpayment of taxes imposed pursuant to
221 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
this act upon the order of the department, except that,
with the approval of the governing bodies adopting the
initial resolution, the excess funds and any interest
earned may be used for the needs of the project for which
the tax was approved.

39-16-108. Enforcement.

(e) Tax sales. At any time following a delinquency
the department with board approval may seize and sell at
public auction any property owned by the delinquent
taxpayer to pay all taxes, penalty and interest due plus
the cost involved in seizing and selling the property.
Notice of the sale showing its time and place shall be
mailed to the delinquent taxpayer at least ten (10) days
prior to the sale. The notice shall also be printed in a
newspaper of general circulation published in the county
wherein the seized property is to be sold or published on
the centralized electronic notice system at least ten (10)
days prior to the sale. If notice is not published on the
centralized electronic notice system and no newspaper is
published in the county the notice shall be posted in three
(3) public places ten (10) days prior to the sale. The
222 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
notice shall contain a description of the property to be
sold, a statement of the entire amount due, the name of the
delinquent taxpayer and a statement that unless the amount
due is paid on or before the time of sale, the property or
so much thereof as necessary shall be sold. The department,
with board approval, shall give the purchaser a bill of
sale for personal property or a deed for real property
purchased at the sale. Any unsold property seized may be
left at the sale at the risk of the delinquent taxpayer. If
the monies received at the sale are in excess of the amount
due the excess shall be given to the delinquent taxpayer
upon his receipt therefor. If a receipt by the delinquent
taxpayer is not given the department shall deposit the
excess with the state treasurer as trustee for the
delinquent taxpayer.

39-16-203. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

(i) The following provisions apply to imposition
of the general purpose excise tax under W.S.
39-16-204(a)(i):
223 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(C) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
which the election is to be held, or on the centralized
electronic notice system, and the notice shall specify the
object of the election. If the notice is published in a
newspaper, the notice shall be published at least once each
week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election.
If the notice is published on the centralized electronic
notice system, the notice shall be published for a thirty
(30) day period preceding the election. At the election the
ballots shall contain the words "for the county sales and
use tax" and "against the county sales and use tax". If a
portion of the proceeds from the tax will be used for
economic development as provided by W.S. 39-16-211(a)(i),
the ballot shall contain the words "a portion (or specific
percentage) of the proceeds will be used for economic
development" in a clear and appropriate manner. If the
proposition is approved the same proposition shall be
submitted at subsequent general elections as provided in
this subparagraph until the proposition is defeated. If the
224 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
tax proposed is approved after July 1, 1989, the same
proposition shall be submitted at every other subsequent
general election until the proposition is defeated. However
in those counties where the tax is not in effect, the
county commissioners with the concurrence of the governing
bodies of fifty percent (50%) of the municipalities may
establish the initial term of the tax at four (4) years.
The term of the tax shall be stated in the proposition
submitted to the voters. If a proposition establishing the
term of the tax at four (4) years is approved, the
proposition shall be submitted at the second general
election following the election at which the proposition
was initially approved and at the general election held
every four (4) years thereafter until the proposition is
defeated;

(iv) The following provisions apply to
imposition of the excise tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(v) the
purpose of which is economic development:

(C) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
225 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
which the election is to be held, or on the centralized
electronic notice system, and the notice shall specify the
object of the election. If the notice is published in a
newspaper, the notice shall be published at least once each
week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election.
If the notice is published on the centralized electronic
notice system, the notice shall be published for a thirty
(30) day period preceding the election. At the election the
ballots shall contain the words "for the county sales and
use tax for economic development" and "against the county
sales and use tax for economic development". If the tax
proposed is approved the same proposition shall be
submitted at every other subsequent general election until
the proposition is defeated. However, the county
commissioners with the concurrence of the governing bodies
of fifty percent (50%) of the municipalities may establish
the initial term of the tax at four (4) years. The term of
the tax shall be stated in the proposition submitted to the
voters. If a proposition establishing the term of the tax
at four (4) years is approved, the proposition shall be
submitted at the second general election following the
election at which the proposition was initially approved
226 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
and at the general election held every four (4) years
thereafter until the proposition is defeated;

(v) The following provisions apply to imposition
of the municipal tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(vi):

(E) A notice of election shall be given in
at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation published
in the county in which the election is to be held, or on
the centralized electronic notice system, and the notice
shall specify the proposition that will be considered at
the election. If the notice is published in a newspaper,
the notice shall be published at least once each week for a
thirty (30) day period preceding the election. If the
notice is published on the centralized electronic notice
system, the notice shall be published for a thirty (30) day
period preceding the election. At the election for each
proposition, the ballots shall contain the words "for the
municipal sales and use tax" and "against the municipal
sales and use tax". The ballot shall describe the purposes
of the tax in a clear and appropriate manner;

39-16-211. Distribution.
227 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(b) For all revenue collected by the department from
the taxes imposed by W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii), the department
shall:

(iv) If taxes collected exceed the amount
necessary for the approved purpose, the excess funds shall
be retained by the county treasurer for one (1) year for
refund of overpayments of the tax imposed pursuant to this
act upon order of the department. After one (1) year any
interest earned on the excess funds and the excess funds
less any refunds ordered shall be deposited in the
applicable reserve account authorized by W.S.
39-16-203(a)(ii)(H) or transferred to the county or
municipality as specified in the resolution adopted
pursuant to W.S. 39-16-203(a)(ii)(A). If the resolution
fails to specify how excess funds will be expended and
after all approved purposes have been completed, the county
treasurer shall transfer the excess funds less any refunds
ordered to each city and town within the county in the
proportion the population of the city or town bears to the
population of the county and to the county in the
proportion that the population of the unincorporated areas
228 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of the county bears to the population of the county. After
a public hearing, with notice of the public hearing
published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county or on the centralized electronic notice system at
least thirty (30) days before the public hearing, the
governing body of the county and each municipality may
appropriate its proportion of excess funds for other
specific purposes authorized by a majority vote of the
governing body, which shall not include the ordinary
operations of local government. Excess funds collected on
the propositions approved prior to January 1, 1989, and any
interest earned shall be retained by the county treasurer
for use in any purposes approved by the electors in
accordance with procedures set forth in this section and
for refunds of overpayment of taxes imposed pursuant to
this act upon the order of the department, except that,
with the approval of the governing bodies adopting the
initial resolution, the excess funds and any interest
earned may be used for the needs of the project for which
the tax was approved.

229 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
41-3-106. Procedure to exchange water; delivery of
water under exchanges; approval of state engineer;
enforcement of exchanges.

(d) It is the policy of the state to encourage
exchanges. The state engineer shall not issue an exchange
order if the rights of other appropriators will be
injuriously affected thereby, or if the proposed exchange
would, in the opinion of the state engineer, be too
difficult to administer or would be adverse to the public
interest. The state engineer shall cause to be published,
at the petitioner's expense, once a week for at least two
(2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
in each county where the water rights subject to the
exchange petition are located, or by publishing notice for
two (2) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system, a notice of the filing of the exchange
petition which identifies the place where the exchange
petition is available for public inspection. The last date
of publication shall occur not less than thirty (30) days
before the state engineer enters the order to grant the
exchange. All exchanges are subject to the requirements of
beneficial use and equality of water exchanged, and no
230 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
exchange will be allowed unless a sufficient quantity of
makeup water is introduced to replace the water diverted
and withdrawn under the exchange. In making the
determination of equality and sufficiency of the makeup
water introduced, the state engineer may consider relative
consumptive uses and transmission losses.

41-3-107. Submerged lands; petition for change of
water rights; conditions; hearing; fees.

(b) After receipt of a petition for such change the
state board of control shall cause a public hearing to be
held on the petition before the superintendent of the water
division in which such appropriation is located, with
notice of the hearing to be advertised in at least one (1)
issue of a newspaper having general circulation in the
community where the water right involved is located or on
the centralized electronic notice system. The petitioner
shall pay the cost of publication prior to the time of
hearing and shall provide a stenographic record of the
proceedings, which shall be transmitted by the division
superintendent to the state board of control with his
report. A fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for
231 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
issuance and recording of each amended certificate of
appropriation of water shall be collected by the state
board of control at the time of filing of the petition and
the board shall also require a deposit of sufficient funds
to cover the cost of preparing and recording a certified
copy of the order of the board granting the petition.

41-3-114. Petition to change point of diversion or
means of conveyance.

(f) The state engineer or the superintendent shall
set a hearing on the petition and require the petitioner to
provide thirty (30) days notice by certified mail with
return receipt requested of the time and place of the
hearing to any owners of appropriations which divert
between the old and new points of diversion and any owners
or users of ditches or facilities to be affected by the
proposed change. If the state engineer or the state board
of control determines that at least twenty (20) owners of
appropriations or owners or users of ditches or facilities
require notice of the hearing, the state engineer or the
state board of control, in lieu of requiring notice by
certified mail with return receipt requested, may allow the
232 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
petitioner to provide notice of the hearing by regular mail
and publication. Notice by publication under this
subsection shall be accomplished by publishing notice for
two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the new point of diversion
is located or by publishing notice for two (2) consecutive
weeks on the centralized electronic notice system. The last
date of publication shall occur not less than ten (10) days
and not more than thirty (30) days prior to the hearing.
The petitioner shall provide the superintendent with a
record of the proceedings which shall be transmitted to the
state board of control with the superintendent's report.
The state board of control or the state engineer may make
such other regulations as may be found necessary. No
petition shall be granted if the right of other
appropriators will be injuriously affected. The attorney
general shall represent the state board of control or the
state engineer in any appeal.

41-3-115. Applications for use of water outside the
state.

233 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(o) Upon completion of the state engineer's review,
the state engineer shall issue a preliminary analysis of
the application. The analysis shall address the factors set
forth in subsection (r) of this section, contain a summary
of the application and any other information the state
engineer deems relevant. The preliminary opinion, or a
reasonable summary, shall be published, at the applicant's
expense, for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county where the proposed
appropriation of water is located or for three (3)
consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system. At the conclusion of the publication period, the
state engineer shall hold a public hearing, at the
applicant's expense, in the county where the proposed
appropriation is located.

41-3-212. Change of point of diversion; hearing.

It shall be the duty of the board of control at its next
regular meeting following the receipt of such petition to
examine same and ascertain if it sets forth all the facts
required by W.S. 41-3-210, and the validity of the water
right granted by the adjoining state. Upon it being made to
234 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
appear to the satisfaction of the board of control that the
requirements of law and the regulations of the board have
been complied with and that the petitioner is entitled to
make the proposed changes, the said petition shall be
referred to the division superintendent of the proper water
division for a public hearing to be held not later than one
hundred and twenty (120) days, following the date so
referred. The said superintendent shall, by order, require
all persons interested to appear on said certain day to
show cause why the petition should not be granted. The said
order shall be published for four (4) consecutive weeks in
a newspaper having general circulation in the county where
the proposed change of point of diversion is located or for
four (4) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system; provided, that the consent of all owners of
intervening diversions be secured, or that those not
secured shall be notified by registered mail at least
thirty (30) days prior to the hearing date. Any party who
may claim injury on account of said proposed change of
point of diversion shall have the right to appear before
the superintendent at the public hearing as ordered, and
present evidence in support of said claim. The evidence of
such hearing shall be confined to the subjects enumerated
235 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
in the notice for hearing. Upon completion of the taking of
testimony in such hearing, it shall be the duty of the
division superintendent to transmit same to the office of
the board of control together with a written report setting
forth the procedure followed and the results accomplished.
At the next regular meeting, the board shall consider the
evidence transmitted and enter a proper order either
granting or denying the petition.

41-3-401. Failure to use water; extension of time;
initiation by benefitted or injured user; hearing; appeal.

(c) The superintendent shall notify the holders of
water rights sought to be abandoned by certified mail that
a hearing will be held. The hearing shall be conducted
pursuant to all applicable provisions of the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act. All notices shall advise
interested parties of the time, place and purpose of the
hearing. Parties initiating abandonment actions are
designated as contestants. Water right holders or other
persons with interests in the rights allegedly abandoned
are designated as contestees. In any case where notice by
certified mail cannot be accomplished an advertisement
236 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the
abandonment is alleged to have occurred, or for three (3)
consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system, naming the parties in the case and setting forth
the time, place and purpose of the hearing is sufficient.
Cost of advertising shall be paid by the contestant.

41-3-402. Initiation by state engineer; hearing;
appeal.

(b) The superintendent shall send notices, by
certified mail, of the time, place, and purpose of the
hearing to all owners of lands covered by the
appropriations involved in the forfeiture proceeding. Such
persons shall be joined as parties to the forfeiture
proceedings as contestees. The state shall be designated as
contestant. In a case where notice by certified mail cannot
be accomplished, an advertisement published once a week for
three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the forfeiture is
alleged to have occurred, or for three (3) consecutive
weeks on the centralized electronic notice system, naming
237 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the parties in the case and setting forth the time, place,
and purpose of the hearing, and a general description of
the water rights whose status is under consideration, shall
answer the requirements of notice. Notice by certified mail
shall first be attempted before notice by advertisement is
employed. Advertisement costs shall be paid by the state
engineer. In addition, whenever it appears necessary for
full and proper notice, the superintendent may post a
notice of the hearing in a conspicuous place on the land or
at the place where the water rights are attached or
utilized, or on the point of diversion.

41-3-702. Short title; definitions.

(a) This act may be known and cited as "Water
Conservancy Act"; the districts created hereunder may be
termed "water conservancy districts"; and the bonds which
may be issued hereunder may be called "water conservancy
bonds", and such designation may be engraved or printed on
their face. Wherever the term "publication" is used in this
act and no manner specified therefor, it shall be taken to
mean once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at
least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in each
238 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
county wherein such publication is to be made or for three
(3) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system. If publication is made by newspaper, it shall not
be necessary that publication be made on the same day of
the week in each of the three (3) weeks, but not less than
fourteen (14) days (excluding the day of the first
publication), shall intervene between the first publication
and the last publication, and the publication shall be
complete on the date of the last publication.

41-3-755. Bonds; election prior to issuance;
publication of resolution.

The resolution provided in W.S. 41-3-754 shall be published
once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, the last
publication of which shall be at least ten (10) days prior
to the date set for said election, in a newspaper of
general circulation printed and published within the
district, or the resolution shall be published for two (2)
consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for
said election, and no other or further notice of such
election or publication of the names of election officers
239 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
or of the precincts or polling places need be given or
made.

41-3-758. Judicial examination and determination of
board's powers.

The board may, in its discretion, at any time file a
petition in the court, praying a judicial examination and
determination of any power conferred hereby or by any
amendment hereto or of any tax or assessment levied or of
any act, proceeding or contract of the district, whether or
not said contract shall have been executed, including
proposed contracts for the acquisition, construction,
maintenance and/or operation of works for the district.
Such petition shall set forth the facts whereon the
validity of such power, assessment, act, proceeding or
contract is founded and shall be verified by the president
of the board. Notice of the filing of said petition shall
be given by the clerk of the court, under the seal thereof,
stating in brief outline the contents of the petition and
showing where a full copy of any contract or contracts,
therein mentioned, may be examined. Said notice shall be
served by publication in at least five (5) consecutive
240 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
issues of a weekly newspaper of general circulation
published in the county in which the principal office of
the district is located, or for five (5) consecutive weeks
on the centralized electronic notice system, and by posting
the same in the office of the district at least thirty (30)
days prior to the date fixed in said notice for the hearing
on said petition. Any owner of property in the district or
person interested in the contract or proposed contract may
appear and demur to or answer said petition at any time
prior to the date fixed for said hearing or within such
further time as may be allowed by the court; and the
petition shall be taken as confessed by all persons who
fail so to appear. The said petition and notice shall be
sufficient to give the court jurisdiction and upon hearing,
the court shall examine into and determine all matters and
things affecting the question submitted, shall make such
findings, with reference thereto, and render such judgment
and decree thereon as the case warrants. Costs may be
divided or apportioned among the contesting parties in the
discretion of the trial court. Review of the judgment of
the court may be had as in other similar cases, except that
such review must be applied for within thirty (30) days
after the time of the rendition of such judgment, or within
241 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
such additional time as may be allowed by the court within
thirty (30) days. The Code of Civil Procedure shall govern
in matters of pleading and practice where not otherwise
specified herein. The court shall disregard any error,
irregularity or omission which does not affect the
substantial rights of the parties.

41-3-772. Methods of levying and collecting; class B.

(b) The secretary of the board shall cause notice of
the filing of such petition to be given and published once
each week for two (2) successive weeks, in a newspaper
published in the county in which said municipality is
situated, or for two (2) successive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system, which notice shall
state the filing of such petition and giving notice to all
persons interested to appear at the office of the board, at
a time named in said notice and show cause, in writing, if
any they have, why the petition should not be granted.

41-3-776. Objections to assessments.

242 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
(a) Prior to the third Monday in July of each year in
which assessments are made, the board shall appoint a time
and place or places where it will meet within the district
for the purposes of hearing objections to assessments and
prior notice of such hearing shall be given by publication
for two (2) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system or in two (2) issues a week apart, in some
newspaper of general circulation published in each county;
provided that if there is any county in the district in
which there is no newspaper published, then such notice
shall be published in an adjoining county. Said notice
shall notify the owners of property in the district that in
the secretary's office may be found and examined a
description of the property so assessed, the amount of the
assessment thereon fixed by the board, and the time and
place or places fixed by the board for the hearing of
objections to such assessments. It shall not be necessary
for said notice to contain separate descriptions of the
lots or tracts of real estate, but it shall be sufficient
if the notice shall contain such descriptions as will
inform the owner whether or not his real estate is covered
by such descriptions, and to inform the owners where can be
found of record the amount of assessments. If in the
243 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
opinion of any person whose property is assessed, his
property has been assessed too high, or has been
erroneously or illegally assessed, he may at any time
before the date of such hearing, file written objections to
such assessments, stating the grounds of such objections,
which statement shall be verified by the affidavit of said
person or his agent. In such hearing the board shall hear
such evidence and arguments as may be offered concerning
the correctness or legality of such assessment and may
modify or amend the same. Any owner of property desiring to
appeal from the findings of the board as to assessment
shall, within thirty (30) days from the finding of the
board, file with the clerk of the court a written notice
making demand for trial by the court. The appellant at the
same time shall file a bond with good and sufficient
security to be approved by the clerk of said court in the
sum not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200.00) to the
effect that if the finding of the court be not more
favorable to the appellant than the finding of the board,
the appellant will pay the cost of the appeal. The
appellant shall state definitely from what part of the
order the appeal is taken. In case more than one (1) appeal
is taken, the court may upon its showing that the same may
244 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
be consolidated without injury to the interests of any one,
consolidate and try the same together.

41-3-913. Control areas; election of control area
advisory board; mileage and expense allowances.

(b) The state engineer shall notify the division
advisory committee of the division in which the control
area is located, of the designation or redesignation of the
control area. Within twenty (20) days of notification, the
division advisory committee shall select a nominating
committee of not less than three (3) persons entitled to
vote in the election of the control area advisory board.
The nominating committee shall nominate not less than five
(5) persons for election to the control area advisory board
or, if board member districts have been established, it
shall nominate at least one (1) person for election in each
district. Within thirty (30) days of its selection, the
nominating committee shall report its nominations to the
division advisory committee. The division advisory
committee shall call an election of members of the control
area advisory board, to be held within forty (40) days from
the date of the report. The call of the election shall
245 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
state the time, the place within the control area, the
purpose of the election, and the names of persons nominated
for election. It shall be published for two (2) consecutive
weeks at least twenty (20) days prior to the election in a
newspaper of general circulation in each county in which a
part of the control area or board member district lies or
for two (2) consecutive weeks at least twenty (20) days
prior to the election on the centralized electronic notice
system.

41-3-914. Adjudication of waters within control area.

(a) After the boundaries of any control area have
been determined by the board, the appropriate
superintendent shall proceed with the adjudication of
unadjudicated wells within the control area. After
completing the adjudication, the superintendent shall hold
evidence of the adjudication open for inspection by the
public at a time and place to be fixed by the
superintendent, and notice thereof shall be published in
two (2) issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the
county or counties where the control area is situated or on
246 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the centralized electronic notice system for not less than
two (2) days.

41-3-915. Control areas; hearing to determine
adequacy of water for all appropriators; corrective
controls generally; agreements in lieu of controls.

(a) After designation of an area as a control area by
the board, the state engineer may temporarily adopt any of
the corrective controls provided for by this section, where
it appears that immediate regulation is required. After the
well adjudication procedure has been completed, the state
engineer may, on his own motion, and shall on the petition
of twenty (20) appropriators or of one-tenth of the
appropriators of water from a control area, cause a hearing
to be held before the state engineer and the control area
advisory board to determine whether the underground water
in the area is adequate for the needs of all appropriators
of underground water in such area. Public notice of the
time and place of the hearing shall be published once in a
newspaper circulated in the area or once on the centralized
electronic notice system not more than thirty (30) days
before the time set for the meeting. If the state engineer
247 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
finds after the hearing, and after receiving the advice of
the control area advisory board, that the underground water
in the control area is insufficient for all of the
appropriators, he may by order adopt one (1) or more of the
following corrective controls:

(d) Any agreement approved by the state engineer may
be terminated by the terms of the agreement, by the consent
of the parties, or by order of the state engineer if he
finds, after investigation and a public hearing before the
control area advisory board, held at least two (2) weeks
after one (1) published notice in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county in which a part of the control
area lies, or held at least two (2) weeks after publication
for not less than one (1) day on the centralized electronic
notice system, that the agreement is not being
substantially complied with by the parties, or that changed
conditions have made the agreement inequitable, or that the
continuance of the agreement is no longer consistent with
the intent, purpose and requirements of this act, or is a
detriment to the public interest or to the rights of other
persons not parties to the agreement.

248 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
41-3-932. Public notice of application or petition;
hearing before state engineer and control area advisory
board; cost.

(a) Upon the filing of a petition to amend an
existing water right or an application to appropriate
underground water for any use other than domestic,
stockwatering or miscellaneous purposes where the quantity
of water to be appropriated is twenty-five (25) gallons of
water per minute or less, from an area designated as a
control area by the state board of control, the state
engineer shall cause to be published, at applicant's
expense, on the centralized electronic notice system for
not less than three (3) consecutive weeks or in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county wherein the proposed
well or requested change will be located, for at least once
a week for three (3) consecutive weeks, a notice of the
filing of the application or requested changes and that
objections to the granting thereof may be filed within ten
(10) days after the last publication of the notice, on the
grounds that there is no unappropriated water in the
proposed source of supply or that the granting of the
application would be detrimental to the public interest. If
249 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
objections are filed within the time specified in the
notice, the state engineer shall set a date for a hearing
on the application or requested changes and the objections
thereto and shall notify the applicant or petitioner and
the objectors thereof. If the applicant or petitioner
questions the standing of the objector, the state engineer
shall make written findings of fact on the issue and may
overrule the objection on that basis. The hearing shall be
before the control area advisory board and the state
engineer, and shall be held in an appropriate place within
the county in which the proposed well or requested change
is to be located. The state engineer, for good cause, may
impose costs of the hearing proportionally upon the
applicant or petitioner and the objectors. The hearing
under this subsection shall be a contested case hearing
conducted in conformance with and subject to the provisions
of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. A decision by
the state engineer granting or denying an application or
petition under this subsection may be appealed to the board
of control within thirty (30) days of the date of receipt
of notice of the decision. Upon appeal and based on the
contested case record and upon additional evidence, if any,
taken at the direction of the board, the board may affirm,
250 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
modify or reverse the findings of the state engineer. An
appeal from an order of the board of control may be taken
to the district court pursuant to the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act.

(b) If no objections are filed against the
application or petition under subsection (a) of this
section but the state engineer is of the opinion that the
application or petition may be detrimental to the public
interest, or desires to obtain the recommendations of the
control area advisory board, he shall set a date for a
public hearing on the application or petition and shall
notify the applicant or petitioner of the time and place
thereof. Not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the
hearing the state engineer shall cause notice of the
hearing to be published, at the expense of the applicant or
petitioner, on the centralized electronic notice system or
in at least one (1) newspaper having general circulation in
the county in which the proposed well or requested change
is to be located. The state engineer shall notify the
applicant or petitioner of the time and place of the
hearing. The public hearing shall be held before the
control area advisory board and the state engineer in an
251 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
appropriate place in the county in which the proposed well
or requested change is to be located. In making any
determination required by this section, the state engineer
may rely upon records and information on file in his office
or in the office of the board of control. In the event a
hearing is held he shall make known the records and
information upon which he relies at least fifteen (15) days
before the hearing. A decision by the state engineer under
this subsection may be appealed by the applicant or
petitioner to the board of control within thirty (30) days
of the date of receipt of notice of the decision. Upon
appeal the board of control shall conduct a contested case
hearing in accordance with its rules and regulations and
the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. An appeal from an
order of the board of control may be taken to the district
court pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

41-3-1006. Appropriation of unappropriated waters for
direct instream flows.

(d) The applicant for an instream flow water right
shall publish a notice of the application and hearing on
the centralized electronic notice system for not less than
252 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
two (2) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing provided by
subsection (e) of this section or in a newspaper of general
circulation in the area near the proposed reservoir site or
stream segment, once each week for at least two (2)
consecutive weeks prior to the hearing provided by
subsection (e) of this section which notice shall briefly
describe the application.

41-4-302. Notice; by publication; contents; taking of
testimony; adjournment of hearings generally.

The said board shall prepare a notice, setting forth the
date when the engineer will begin a measurement of the
stream, and the ditches diverting the water therefrom, and
a place, and a day certain, when the superintendent of the
water division in which the stream to be adjudicated is
situated, shall begin the taking of testimony as to the
rights of the parties claiming water therefrom. Said notice
shall be published for not less than two (2) days on the
centralized electronic notice system or in two (2) issues
of a newspaper having general circulation in the county in
which such stream is situated, the publication of said
notice to be at least thirty (30) days prior to the
253 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
beginning of taking testimony by said division
superintendent, or for the measurement of the stream by the
state engineer, or his assistant; and the superintendent
taking such testimony shall have the power to adjourn the
taking of evidence from time to time, and from place to
place; provided, all places appointed and adjourned to by
the superintendent shall be so situated, as related to the
streams, as shall best suit the proper convenience of the
persons interested in the determination of such priorities
and appropriations.

41-4-309. Notice on completion of testimony;
inspection of evidence.

Upon the completion of the taking of evidence by the
division superintendent, it shall be his duty to at once
give notice, for not less than one (1) day on the
centralized electronic notice system or in one (1) issue of
some newspaper of general circulation in the county where
such determination is, and by registered mail to the
various claimants, that upon a certain day, and a place
named in the notice, all of said evidence shall be open to
the inspection of the various claimants, and said
254 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
superintendent shall keep said evidence open to inspection
at said place, not less than one (1) day and not more than
five (5) days.

41-4-310. Duty of claimants to appear; failure to
comply; time limits for appearance; rights of claimant not
notified of adjudication.

Whenever the state board of control shall, as provided by
law, proceed to adjudicate and determine the rights of the
various claimants to the use of water upon any stream or
other body of water, it shall be the duty of all claimants
interested in such stream or other body of water to appear
and submit proof of their respective appropriations, at the
time and in the manner required by law; and any such
claimant who shall fail to appear in such proceedings and
submit proof of his appropriations shall be barred and
estopped from subsequently asserting any rights theretofore
acquired upon the stream or other body of water embraced in
such proceedings, and shall be held to have forfeited all
rights to the use of said stream theretofore claimed by
him. Provided, that any person claiming the right to the
use of water of any stream heretofore adjudicated by the
255 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
board of control who, having been or claiming to have been
at the time an appropriator therefrom, shall have failed to
appear and submit proof of his claim shall be permitted
within one (1) year after the passage of this act, but not
thereafter, to apply for a hearing and an adjudication of
his rights in the manner hereinafter provided; and
provided, further, that any claimant upon whom no other
service shall be made than by publication in the newspaper,
or publication on the centralized electronic notice system,
of the notice of such proceedings and taking of testimony,
may, within one (1) year after the entry of the order or
decree of the board, determining the rights of the various
claimants upon any particular stream or other body of
water, have the same opened and be let in to give proof of
his appropriation; but before the decree of the board can
be opened in such case, the applicant shall give notice to
all other persons interested in the water of the stream or
other body of water in question, and shall with his
petition file the same kind of proof as required of
claimants in original hearings and make it appear to the
satisfaction of the board that during the pendency of the
proceedings he had no actual notice thereof in time to
appear and make proof of his claim; and all parties
256 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
interested may present affidavits as to the matter of
actual notice of the applicant.

41-4-506. Time limits for completing construction
work; extensions; forfeiture of rights; cancellation of
permit; notice of date of expiration to appropriator.

Whenever the state engineer places his endorsement of
approval on any application for a water permit, he shall
require that actual construction work be completed within
the time set by him in the permit. The time set for
completion shall not exceed a period of five (5) years
after the date of approval of application. In the case of
an application for a ditch permit, he shall further require
that the application of the water to beneficial use must be
completed before the date which he shall specify, and which
shall not be earlier than the date specified for the
completion of construction; and that final proof of
appropriation must be submitted within five (5) years after
the date specified for the completion of the application of
the water to beneficial use. He may limit the application
to a less period of time for the completion of construction
and application of water to beneficial use than is asked
257 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
for in the application. For good cause shown, the state
engineer may at any time, or from time to time, before the
date of expiration, extend any or all of these periods. An
extension of time for compliance with any of the specified
requirements shall be construed to automatically extend for
a like period the time for compliance with any of the
specific requirements in relation to which the time expires
thereafter. Default by the holder of the permit in any of
the specified requirements shall work a forfeiture of the
water right involved. The state engineer may upon such
default cancel the permit. The state engineer shall, at
least three (3) months before default in any of these
requirements shall be operative, notify the permit holder
when the time allowed will expire. Notification may be
delivered by United States postal service, by other
generally accepted mail delivery method to the post-office
address given by the permit holder or by email or other
electronic means that provides actual notice to the permit
holder. If the permit holder cannot be reached by mail or
by email, the state engineer shall notify the permit holder
by certified mail to the permit holder's last known address
and shall publish notice of the default on the state
engineer's official website and for three (3) consecutive
258 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
weeks either on the centralized electronic notice system or
in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
county, or in case there is no newspaper of general
circulation published in the county, then in a newspaper
published in the state of Wyoming and in general
circulation in the county, the last publication on the
centralized electronic notice system or in the newspaper to
be at least two (2) months before cancellation of the
permit.

41-4-511. Final proof of appropriation; procedures
generally.

Whenever an appropriation of water has been perfected in
accordance with any permit issued by the state engineer,
the appropriator may submit final proof of appropriation of
water at any time within the time specified by W.S.
41-4-506, to the superintendent of the water division in
which the water right involved is situated, or, when more
expedient, before the superintendent of another water
division or the state engineer, or before a water
commissioner in accordance with the provisions of W.S.
41-4-308. Proof shall be made by appropriators under oath
259 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
upon forms furnished by the state board of control. The
superintendent shall collect for each proof taken a fee not
to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), which fee shall be
transmitted to the secretary of the board of control
together with the several proofs taken. The secretary of
the board of control shall use the fee to pay the
appropriate amount for the county recording fee for the
recording of the certificate of appropriation in the office
of the county clerk of the county in which the water right
is situated and the newspaper advertising fee, if
applicable, for advertising the several proofs as provided
in this section. The remainder of the fee shall be remitted
to the state treasurer to the credit of the general fund.
If the board of control rejects any proof, the fee shall be
returned to the person, association or corporation
submitting such proof. At least thirty (30) days prior to
any regular meeting of the state board of control the
superintendent of each water division shall cause all
proofs taken by him to be advertised on the centralized
electronic notice system or in at least one (1) issue of a
newspaper having general circulation in the community where
the water right involved is situated, such advertisement to
contain in each case the permit number, the date of
260 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
priority, the name of the ditch, canal or reservoir, the
name of the appropriator, the name of the stream from which
the appropriation is made, and the amount of the
appropriation expressed in acres for ditches designed for
the irrigation of lands and in acre-feet for reservoirs, or
in cubic feet per second or gallons per minute when the
appropriation is for domestic, stock, municipal,
industrial, manufacturing, fish hatchery or power purposes.
Advertisements shall state the time when, and the place
where, the proofs of appropriation of water taken by the
superintendent will be open for public inspection for a
period of not less than one (1) or more than five (5) days,
and the last day of the period shall not be less than
fifteen (15) days prior to the meeting of the board. Any
party claiming an interest in any water right from the
stream or streams to which the advertised proofs refer,
shall have the right to contest the proposed adjudications
according to the provisions of W.S. 41-4-312 through
41-4-315. Upon the completion of the taking of proofs of
appropriation and the advertising, the superintendent of
each water division shall transmit to the office of the
state board of control in Cheyenne the several proofs
taken, together with fees collected, and shall accompany
261 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
the same with affidavits of publication as evidence of the
required advertisement. At its next regular meeting the
board shall consider all proofs of appropriation received
from the division superintendents and if satisfied that
there are no conflicts and that any appropriation involved
has been perfected in accordance with the permit issued by
the state engineer, the state board of control by the hand
of its president, attested under seal, shall issue a
certificate of appropriation of water as described in W.S.
41-4-325 and send the certificate to the county clerk of
the county in which the use of water has been made to be
recorded by the clerk as provided in W.S. 41-4-325.

41-4-514. Petition for amendment of permits; petition
for amended certificate of appropriation; hearings on
petition; notice; costs.

(b) The state engineer may hold a public hearing on a
petition under subsection (a) of this section to gather
facts to determine if other appropriators will be
injuriously affected. The state engineer shall hold a
public hearing on a petition under subsection (a) of this
section if requested to do so by any affected appropriator.
262 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
If the state engineer holds a public hearing, the state
engineer shall cause to be published no less than fifteen
(15) days before the hearing a notice of the hearing. to be
The notice shall be published for not less than one (1) day
on the centralized electronic notice system or advertised
in at least one (1) issue of any newspaper having general
circulation in the community where the water right or valid
permit involved is situated. The petitioner shall pay the
cost of the publication or advertisement prior to the time
of hearing, and provide a record of proceedings to be
transmitted to the state engineer. Following receipt of the
record, the state engineer shall promptly review the record
and issue a written order granting or denying the permit
amendment.

(e) Upon petition for an amended certificate of
appropriation of water, the state board of control may
cause a public hearing to be held on the petition before
the superintendent of the water division in which such
appropriation is located, with notice of the hearing to be
published for not less than one (1) day on the centralized
electronic notice system or advertised in at least one (1)
issue of a newspaper having general circulation in the
263 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
community where the water right involved is situated. The
state board of control shall hold a public hearing if
requested to do so by any affected appropriator. The
petitioner shall pay the cost of the publication prior to
the time of hearing and provide a record of proceedings to
be transmitted by the division superintendent to the state
board of control, together with his report. At the time the
petition is filed a fee not to exceed fifty dollars
($50.00) for each amended certificate issued shall be
collected by the state board of control with a deposit of
sufficient funds to cover the cost of preparing and
recording a certified copy of the order. The fees for
recording shall be returned to the petitioner in case the
petition is not granted.

41-7-204. Hearings; service of notice generally;
contents.

(a) On such petition being filed the court or judge
thereof shall make an order fixing the time and place of
the hearing thereon and ordering notice; thereupon the
clerk of said circuit court, for the county in which the
264 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
proceedings are instituted, shall cause twenty (20) days
notice of the filing of such petition to be given:

(ii) By publishing a copy thereof for not less
than three (3) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or at least once a week for three
(3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in each
county within which any of the lands of the district are
situated. If notice is not provided on the centralized
electronic notice system and there be no newspaper in any
such county, such notice may be published in a newspaper
published in an adjoining county.

41-7-206. Hearings; adjournment to serve persons not
served.

If it shall be found before the hearing on the petition for
the organization of an irrigation district, that one (1) or
more of the persons owning or entitled to possession of
land in said district have not been duly served with notice
of hearing on said petition, the court or presiding judge
shall not thereby lose jurisdiction. The court or presiding
judge in such case shall adjourn the hearing, make an order
265 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
directing the serving of said notice upon said person or
persons, and fixing the time and manner of service of such
notice, which notice shall notify him to appear at said
adjourned time and place and be heard on said petition.
Said notice shall be served personally or by leaving at the
last usual place of abode of said unserved persons, as in
W.S. 41-7-204 provided, not less than eight (8) days before
said adjourned hearing, or published not less than fourteen
(14) days before said adjourned hearing, on the centralized
electronic notice system or in some newspaper published in
the county in which said persons' lands lie, or if no
newspaper may be published in said county, then in some
newspaper published in an adjoining county. Upon the
adjourned day the same proceedings, adjournments, trial,
findings and orders may be had as in case of complete
service of notice in the first instance. In case of failure
to mail said notice as herein required, the court or judge
may order the same mailed later and shall adjourn said
hearing so that said notice shall be mailed at least
fourteen (14) days before said adjourned hearing. In case
of failure to publish or post notice, as in this act
required, the court or judge may adjourn said hearing for
sufficient time to permit the due posting and publication
266 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of said notice, and order said notice posted or published
as in section 4 hereof directed. In case of adjournment to
permit notice to be given, the notice shall state the fact
of such adjournment and the time and place of hearing
pursuant to said adjournment.

41-7-308. Hearings on commissioners' report; filing
of objections; notice generally.

Upon the filing of the said report, the court or judge
thereof, shall make and enter an order fixing the time and
place when and where all persons interested may appear and
object to the confirmation thereof. All objections shall be
in writing and shall clearly specify the grounds of
objection and shall be filed in the office of the clerk of
court wherein said report is filed at least five (5) days
prior to the date set for the hearing. The clerk of said
court shall cause notice of the time and place of such
hearing to be given to all parties interested, which notice
shall contain a brief description of the lands benefited
and damaged, together with the net damage awarded the
several tracts, parcels, easements and corporations to
which damages are awarded, and the sum in each case
267 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
assessed for benefits and cost of construction against the
several benefited parcels, tracts, easements and
corporations, and the amount of water apportioned to each
acre of land in the district. Said notice shall be
published for at least three (3) consecutive weeks, prior
to the day set for the hearing, on the centralized
electronic notice system or in one (1) newspaper published
in each county in which said lands, or any part thereof
within said district are situate (and if no newspaper is
published in said county, in some newspaper in an adjoining
county), and by serving a copy of such notice on each of
the persons or corporations by said report recommended to
be assessed, or whose lands are by said report recommended
to be included in said district, and who resides in any of
the counties in which any lands of the proposed district
are situated, at least twelve (12) days before the day of
hearing in the same manner that a summons is required to be
served; provided, absence from the county of such person,
or corporation shall excuse personal service, whereupon due
publication of such notice shall be sufficient service.

41-7-412. Advertisement for bids on work exceeding
$7,500.00.
268 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

In all cases where the work to be done at any one (1) time
under the direction of the commissioners will, in their
opinion, cost to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500.00), the same shall be let to the lowest
responsible bidder, and the commissioner shall advertise
for sealed bids, by notice published on the centralized
electronic notice system or in some newspaper published in
the county in which the petition is filed, and may
advertise in one (1) or more newspapers published
elsewhere. If notice is not published on the centralized
electronic notice system and there be is no newspaper
published in the county in which the petition is filed,
they shall advertise in some newspaper published in an
adjoining county, which said notice shall particularly set
forth the time and place when and where the bids advertised
will be opened, the kind of work to be let and the terms of
payment. Said commissioners may continue the letting from
time to time, if in their judgment the same shall be
necessary, and shall reserve the right to reject any and
all bids. This section shall not be construed to apply to
the employment of superintendent, engineer, attorney or
other employee engaged in the general work of the district.
269 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

41-7-502. Petition for authority to issue warrants;
notice of hearing; objections.

Whenever the commissioners of an irrigation district, after
their appointment and qualification, shall wish to avail
themselves of the provisions of W.S. 41-7-501, they shall
file in the district court wherein such district was
organized, a petition for authority to issue
interest-bearing warrants, setting out the necessity for
such issuance, the amounts of warrants to be issued and the
purpose thereof; the judge of said court shall thereupon,
by order, set a date for hearing said petition and notice
of such hearing, setting out briefly the purpose thereof,
shall be published for one (1) consecutive week on the
centralized electronic notice system or in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county wherein the district or
the greater portion thereof is situate, the last
publication of said notice shall be at least ten (10) days
prior to the date set for said hearing and any protests or
objections to the said petition must be in writing, setting
out the grounds of such protest or objection, signed and
verified by the protestant or objector, and filed in the
270 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
proceeding at least five (5) days prior to the date set for
said hearing.

41-7-602. Petition for contract and assessments;
hearings generally.

Whenever any contract between the United States and an
irrigation district so provides, the assessment or
assessments for benefits and construction against the
individual tracts of land in the district, as now required
under W.S. 41-7-401, may be dispensed with, and in such
case the board of commissioners of the district, at any
time, or after an election as provided by law has resulted
in the approval of such contract, may file in the district
court of the county embracing the largest acreage of the
district, a petition praying in effect, that the contract
and the proceedings leading up to the execution of same and
the assessment for benefits and construction as requested
therein may be examined, approved and confirmed by the
court. The petition shall state generally that the
irrigation district was duly authorized, that due and
lawful proceedings were taken to execute a contract with
the United States which incurred a district indebtedness
271 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
for construction charges to the United States in a maximum
amount to be stated, and that the assessments to be levied
against the individual tracts of land under the contract do
not exceed the benefits to accrue to such tracts of land,
respectively, by reason of such contract. The court shall,
upon presentation of such a petition, fix a time for the
hearing of said petition and shall order the clerk of the
court to give and publish notice of the filing of the said
petition, and of the time and place fixed for the hearing
thereon. The notice of such hearing shall be published for
three (3) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system or three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper
of general circulation in each county in which such
district is located and shall state the time and place
fixed for the hearing of the petition, the prayer thereof,
and that any person interested in the subject matter of the
petition may, on or before three (3) days prior to the day
fixed for the hearing thereof, answer or otherwise plead
thereto, and no other notice shall be required to be given
of the time and place of the hearing thereon. Upon the
hearing on such proceedings, the court shall disregard
every error, irregularity, or omission which does not
affect the substantial rights of any party, and the court
272 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
may make an order confirming and approving the proceedings
taken to ratify and confirm such contract and the
assessments for benefits and construction as required
therein. The costs of the proceedings may be allowed and
apportioned among the parties thereto in the discretion of
the court.

41-7-832. Election; notice.

(a) Immediately after the adoption of the resolution
by the board the secretary of the district shall proceed to
give notice of the time and place of holding such election
in the manner following:

(ii) By publishing a copy of said notice for
three (3) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system or at least once a week for three (3)
consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in each
county within which any of the lands of the district are
situated, giving the time, place and object of said
election;

41-7-854. Notice of hearing; publication.
273 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

The clerk of said court shall give notice of the filing of
said petition and of the time and place of hearing thereon
to any and all persons interested therein by publishing a
copy of said order for three (3) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or at least once a
week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper
published in each county within which any of the lands of
the said irrigation district is situated. If notice is not
published on the centralized electronic notice system and
there be is no newspaper in any such county, such notice
may be published in a newspaper published in an adjoining
county.

41-7-916. Publication of notice of redemption.

Notice designating the bonds called for redemption shall be
published for three (3) successive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or once a week for three (3)
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
printed and published in the office county.

41-7-921. Publication of notice of sale.
274 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

The board of commissioners shall give notice of the sale by
posting on the county's official website in the manner
provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication for at
least two (2) weeks in the designated official newspaper of
the county and in any other newspaper at its discretion,
subject to W.S. 9-1-309 and 9-1-310. If notice is published
on the centralized electronic notice system, the notice
shall be published for not less than two (2) consecutive
weeks.

41-7-933. Publication of cancellation resolution and
notice of time for consideration.

The resolution together with a notice stating that the time
fixed by the board of commissioners for the consideration
of the resolution shall be published for not less than two
(2) successive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or once a week for at least two (2) successive weeks
in a newspaper published in the office county.

41-7-1005. Order for hearing on results of election;
publication.
275 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

A copy of such order to show cause shall be published for
four (4) successive weeks prior to said hearing on the
centralized electronic notice system or for four (4)
successive weeks prior to said hearing in a newspaper
published in each county in which said district is
situated.

41-8-101. Definitions.

(d) "Due notice", for provisions other than election
and referendum provisions, means notice published for at
least two (2) consecutive weeks on the centralized
electronic notice system or at least twice, with an
interval of at least six (6) days between the two (2)
publication dates, in a newspaper of general circulation
within the boundaries of the proposed or organized
district. The notice of any hearing required to be held
under this act shall fix the time, place and purpose
thereof, which time shall be not less than ten (10) or more
than fifteen (15) days after the first publication or first
posting of such notice. At any hearing held pursuant to
such notice, at the time and place designated in such
276 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
notice, adjournment may be made from time to time without
the necessity of renewing such notice for such adjourned
dates. Notice for any election or referendum required by
this act shall be as specifically provided in this act, or
if not specifically provided in this act, as required in
the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

41-9-104. Notice of hearing; service generally;
contents.

(a) On such petition being filed the court or judge
thereof shall make an order fixing a time and place of
hearing thereon and ordering notice; thereupon the clerk of
said court, for the county in which the proceedings are
instituted, shall cause twenty (20) days notice of the
filing of such petition to be given:

(ii) By publishing a copy thereof for three (3)
successive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or at least once a week for three (3) successive
weeks in some newspaper published in each county from which
any part of the district is proposed to be taken. If notice
is not published on the centralized electronic notice
277 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
system and there be is no newspaper in any such county,
such notice may be published in a newspaper published in an
adjoining county.

41-9-109. Notice of hearing; service after
adjournment.

Said notice shall be served personally or by leaving at the
last usual place of abode of said unserved owners, as in
W.S. 41-9-104; provided, not less than eight (8) days
before said adjourned hearing, or published not less than
fourteen (14) days before said adjourned hearing, on the
centralized electronic notice system or in some newspaper
published in the county in which said owners' lands lie, or
if no newspaper be published in said county, then in some
newspaper published in an adjoining county.

41-9-128. Hearings on report; notice generally.

Upon the filing of the preliminary report the court or the
presiding judge thereof shall by order fix a time and place
when and where the same shall be heard at some general or
special term of said court, not less than thirty (30) days
278 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
from the filing of said report. Notice of the time and
place of hearing upon said preliminary report shall be
given to all interested persons by publishing a brief
notice of the filing of said report, including a brief
statement of the substance of said report, on the
centralized electronic notice system for three (3)
successive weeks prior to the day appointed for hearing
thereon or in one (1) or more newspapers published in each
county in which any land in said proposed drainage district
shall be situated (or if no newspaper is published in said
county, in one (1) or more newspapers in an adjoining
county) once in each week for three (3) successive weeks
prior to the day appointed for hearing thereon. Said notice
shall describe all lands by said report included in said
district, which were not included therein by the petition,
and state that such lands are to be included in said
district, and shall describe all lands excluded from said
district which were by the petition included therein and
shall state that such lands are to be excluded from said
district.

41-9-224. Notice of hearings on report; publication
and service generally.
279 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

Said notice shall be published on the centralized
electronic notice system for not less than three (3)
successive weeks prior to the day set for hearing thereon
or for at least three (3) successive weeks, prior to the
day set for the hearing in one (1) newspaper published in
each county in which said lands, or any part thereof within
said district are situate (and if no newspaper is published
in said county, in some newspaper in an adjoining county),
and by serving a copy of such notice on each of the persons
or corporations, by said report recommended to be assessed,
or whose lands are by said report recommended to be
included in said district, and who resides in any of the
counties out of which the proposed district is formed, at
least twenty (20) days before the day of hearing in the
same manner that a summons is required to be served;
provided, absence from the county of such person or
corporation shall excuse personal service, whereupon due
publication of such notice shall be sufficient service.

41-9-245. Additional assessments; generally.

280 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
If in the first assessment for construction the
commissioners shall have reported to the court a smaller
sum than is needed to complete the work of construction, or
if in any year an additional sum is necessary to pay the
principal of or interest on lawful indebtedness of said
drainage district, further or additional assessments on the
lands and corporations benefited, proportioned on the last
assessment of benefits which has been approved by the
court, shall be made by the commissioners of said drainage
district under the order of the court or presiding judge
thereof. Notice of hearing of the application for such
additional assessment shall be published on the centralized
electronic notice system for three (3) consecutive weeks or
at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in
one (1) newspaper published in each county in which said
lands, or any part thereof, within said district are
situated which further or additional assessments may be
made payable in installments, as specified in W.S.
41-9-241, and shall be treated and collected in the same
manner as the original assessments for construction
confirmed by the court, in said drainage district.

41-9-260. Bidding procedure when cost over $500.00.
281 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

In all cases where the work to be done at any one time
under the direction of the commissioners shall, in their
opinion, cost to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00), the
same shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, and the
commissioner shall advertise for sealed bids, by notice
published on the centralized electronic notice system or in
some newspaper published in the county in which the
petition is filed, and may advertise in one (1) or more
newspapers published elsewhere. If notice is not published
on the centralized electronic notice system and there be is
no newspaper published in the county in which the petition
is filed, they shall advertise in some newspaper published
in an adjoining county, which said notice shall
particularly set forth the time and place when and where
the bids advertised will be opened, the kind of work to be
let and the terms of payment. Said commissioners may
continue the letting from time to time, if in their
judgment the same shall be necessary, and shall reserve the
right to reject any and all bids.

41-9-303. Order for hearing on petition; notice
generally.
282 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

(a) On such petition being filed, the court or judge
thereof shall make an order fixing the time and place for a
hearing thereon, and ordering notice; thereupon the clerk
of said court shall cause twenty (20) days notice of the
filing of said petition to be given:

(iii) By publishing a notice thereof for three
(3) successive weeks on the centralized electronic notice
system or at least once a week for three (3) successive
weeks in some newspaper published in the county in which
any part of the district is located. If notice is not
published on the centralized electronic notice system and
there be is no newspaper in any such county, such notice
shall be published in a newspaper published in the
adjoining county nearest the land in said district.

41-9-605. Election hearing results; publication.

A copy of such order to show cause shall be published for
four (4) successive weeks prior to said hearing on the
centralized electronic notice system or for four (4)
successive weeks prior to said hearing in a newspaper
283 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
published in each county in which lands embraced in said
district be situated.

41-10-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act the following words or
phrases shall be defined as follows:

(xiv) "Publication" or "publish" for provisions
other than election provisions, shall mean publication for
not less than three (3) consecutive weeks on the
centralized electronic notice system or at least once a
week for three (3) consecutive weeks by three (3) weekly
insertions in at least one (1) newspaper of general
circulation in the district, the first publication on the
centralized electronic notice system or in the newspaper in
the district being at least fifteen (15) days prior to the
designated time or event. If publication is made by
newspaper, it shall not be necessary that publication be
made on the same day of the week in each of the three (3)
calendar weeks, but not less than fourteen (14) days shall
intervene between the first publication and the last
publication, and publication shall be complete on the day
284 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
of the last publication. Publication requirements for any
election under this act shall be as specifically provided
in this act, or if not specifically provided in this act,
as required in the Special District Elections Act of 1994;

41-10-110. Original board generally.

(g) The district shall be subject to an audit or
oversight of its accounts by the director of the state
department of audit or his designee as required by W.S.
9-1-507(a)(iii). The board of directors shall cause an
audit or other oversight to be made of all financial
affairs of the district during each fiscal year ending June
30, during the next succeeding six (6) months. If an audit
is required, a summary of the financial statement shall be
certified by the person making the audit, which shall be
published on the centralized electronic notice system for
the next two (2) consecutive weeks or in a newspaper of
general circulation in the district, one (1) issue during
the next succeeding two (2) weeks following the audit.
Except as provided in W.S. 9-1-507(d), the audit, if
required, shall be made by a certified public accountant,
who is not otherwise employed by the district.
285 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

41-10-140. Publication of resolution or other
proceedings relative to issuance of bonds; right of
interested person to contest legality within 30 days;
incontestable thereafter.

The board may provide for the publication on the
centralized electronic notice system or once in a newspaper
of general circulation in the district of any resolution or
other proceedings adopted by the board ordering the
issuance of any bonds. For a period of thirty (30) days
after the date of such publication, any person in interest
shall have the right to contest the legality of any bond
which may be authorized thereby (except for any bond
delivered for value, containing a recital therein that it
is issued under authority of this act, and thus being
incontestable for any cause whatsoever, as herein
provided), and of the provisions made for the security and
payment of any such bonds, and of any other provisions in
such resolution or proceedings; and after the expiration of
such thirty (30) day period no one shall have any cause of
action to contest the regularity, formality, or legality
thereof for any cause whatsoever.
286 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590

41-12-605. Diversions from the Yellowstone River
Basin; application; notice.

(c) The state engineer shall publish a reasonable
summary of the application for three (3) consecutive weeks
in at least three (3) newspapers of general circulation
within the state and if the proposed point of diversion is
within Wyoming, publish the notice in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
diversion point is to be located, or the state engineer
shall publish a reasonable summary of the application for
three (3) consecutive weeks on the centralized electronic
notice system.

Section 3. The secretary of state shall establish the
centralized electronic notice system and promulgate all
rules necessary to implement the provisions of this act not
later than January 1, 2026.

Section 4. There is appropriated two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the
secretary of state's office for the purpose of creating and
287 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
maintaining the centralized electronic notice system as
required by section 1 of this act. This appropriation shall
be for the period beginning with the effective date of this
act and ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026. It is the intent of the legislature that the
secretary of state include the portion of this
appropriation that is necessary for the maintenance of the
centralized electronic notice system in the secretary of
state's standard budget request for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

288 HB0298

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0590
Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
289 HB0298